_	This is based upon the argument that, while sovereignty gives rights to states, there is also a responsibility to protect its citizens, an argument based upon social contract theory.
_	In defense, Napster cited "Sony v. Universal City Studios" for the argument that (1) the users of its system were engaging in fair use and (2) the Napster software was capable of substantial non-infringing use.
_	The book begins describing the death of Evariste Galois in a duel in 1832 and makes the argument that the ideas and culture of the Romantic age influenced the way mathematicians saw themselves and the very mathematics that they created.
_	McCauley has defended himself on numerous occasions with the argument that he only earns the salary of a chief executive of a medium-sized company.
_	First, he responds to the argument that the abolition of Christianity would expand the liberty of conscience by arguing that if great wits could not denounce the Church, they might instead turn to the denunciation of the government, causing political unrest.
_	Swift then addresses the argument that the Church, then supported by government funds, was a drain on resources that might be better spent elsewhere.
_	Swift counters the argument that the abolition of Christianity would open up another day of the week (the Sabbath) to commercial activities for the benefit of the nation by arguing that the Sabbath provides benefits by allowing lawyers time to write their briefs, merchants to tally their books, and others to exercise, go to coffeehouses, and otherwise enjoy themselves, ironically implying that the argument is specious because the Sabbath was not kept as intended in any case.
_	Swift then counters the argument that abolishing Christianity would remove arbitrary sectarian distinctions between Whig and Tory, High Church and Low Church, etc. that arguably damaged civil discourse and politics, by arguing that Christianity merely stands in as a convenient and arbitrary source of such distinctions and that abolishing it would only allow other equally arbitrary distinctions, essentially arguing that the problem is merely semantic and that such distinctions are a part of human nature.
_	The claim of previous Jewish origin were based on the argument that such maqams ("maqamat"), as many other Muslim sacred tombs, were originally Jewish tombs that had been subsequently Islamized during the later history of the region.
_	In this talk, Tulley makes the argument that a growing trend towards over-protection of children is harming their ability to learn and think.
_	This lends weight to the argument that the name Earn therefore comes from Eireann, in other words "the loch of the Irish".
_	He also rejected the argument that removing paintings from walls was an official duty.
_	To the surprise of everyone, Mason asks for Buzz's opinion over Tao's after Buzz speaks up and agrees with the argument that Buzz presents for laying a trap and the low risks it has.
_	Regarding the argument that the mandate penalizes or taxes "inactivity", Roberts wrote:
_	Suggestions that Renault management had slowed production for German occupiers was countered with the argument that workers rather than management had organized the production slow-downs.
_	Some ethicist and legal scholars make the argument that it is incorrect to call the conceptus an "embryo", because it will later differentiate into both intraembryonic and extraembryonic tissues, and can even split to produce multiple embryos (identical twins).
_	According to Jill Rubery, a Professor of comparative employment system at Manchester School of Management, so far "the experience has been mixed: though the argument that increasing women's employment is critical to the achievement of Europe's aspirations for a higher employment rate has been widely accepted, there is a much weaker and more fragile commitment to improving the quality of work available to women."
_	They refute the argument that racism may contribute to more diagnoses from psychiatrists of schizophrenia amongst members of the Afro Caribbean community and ascribe more value to deprivation and social isolation as triggering factors in those with a propensity towards schizotype personalities.
_	People with what would be considered religious or spiritual belief in a supernatural controlling power are defined by some as adherents to a religion; the argument that atheism is a religion has been described as a contradiction in terms.
_	The argument that the Internal Revenue Code is not "law," the argument that the Internal Revenue Code is not "positive law", the argument that nothing in the Internal Revenue Code imposes a requirement to file a return or pay tax, and similar arguments, have been identified as frivolous arguments for purposes of the $5,000 penalty for taking a frivolous position on a tax return.
_	While this could be interpreted as a justification for state action to reduce poverty, it was used by classical liberals to justify inaction with the argument that the net benefit to all individuals would be higher.
_	Since access to these same documents is what is most often cited as giving rise to the Renaissance in Western Europe, this disinterest on the part of the Rus seems to fly in the face of the argument that it was the Mongol invasions which caused Russia to "miss" the Renaissance.
_	However, this critique has been challenged by the argument that it is linguistics, not cultural divergence, that has allowed for a European bias, and that the bias can be lifted by centering the methodology on fundamental human concepts.
_	It was however repeatedly shelved because of the argument that it would severely hurt the water availability to the lower riparians.
_	One of the bill's sponsors, Alice Bordsen, states the bill "saves you money in the near future and in the distant future" supporting the argument that while implementation will be costly, it will serve best to 16- and 17- year olds by allowing them the chance to have a successful future.
_	Gazit rejected the argument that Israel missed an opportunity to make peace with Egypt from 1970-1973 after Anwar Sadat became Egypt's president.
_	The codice_50 tells AWK that the argument that follows is the file to read the AWK program from, which is the same flag that is used in sed.
_	Gossman maintains that underlying the argument that historiography cannot be subsumed under a poetics or a rhetoric is a larger claim, namely that a wide range of activities, from literary criticism, through legal debate, theology, ethics, politics, psychology, and medicine to the natural sciences, all constitute rational practices, even if there is considerable variation in the degree of formalism and rigor and in the type of argument most commonly employed in each of these different fields of inquiry.
_	He also admitted, frankly, that "it occurred to [him] quite early in the argument that if the persons who sent their money on the faith of this document had no lien on the separate account there was something very wrong with the law on this subject."
_	These stages are "the traditional society, the pre-conditions for take-off, the take-off, the drive to maturity, and the age of high mass-consumption" Simple versions of the Harrod–Domar model provide a mathematical illustration of the argument that improved capital investment leads to greater economic growth.
_	"The Jewish Gospels: The Story of the Jewish Christ" (2012) carries on the line of exploration begun in "Border Lines", developing the argument that New Testament ideas can be found in long-standing Jewish traditions.
_	Faucounau's addition to this is the argument that Crete is also too far south, that the names of the constellations are (Ionic) Greek, not Minoan, and therefore that the constellation makers must be the proto-Ionians in the Cyclades.
_	This is based on the argument that any and all attempts to lead phenomena back to immanence in consciousness, that is, to exercise the phenomenological reduction, necessarily results in showing that givenness is the "sole horizon of phenomena"
_	The broader implications reached by Lave and others who specialize in situated learning are that beyond the argument that certain knowledge is necessary to be a member of society (a Durkheimian argument), knowledge learned in the context of a school is not reliably transferable to other contexts of practice.
_	Even a directive from the government of the Federal Republic in Bonn to instead invest in badly needed renovations of the S-Bahn, coupled with a warning that subsidies to Berlin would be reduced, was dismissed with the argument that cessation of the U-Bahn construction would cause severe economic harm to the city.
_	The argument that the rich would buy crime is refuted by the argument that even a wealthy man could be killed in self-defense if he attempted a violent act and that he would risk his reputation as well.
_	In addition, the majority simply denied the argument that states were permitted to base their apportionment structures upon the Constitution itself, which requires two senators from each state despite substantially un-equal populations among the states.
_	Many have made the argument that the decomposing corpses will attract insects and scavenging animals.
_	However, the relationship between the two companies soured after the canal attempted to raise tolls under the argument that canal improvements had reduced costs for the PCC.
_	McLachlin dismissed the argument that the term "narcotic" in the act was ambiguous and could be read to exclude the cuttings as there was no THC in it.
_	However, residents of the largest population center, Mobile, often make the argument that the phrase refers only to the extreme southernmost parts of Alabama.
_	This has led to the argument that the name may be linked to the ancient Persian festival of "Sadeh".
_	The courts repeatedly rejected the argument that truth was a defense against libel.
_	The Court rejected the argument that police questioning on board a bus constitutes a "per se" seizure under the Fourth Amendment, and instead held that courts should use a "totality of the circumstances" test to determine whether a passenger would have felt "free to decline the officers' requests or otherwise terminate the encounter", or whether a passenger was free "to ignore the police presence and go about his business".
_	Adherence to original meaning is explicitly divorced from the intent of the Founders; rather, the reasons for adhering to original meaning derive from other justifications, such as the argument that the understanding of the ratifiers (the people of the several States at the time of the adoption of the Constitution) should be controlling, as well as consequentialist arguments about original meaning's positive effect on rule of law.
_	At oral arguments, Lockhart, represented by Brian Wolfman, advanced the argument that the government lacks authority to offset benefits for loans over 10 years delinquent.
_	Despite the fact that there was no issue of legality ever raised, and, although several other cabinet members of the Syriza administration had been receiving the same subsidy benefit, her media character assassination was based on the argument that she was 'rich and did not need it'.
_	Vong put forth the argument that certain forms of political violence could be condoned by Buddhism.
_	On March 8, 2012, the Mississippi Supreme Court upheld the pardons, which had been challenged based on the argument that many of them did not follow a requirement in the state constitution to publish notices in newspapers for 30 days.
_	Nor did Madison embrace the argument that forms the linchpin of the dissent: that monetary subsidies are constitutionally different from other neutral benefits programs.
_	China has also tied Indian bid to Pakistani bid, blocking the former's entry repeatedly based on the argument that If India can be let in without signing NPT, then Pakistan should be granted membership as well.
_	Delahanty later sued Röhm with the argument that small, cheap guns have no purpose except for crime, and thus that the company should be held responsible.
_	These were the feminist argument that "young people, especially young girls, do need protection from adult men in an exploitative and patriarchal society", and the argument that while adults are fully aware of the sexual connotations of their actions, young people are not, and that there is thus "an inherent and inevitable structural imbalance in awareness of the situation."
_	Further indicative of the role cognitive flexibility plays in education is the argument that how students are taught greatly impacts the nature and formation of their cognitive structures, which in turn affect students' ability to store and readily access information.
_	This bias is commonly explained with the argument that natural products have co-evolved in the environment for long time periods and have therefore been pre-selected for active structures.
_	Strict DTD does not allow presentational markup with the argument that Cascading Style Sheets should be used for that instead.
_	Critics argued that its authors made questionable comparisons between humans and non-human animals and observed that many rapes, such as those involving young children, the elderly, or persons of the same sex, cannot lead to reproduction, undermining the argument that rape is a reproductive adaptation.
_	In philosophy, this conception results in discourses predicated on the argument that "Everybody knows..." the truth of some basic idea.
_	The third type was so-called scientific racism, based on the argument that races have fixed characteristics, and asserting that Jews have negative characteristics.
_	The application was based on the argument that the traditional common law definition of marriage discriminated against same-sex couples on the basis of sexual orientation, contrary to the equality clause of the Canadian Charter of Rights and Freedoms.
_	Secondly, the judgment rejected the argument that the Maori Land Court did not have jurisdiction to determine the status of the foreshore and seabed because this area is not land.
_	Fontenelle quickly followed with his "Digression sur les anciens et les modernes" (1688), in which he took the Modern side, pressing the argument that modern scholarship allowed modern man to surpass the ancients in knowledge.
_	In his book he states that the killings were not genocide, because they have not been proven to have been governmentally organized, and also because "the argument that the deportations in reality constituted a premeditated program of extermination of the Armenians of Turkey is difficult to square with many aspects and characteristics of the relocations", including the non relocation of Armenian communities of cities like Istanbul, Smyrna (Izmir) and Aleppo; the fact that "the trek on foot that took so many lives was imposed only on the Armenian in eastern and central Anatolia, a part of the country that had no railroad.
_	First, Larson strengthens the argument that the two NPs as in Figure 2 relate to subject and object position.
_	He brought to bear the argument that Collier failed to understand "Stage-Discipline" (i.e. poetic justice).
_	However, it is important to note that the argument that the poverty of stimulus supports the innateness hypothesis remains very controversial.
_	Writer and lecturer Thomas Rose makes the argument that granting legal rights afforded to humans to non-humans is nothing new.
_	A key element of the Government's campaign in the 2004 election was the argument that only a Coalition government could keep interest rates low.
_	Secondly, these scholars uphold the argument that Mearsheimer's offensive neorealism significantly contributes to foreign policy theory and alliance theory.
_	On May 8, the jury found Chase guilty of six counts of first degree murder and, rejecting the argument that he was not guilty by reason of insanity, sentenced him to die in the gas chamber.
_	The court ruled that the defendants were "clearly transmitting performances of Plaintiffs' Copyrighted Works", and that the argument that the service was offering "DVD rentals" did not stand.
_	The metaphor illustrates the argument that free access and unrestricted demand for a finite resource ultimately reduces the resource through over-exploitation, temporarily or permanently.
_	Nochlin's essay develops the argument that both formal and social education restricted artistic development to men, preventing women (with rare exception) from honing their talents and gaining entry into the art world.
_	Was the "Original Jesus" a Pagan God? is a 1999 book by British authors Timothy Freke and Peter Gandy, which advances the argument that early Christianity originated as a Greco-Roman mystery cult and that Jesus was invented by early Christians based on an alleged pagan cult of a dying and rising "godman" known as Osiris-Dionysus, whose worship the authors claim was manifested in the cults of Osiris, Dionysus, Attis, and Mithras.
_	When the high court threw out this brief, the argument that had succeeded in appeals court was no longer allowed.
_	Furthermore, the argument that "something" is needed to explain the differences in the Holocene is challenged by more recent research showing that all interglacials differ.
_	When the U.S. refused to continue repaying its debt using the argument that the debt was owed to the previous government, not to the French First Republic, French outrage led to a series of responses.
_	This was countered by the argument that a change in the mode in which senators were elected would not change their responsibilities.
_	Sportwriter John Wertheim of Sports Illustrated stated in an article in July 2010 that Serena Williams is the greatest female tennis player ever with the argument that "Head-to-head, on a neutral surface (i.e. hard courts), everyone at their best, I can't help feeling that she crushes the other legends.".
_	However, one could make the argument that the novelist was using Clara's character as a means of denouncing English and French colonialism.
_	However, in "Jorden v. National Guard" we rejected the argument that Feres requires us to inquire in each case whether judicial review will unduly interfere with military operations.
_	Other scholars have rejected the argument that the racial ideology of Italian fascism could be attributed solely to Nazi influence.
_	The implication in Justice Black's footnote that secular humanism is a religion has been seized upon by religious opponents of the teaching of evolution, who have made the argument that teaching evolution amounts to teaching a religious idea.
_	The main premise of the anti-pornography movement rests upon the argument that pornography is degrading and violent towards women.
_	In 2017, the Department of Justice filed an amicus brief in the 2nd U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals making the argument that Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 does not prohibit discrimination against employees who are bisexual or gay.
_	To this day, the argument that "mokusatsu" was misunderstood, and that the misunderstanding interrupted a negotiation for a peaceful end to the war still resurfaces from time to time.
_	While Alan Greenspan's role as Chairman of the Federal Reserve has been widely discussed (the main point of controversy remains the lowering of the Federal funds rate to 1% for more than a year, which, according to Austrian theorists, injected huge amounts of "easy" credit-based money into the financial system and created an unsustainable economic boom), there is also the argument that Greenspan's actions in the years 2002–2004 were actually motivated by the need to take the U.S. economy out of the early 2000s recession caused by the bursting of the dot-com bubble—although by doing so he did not help avert the crisis, but only postpone it.
_	The fact that this space "M" is not normal can be established by the following counting argument (which is very similar to the argument that the Sorgenfrey plane is not normal):
_	The government raised the argument that the disparaging provision of the Lanham Act should be reviewed under intermediate scrutiny by way of the "Central Hudson" test, because the inherent nature of trademarks are commercial.
_	In fact, it led to the boycott by all members of parliament and senate from house sittings with the argument that they did not recognise President Uhuru Kenyatta as a legally elected president.
_	Cui, realizing this, began to see Li Maozhen as an enemy and began to ally with Zhu, particularly since Li Maozhen was also displeased at Cui's attempt to have the chancellors take over the Shence Army under the argument that doing so would curb the warlords' power.
_	Some scholars have argued for the rejection of the world religions paradigm altogether; Cotter and Robertson presented the argument that "the continued uncritical use of the WRP fosters a breeding ground for relativistic navel-gazing which has no place in the contemporary research university".
_	The book starts with the argument that objective considerations of economic necessity, along with the nature of current technological limitations, should lead us to a series of connected and inescapable conclusions.
_	While this supports the argument that payers of capital gains taxes have more "ability to pay,"
_	On appeal to the Texas Court of Criminal Appeals, Pointer's attorney repeated the argument that Phillips' non-appearance deprived Pointer of his right to confront and cross-examine witnesses against him, as guaranteed by the Sixth Amendment.
_	In July of the same year, the tribe attempted to sue the Army Corps of Engineers with the argument that it would harm the area's water supply.
_	First, the Court rejected the argument that the Act was an unconstitutional bill of attainder.
_	But in support of the argument that Titus Genucus Augurinus, the consul of 451, was a plebeian, it has been noted that several other consuls in the decades preceding the decemvirate bore names that in later times were regarded as plebeian.
_	A key element of their approach was the argument that macroeconomics had to be dynamic and based on how individuals and institutions interact in markets and on how they make decisions under uncertainty.
_	However; Many organizations such as the [[American Academy of Pediatrics]] disagree with the argument that the vaccine increases sexual activity among teens.
_	They said there is no validity in the argument that same-sex marriage would threaten opposite-sex marriage because a gender-neutral marriage would have no greater impact on society than the current law and argued it was simply a matter of principle and equality.
_	To the argument that "a colored citizen would not be an agreeable member of society," McLean responded, "This is more a matter of taste than of law."
_	Later, at a Plinian meeting on 27 March 1827, Browne followed Darwin's presentation of a paper on marine invertebrates and Dr Robert Edmund Grant's exposition on sea-mats by presenting the argument that mind and consciousness were simply aspects of brain activity.
_	The entire Court also rejected the argument that the laws were invalid because the joint sitting had invalidly considered and passed the "Petroleum and Minerals Authority Act 1973."
_	Frederick L. Schodt makes the argument that by the 1980s, Leo the lion could hardly escape the notice of foreign visitors to the city.
_	The Court, speaking through Justice Oliver Wendell Holmes, unanimous rejected the argument that the political question doctrine barred the Court from deciding the case.
_	Adherents of British Israelism cite various scriptures in support of the argument that the "lost" Northern Israelite Tribes migrated through Europe to end up in Britain.
_	Supporters of the series brought forward the argument that Popetown cannot be forbidden, just as the Muhammad cartoons are allowed for reasons of press freedom.
_	And it also tells about the argument that led to Nidung's hamstringing of Wayland, and ultimately to Wayland's revenge:
_	Additionally, the argument that border treaties are voided when federations are dissolved does not appear to have substantial merit and is clearly conflict-prone.
_	In the early 1850s, Rudolf Clausius set forth the concept of the thermodynamic system and posited the argument that in any irreversible process a small amount of heat energy "δQ" is incrementally dissipated across the system boundary.
_	If so, it would imply that the whole painting, foreground and background, is set in Christ's time and would perhaps lend weight to the argument that the maid in the foreground is Martha.
_	Max Blau of "Paste" said, ""No Time for Dreaming" not only prevails as a defining culmination of Bradley's lifelong musicianship to date, but also furthers the argument that Daptone Records can do no wrong."
_	The outlines of the anti-war stance are seen: the argument that the costs of maintaining the present conflict are not worth the gains which can be made, the appeal to end the horrors of war, and the argument that war is being waged for the profit of particular interests.
_	Stephen Thomas Erlewine wrote that the album "feels like a gift: it bolsters the argument that the period following "Pet Sounds" and "Smile" was no less creative than that golden age.
_	In particular, the Court rejected the argument that patent misuse should track antitrust doctrine and insisted that patent misuse is based on patent policy rather than antitrust policy.
_	One review commented that "Peel goes to lengths to put forward the argument that though the seemingly 'constantly cheerful one' may have been responsible for the MOR apocalypse of Wings, experimentation in other genres was never far away."
_	Upon consideration of the evidence, Lord Denning found that the book was a fair dealing of the source material, rejecting the argument that Vosper was criticizing not the works "per se", but was instead criticizing the underlying subject matter.
_	The court rejected the argument that the statute was unconstitutionally vague as a person of "common intelligence" could, indeed, understand the actions prohibited by the statute, specifically the distribution of analogues "substantially similar" to those banned by the Controlled Substances Act.
_	It furthermore rejected the argument that term "substantially similar" as impermissibly vague.
_	The proposal made the argument that the restoration of the café would benefit the cultural environment of Barcelona, which was of great importance after the oppression the land of Catalonia had suffered under Franco.
_	In an 1841 Illinois Supreme Court case, "Bailey v. Cromwell", Lincoln successfully prevented the sale of a woman who was alleged to be a slave, making the argument that in Illinois "the presumption of law was ... that every person was free, without regard to color."
_	Thornhill and Palmer proposed that rape should be understood through evolutionary psychology, and criticized the argument that rape is not sexually motivated.
_	He maintained that the Contract Clause gave the federal legislature the exclusive power over bankruptcy laws, rejecting the argument that state laws became part of contracts signed within the state thereafter.
_	The civil authorities assume that the men can rule themselves, and that the castle despots will not needlessly kill the men under their rule, because of the valuable stud fees the men command (a clear allegory to the argument that slaves were too valuable to mistreat during the slavery era in the USA).
_	Senior players Steve Staunton and Niall Quinn seemed to take the side of McCarthy, and the FAI, in the argument that followed.
_	Finally, there is the argument that by not incorporating women into combat, the American government is failing to tap into another source of soldiers for military combat operations.
_	Mill attacks the argument that women are naturally worse at some things than men and should, therefore, be discouraged or forbidden from doing them.
_	With three dreadnoughts planned (including the upcoming ), a Spanish naval journal stated "it was only natural that rumors [would begin] to circulate supporting the argument that Brazil acted as an intermediary for some great power which would acquire them before they terminate their construction."
_	Adélaïde, however, accepted it with the argument that her brother would do anything to prevent the country he loved from anarchy.
_	Mearsheimer challenges these claims by making the argument that it is rather difficult to estimate when states have reached a satisfactory amount of power short of hegemony and costly to rely extensively on balancing as an efficient power-checking method due to collective action issues.
_	The authors also give the argument that each of the works could be erotic ("Danaë"), moral ("Lot and His Daughters"), and distinctly devotional ("Danaë") .
_	The split was due to the difficulties of operating in the Republic, and the unpopularity of the argument that Ireland should enter World War II in the Republic, as opposed to its popularity in Northern Ireland.
_	The major tenets of the theory include how bureaucrats can manipulate policy when creating bureaucratic agencies and the argument that delay built into the bureaucracy is a good thing, because delay gives government a chance to perfect a policy over time.
_	Williams also makes the argument that the true proof of whether or not an individual owns something is whether or not they have the right to sell it.
_	Citing "Mitchell v. Harmony," the Court endorsed "the argument that without judicial review, the boundaries setting apart real emergencies will break down.
_	He opposed a 1969 proposal to lower the voting age from 21 to 19 because he feared a leftist trend in younger voters and didn't "buy the argument that if they are old enough to fight in Vietnam they are old enough to vote."
_	This non-discrimination clause is one basis for the legal challenges under the argument that while the President was given broad powers in 1952, such powers were eventually limited in 1965.
_	Aaron is amazed when Onofrio refuses to pay with the argument that his creditor being a Jew is a murderer of Jesus.
_	They used the argument that Article 10 of the Treaty of 1866 with the Cherokee Nation stated,
_	South Australia had intervened in the case, and the Solicitor-General for South Australia made the argument that section 41 of the Australian Constitution allows for differences between the states as to who has suffrage.
_	In 1857 he denounced the argument that southern Christians
_	Heidegger presents the argument that even though these Greek ideas work with techniques of handicraftsmen, they are essentially outdated with modern machine powered technology as they are based on modern physics.
_	The idea of open data is centred around the argument that data should be freely available and should not have restrictions that would prohibit its use, such as copyright laws.
_	But, Stephen refused to accept the argument that the CPR owed its existence to the government.
_	Typically, mandatory retirement is justified by the argument that certain occupations are either too dangerous (military personnel) or require high levels of physical and mental skill (air traffic controllers, airline pilots).
_	In 2014, U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry claimed that the Assad government has tactically avoided ISIS forces in order to weaken "moderate opposition" such as the Free Syrian Army, as well as "purposely ceding some territory to them [ISIS] in order to make them more of a problem so he can make the argument that he is somehow the protector against them".
_	Draper makes the argument that this division echoes the division between "reformist or revolutionary, peaceful or violent, democratic or authoritarian, etc." and identifies elitism as being one of the six major varieties of "socialism-from-above".
_	Charter's lawsuit also hinges on the argument that their right to "speak" as a corporation is being violated, however, Charter's lawyers did not specifically reference any infringement by the local government.
_	This supports the argument that consumer preferences can point in the direction of an extension of shop opening hours in a given area without this need arising in another area.
_	After Bridget's reunion with Nick in May 2009, "Daily News" writer Carolyn Hinsey said, "One could make the argument that Bridget could use a little self-respect, too, for hooking up with Nick ... again."
_	The court confiscated his cigarette lighter with the argument that he clearly was not able to handle it.
_	Lastly, Lamer rejects the argument that the federal government is precluded from regulating labour relations on the grounds that the provincial government has been exercising jurisdiction for a long period of time.
_	Judge Peter Kelly said he believed there was force in the argument that O'Reilly and his investment companies are insolvent.
_	In the "Abrams" case, however, Holmes dissented, rejecting the argument that the defendants' leaflets posed the "clear and present danger" that was true of the defendants in "Schenck".
_	Their research is consistent with the argument that democratic peace advocates economic interdependence and a joint need to attain membership in IGOs in order to prevent the incidence of conflict.
_	Others have made the argument that while there is no corollary to the Triborough Amendment under the National Labor Relations Act, which governs private sector workers, those workers may strike at impasse.
_	The choice of gauge was influenced by the argument that costs varied with the cube of the gauge.
_	It has been alleged that the argument that night was due to Scarborough having been good friends with Outlaw, who had been killed on that same date two years earlier by Selman.
_	While the bankruptcy proceedings were still ongoing, McDonald personally filed a lawsuit in the United States District Court for the District of Nevada under 42 U.S.C. § 1981 on the argument that Domino's broke its contracts with JWM because of racial animus towards McDonald.
_	Subsequent rulings in respect of personal current accounts suggest that the argument that these charges are penalties for breach of contract is weak, and given the Office of Fair Trading's ruling it seems unlikely that any further test case will take place.
_	The applicant also raised the argument that the purported amendments to art 149 of the Constitution were contrary to the supreme law of the Constitution and were not valid amendments.
_	Their demand to be allowed to teach Greek in their schools has been rejected by the State with the argument that they are Muslims.
_	In response to the argument that homoeroticism was edited out, some traditionalists who subscribe to the Documentary Hypothesis note the significance of the lack of censoring of the descriptions at issue, in spite of the Levitical injunctions against homoerotic contact.
_	The merchants were of the argument that the country had no rights to impose taxes.
_	There is also the argument that the famine was significantly worsened by the actions of the kulaks, a class of peasants who had become wealthy after the Stolypin reform, many of whom burned their crops and killed their livestock rather than give their lands and livestock over to collectivization.
_	West Indies Cricket Board fielded a full-strength team under the argument that none of the West Indies players had refused to play, but disputes arose in the matter of payment and about the selection of certain players.
_	Among justifications used for not printing everything believers’ wrote included the argument that believers would not print atheist material in their publications, that by doing so it would help disseminate religious propaganda and also because believers wrote things that bordered on criticism of the state.
_	The term "speciesism", and the argument that it is simply a prejudice, first appeared in 1970 in a privately printed pamphlet written by British psychologist Richard D. Ryder.
_	A very wide range of interpretations are in play ranging from the argument that foreign aid has been a primary driver of development, to a complete waste of money.
_	The Supreme Court rejected the argument that the exclusive ways to protect these plants are under the Plant Variety Protection Act (PVPA), 7 U.S.C. § 2321, and the Plant Patent Act of 1930 (PPA), 35 U.S.C. §§ 161-164.
_	The judge thereby denied the defense's motion for a venue change and refuted the argument that pre-trial publicity, alleged anti-police sentiment, and prior police-involved shootings might prevent the defendant from getting a fair trial.
_	She supported the argument that the death penalty would have deterrent value, as within five years of its abolition the national murder rate had more than doubled.
_	Ueda “based his interpretation on the argument that the term ‘koo’ [howang] appearing in the inscription denotes a ruler in vassalage to the Paekche king and that the inscription is written in the commanding tone of a superior addressing an inferior, exemplified by the sentence reading ‘Hand down [this sword] to [your] posterity."
_	Lord Goff also summarily dismissed the argument that this was a case of "ministerial receipt" where Mr and Mrs Goss received the money as agents for an undisclosed principal (Mr Haddon).
_	Many courts of appeals, and the United States Supreme Court in the "A.B. Dick case" adopted its "inherency doctrine"—"the argument that, since the patentee may withhold his patent altogether from public use, he must logically and necessarily be permitted to impose any conditions which he chooses upon any use which he may allow of it."
_	Against the argument that women willingly choose FGM for their daughters, UNICEF calls the practice a "self-enforcing social convention" to which families feel they must conform to avoid uncut daughters facing social exclusion.
_	The negativity toward the treaty was largely based on the argument that article 6 of the treaty threatens the sovereign power of Japan.
_	The "Ron's Org Committee" (ROC) and the "True Source Scientology Foundation" (STSS, "Stichting True Source Scientology") have documented the argument that Scientology materials written by L. Ron Hubbard are in the public domain if certain assumptions are made.
_	Nor did he accept the argument that Chinese cared little for morality or the individual, since the philosophies of Daoism and Buddhism did so, and Chinese family values were exemplary.
_	Nachmanides rejected the argument that the offerings were meant to eliminate the foreigners' foolish ideas, for the sacrifices would not have that effect, as the foreigners' intention was to worship the constellations of the sheep and the ox, and if Jews slaughtered sheep and oxen to God, it would show respect and honor to those constellations.
_	David M. Glantz disputes the argument that the Red Army was deployed in an offensive stance in 1941.
_	The book also examines the manner in which the real world is represented in science fiction allegory, such as the argument that the aliens of "Star Trek" represent non-Caucasian humans, and that science fiction provides an insight into the strategies of the American military.
_	Studies like the 2011 Learning Gains study by Arum and Roksa, on the other hand, reported that only 55% of students had any learning gains during their first two years of college, which favors the argument that investing in higher education may not still be worth it.
_	Conditioned taste aversion illustrates the argument that in classical conditioning, a response is elicited.
_	Q's existence follows from the argument that neither Matthew nor Luke is directly dependent on the other in the "double tradition" (defined by New Testament scholars as material that Matthew and Luke share that does not appear in Mark).
_	The Polish government advocated in 2012 that it would only be wise for Poland to join the eurozone once the euro crisis had ended, based on the argument that delaying their accession would minimise the risk for Poland to become one of the net financial creditors to other eurozone countries in financial difficulties.
_	On the final step of analysis the court rejected the argument that the exclusion was discriminatory.
_	This point underlines the fact that the argument that realism is incompatible with quantum mechanics and locality depends on a particular formalization of the concept of realism.
_	Later in his book "Capitalism and Freedom" (1962), Friedman developed the argument that economic freedom, while itself an extremely important component of total freedom, is also a necessary condition for political freedom.
_	Analyzes images and texts to make the argument that pregnancy, in Western culture, is viewed and depicted with profound ambivalence by both feminists and non-feminists.
_	Many economic studies have seriously questioned the assumptions underlying the argument that resale royalties have net benefits to artists.
_	Bart Ehrman aligns himself with the century old view of Albert Schweitzer that Jesus expected an apocalypse during his own generation, and he bases some of his views on the argument that the earliest gospel sources (for which he assumes Markan priority) present Jesus as far more apocalyptic than other Christian sources produced towards the end of the 1st century, contending that the apocalyptic messages were progressively toned down.
_	The essential thrust of Lakoff's work has been the argument that metaphors are a primarily conceptual construction and are in fact central to the development of thought.
_	The name "Tasman parakeet" is used by Christidis and Boles on the argument that this species and the Lord Howe red-crowned parakeet ("Cyanoramphus novaezelandiae subflavescens") are probably a single species for which they use biogeographical arguments.
_	The second step in the argument that gives to motivate an analysis of Welsh word order in which the underlying structure of the clause is SVO and the verb has moved to a higher position in the clause is to observe that the verb appears in a higher position than the subject.
_	Sidney employs forensic rhetoric as a tool to make the argument that poetry not only conveys a separate reality, but that it has a long and venerable history, and it does not lie.
_	In addition, Thompson refers to the argument that the burden of proof of copyright for such publicity images would fall on the studios producing them:
_	You can make the argument that I look like a heel.
_	Chang got sufficiently angry over the argument that he submitted an accusation against Cui, stating that Cui had frivolously changed the proper regulation of the rites and requesting that Cui be demoted to be the prefect of Chao Prefecture (潮州, in modern Chaozhou, Guangdong).
_	Some scholars make the argument that some of the attitudes that are described as victim blaming and the victimologies that are said to counteract them are both extreme and similar to each other, an example of the horseshoe theory.
_	She convinced her grandson to adopt his cousin, her grandson Alexander, and declare him caesar, with the argument that it would leave more time for Elagabalus to devote himself to religious matters.
_	In response to the argument that Title III provides no explicit provision for disclosures under the present facts, the court noted that "[Title III] does not prohibit all that it does not permit".
_	He focused especially on making the argument that smart growth is a better fiscal deal for taxpayers than sprawl, which often requires costly taxpayer subsidies.
_	An example of such criticism is the argument that the mathematical models of optimal foraging theory do not offer insight that goes beyond the common-sense conclusions of evolution and other basic principles of ecology.
_	One of his main contributions has been the argument that social capital serves as the critical engine for post-disaster recovery and that these ties are more important than factors such as damage from the event, wealth, or investment in physical infrastructure.
_	In point of fact, there is some historical evidence [Dilthey's influence on Weber re: the former's theory of "Weltanschauung", and Husserl's influence on Dilthey re: the former's theory of meaning] that would support the argument that elements of Weberian sociology are themselves based on certain phenomenological themes; especially in regard to the theory of the intended meaning of an act, and ideas regarding theory and concept formation.
_	Starting from the argument that a historical universal scientific method does not exist, Feyerabend argues that science does not deserve its privileged status in western society.
_	Ben Kiernan makes the argument that it was indeed a genocide and disagrees with the three scholars, by bringing forth examples from the history of the Cham people in Cambodia.
_	On the argument that it could not consider an equivalent of interest he noted that ‘a denial of the court’s power to award the equivalent of interest would come close to straining at a gnat.’
_	Chapter one makes the argument that history teachers need to free themselves from the history textbooks and go more in depth with specific issues in history.
_	It was clear that the population of South Lancashire would continue to increase; it was absurd for counsel for the TDA to object to this as an unwarranted assumption upon which the argument that Manchester would need more water in the foreseeable future rested.
_	In restraint of cases the argument that the incidence and content of the onus have to be reformed with reference to the section 22 right to occupational freedom has been less successful.
_	Based on the argument that the Japanese surrender did not formally transfer sovereignty, Taiwan was still legally part of Japan and occupied by the United States (with administrative authority for the occupation delegated to the Chinese Nationalists), and a direct intervention was appropriate for a territory with such status.
_	Harold Zellner explains this apparent paradox as an integral part of the argument that Sappho makes that the most beautiful is the one that one loves: the apparent contradiction between Helen being the most beautiful, and Helen finding Paris the most beautiful, can be resolved if we agree with Sappho's definition of beauty.
_	Using the characters of Clarissa and Rezia, she makes the argument that people can only interpret Septimus' shell shock according to their cultural norms.
_	O'Connor rejected the argument that condoms distributed to gay men are not contraceptives.
_	No defendant or claimant in such an action had ever persuaded a court to entertain the argument that the First Amendment's guarantees of free speech and free expression barred them.
_	This attack on character, especially one pointing out promiscuity, makes the argument that women who lead “high risk" lifestyles (promiscuity, drug use) are not real victims of rape.
_	The Texas legislature even considered enacting contradictory legislature that prevented these searches at the airport under the argument that it violated the Fourth Amendment, Administrative Procedures Act,Privacy Act, and Religious Freedom Restoration Act.
_	At the intersection of these fields, social heuristics have been applied to explain cooperation in the prisoner's dilemma, based on the argument that cooperation is typically advantageous in daily life, and therefore people develop a cooperation heuristic that gets applied even to one-shot anonymous interactions (the so-called "social heuristics hypothesis" of human cooperation).
_	The court rejected the argument that the Town of Purcellville had authority to decide whether new public facilities, such as the high school, could locate in this unincorporated area of the county.
_	This debate stems from a number of factors but typically involves the argument that the issues are part of the game and require no changes or external programs to take advantage of them.
_	The eccentric nineteenth-century critic F. G. Fleay originated the argument that the play that was published as "The Brothers" in 1653 is a revision of an otherwise-unknown play by Shirley titled "The Politic Father," which was licensed by the Master of the Revels on 26 May 1641.
_	Galkovsky makes the argument that the Russian language is inherently highly amorphous, and that Russian culture is better adapted to faith (which is associated with "silence") than to reason ("logos" or "speech").
_	In 2007, political analyst Andrey Piontkovsky said that "Serbia needs to stand up for the partition of Kosovo with the argument that there are no international forces that can keep Kosovo Serbs safe in an independent Kosovo."
_	Such images support the argument that the figure of a "tin man" was in use as political allegory in the 1890s.
_	However, the case falls apart when Arya was found to be drinking, thus building the argument that her memory is unreliable.
_	The book makes the argument that certain specific themes and motifs remain present throughout Seagal's filmography, laying the groundwork for an examination of the films using the auteur theory.
_	Even so, Colin M. Turnbull makes the argument that pygmies are responsible for this art.
_	In his publication in "Pakistan and the Gulf Economist", Haider put forth the argument that the sea water on the Baloch coast was pollution free due to the lack of human presence and activity.
_	Arthur invokes the lineage of Ser Belyne and Sir Bryne, legendary British conquerors of Rome, and through their blood lineage demands tribute from Lucius under the argument that Britain conquered Rome first.
_	Hamilton anticipates and refutes the argument that a unitary executive is too similar to the British monarchy.
_	Nachmanides rejected the argument that the offerings were meant to eliminate the foreigners' foolish ideas, for the sacrifices would not have that effect, as the foreigners' intention was to worship the constellations of the sheep and the ox, and if Jews slaughtered sheep and oxen to God, it would show respect and honor to those constellations.
_	He rejected the argument that NATO could not afford a conventional counterweight to Warsaw Pact forces.
_	Bernard Bailyn and Gordon Wood pioneered the argument that the Founding Fathers of the United States were more influenced by republicanism than they were by liberalism.
_	During the argument that occurred when deciding which to use, opponents of Franklin's invention accused supporters of being American allies rather than being British, and the debate eventually led to the resignation of the society's president, Sir John Pringle.
_	By 1904, the FLT was actively working with Partido Union and Romero Rosa – having published the pro-suffrage, anti-authority, anti-capitalist and anti-colonialism work "La cuestión y Puerto Rico" – won a seat as a delegate on the argument that workers could use their numbers to change these things.
_	The abbot of another temple from the Dhammakaya Movement, Luang Por Sermchai of Wat Luang Por Sodh Dhammakayaram, made the argument that it was primarily scholars rather than Buddhist meditation practitioners that hold the view of absolute non-self.
_	This repeal affects even those races not affected by the Court’s opinion, with the argument that Maine voters would be confused by a mix of RCV and non-RCV choices on a ballot.
_	Likewise, he rejected the argument that placing an officer near the door of the bus constituted a seizure, because the officer "did nothing to intimidate passengers" and "left the aisle clear".
_	Nonetheless, there is evidence to support the argument that predictable election results—where one vote is not seen to be able to make a difference—have resulted in lower turnouts, such as Bill Clinton's 1996 re-election (which featured the lowest voter turnout in the United States since 1924), the United Kingdom general election of 2001, and the 2005 Spanish referendum on the European Constitution; all of these elections produced decisive results on a low turnout.
_	Bill, 1995 was constitutional, and decisively rejected the argument that natural law supersede positive law in the Constitution of Ireland.
_	She, as well as Elisabeth Lloyd, have criticized Masters and Johnson for uncritically incorporating cultural attitudes on sexual behavior into their research; for example, the argument that enough clitoral stimulation to achieve orgasm should be provided by thrusting during intercourse, and the inference that the failure of this is a sign of female "sexual dysfunction."
_	Some published sources advance the argument that the leaders of the conspiracy to eliminate Ben Youssef were Bourguiba himself, his wife Wassila Ben Ammar, Mohamed Masmoudi, Hassen Belkhodja, Taïeb Mhiri and Béchir Zarg Layoun.
_	Jakob Keller, in an apologetical work on behalf of limited justifications for tyrannicide, treated Bodin as a serious opponent on the argument that subjects can only resist a tyrant passively, with views on the Empire that were offensive.
_	Later in the year, Wang considered reacting by destroying a dam to flood Jingnan, but at Mao's urging, under the argument that there would be too many civilian casualties, he did not do so.
_	In response to this male criticism, she composes "Admiraçión operum Dey", making the argument that if God created men who could write, he could just as well have created women who could write, and while men have been writing for centuries, it does not make it any more natural for them to write but rather it seems natural because men have been writing for such a long time.
_	Andrews rejected the argument that the federal government had acquired Indian lands by treaty out of a legal requirement to do so:
_	Brennan's dissent focused on the argument that evidence in the legislative record indicates the United States Congress did not intend living organisms to be patented.
_	Some critics have commented that by "ghettoizing" science fiction, Gernsback in fact did harm to its literary growth, but this viewpoint has been countered by the argument that science fiction needed an independent market to develop in to reach its potential.
_	Bobbio thought that the argument that the spectrum had disappeared occurred when either the Left or Right were weak.
_	John P. Meier states that there is no historical or archaeological evidence to support the argument that a scribe may have introduced the passage into the text.
_	Staff encouraged LKPR to present a support list to Parliament to silence the argument that women did not ask to vote themselves, and in 1913, the LKPR could present a list of 360,000 names of women who supported women's suffrage.
_	Google won the case unanimously based on the argument that they were not showing people the full texts but instead snippets, and they are not allowing people to illegally read the book.
_	He has claimed to be an atheist raising the argument that one can't be both Christian and Greek.
_	In Thomas Hobbes' "Leviathan" the argument that the fear of God also committed the state as an inferior power, was borrowed from a theological tradition which was also very common in Christian Patristic and its reception of the Tanakh.
_	A common theme in defending speciesism is the argument that humans have the right to exploit other species to defend their own.
_	He justified this to his employer with the argument that the information he would collect on African cultures would help him in his planned journey to west Africa.
_	In the case "Native Women's Association of Canada v. Canada" (1994), the Court considered and rejected the argument that section 28 could reinforce section 2 of the Charter (freedom of expression) so that a women's interest group could receive equal benefits as other Aboriginal interest groups in constitutional negotiations, as the other groups had received government money to discuss their concerns.
_	Although Adam Smith and traditional thought hold that geography and transportation are the culprits for keeping LLDCs from realizing development gains, Faye, Sachs and Snow hold the argument that no matter the advancement of infrastructure or lack of geographic distance to a port, landlocked nations are still dependent on their neighbouring transit nations.
_	He opposed allowing Jewish refugees into Canada prior to World War II on the argument that they constituted a communist invasion force, and once dismissed the charge of anti-Semitism against him as a "communist smokescreen".
_	Some scholars make the argument that it could have been Godwin, Earl of Wessex, who was traveling with Alfred and Edward as their protector in passage.
_	The objections centred on the argument that the area had stronger links, including transport services, to Guildford than to Farnham and Godalming.
_	It was held that the 1911 Act clearly permits the procedures specified in the Parliament Acts to be used for "any Public Bill", and this was sufficient to dispose of the argument that the 1911 Act could not be used to amend itself.
_	The pro-Israel advocacy group StandWithUs rebuffed the argument that Israel's admission to the UN was conditional upon acceptance of relevant UN Resolutions, including Resolution 194, claiming that "like every other nation admitted to the UN, Israel was admitted on the basis of Article 4 of the Charter".
_	She uses the argument that a woman's choice to leave and provide remittances for her family initiates a role reversal for the family as a whole, in addition to a new gender category.
_	The primary challenges to the Act were based on the argument that it went beyond the powers granted to the federal government in the US Constitution and that it involved coercion of the states in contravention of the Tenth Amendment, which called for a surrender by the states of powers essential to their quasi-sovereign existence.
_	He disagreed with the argument that Ventura was a UDT and not a SEAL, by stating "try telling that to a WWII UDT veteran who swam ashore before the landing craft on D-Day."
_	A ceramic cylinder was recovered from the nearby San Andrés La Venta site that dates to around 650 BCE that brings evidence to the argument that a writing system existed at this site.
_	It was rumoured at Davos 2014 the same month that Carney had been expressing a wish for the cap of £600,000 for phase two reduced by at least a third, partly to undercut the argument that Help to Buy was a major factor behind soaring prices in London.
_	The circuit court rejected the argument that the copying was qualitatively significant on the basis that PROLOK and RAMKEY "serve opposing functions."
_	The book is a collection of autobiographical sketches, polemics, and fictional vignettes, loosely centered around the argument that American society had strayed from the ideals enshrined in the Constitution, creating a corrupt aristocracy and dangerous levels of wealth inequality.
_	Several Muslim writers, like Afzal-ur-Rahman and David Benjamin Keldani, raised the argument that Psalm 110:1 is also a prophecy of Muhammad and his ascension to the Throne of God during the journey of al-Isra and al-Miraj.
_	Public comment sometimes include the argument that women-only cars are a step too far in protecting women.
_	In response to the indictment, LaMacchia brought a motion to dismiss on September 30, 1994, under the argument that the government was misapplying the wire fraud statute and attempting to use it as a copyright enforcement tool.
_	Since American law does not allow civil lawsuits against "acts of war", Speer and Morris relied on the argument that Omar throwing a grenade was an act of terrorism, rather than war.
_	However, at the beginning of the first debate of the report on a series controversial amendments to the Constitution prepared by the Assembly, Bucaram announced his resignation under the argument that he was against the ultimately-approved changes promoted by the majority block of País Alliance.
_	He states, “they are permitted antiquity while denied history” Wilmsen continues the argument that anthropologists’ goal is to study hunter-gatherer groups who have lived on their own for centuries, which builds a stereotype for hunter-gatherers.
_	Among the arguments raised by Irwin Schiff in various court cases are the argument that no tax assessment can be made unless a tax return has been voluntarily filed; the argument that the Internal Revenue Service, in enforcing the income tax, seeks to impose a tax not authorized by the taxing clauses of the United States Constitution; and the argument (still displayed, as of early 2007, on Schiff's internet web site) that "[f]or tax purposes, 'income' only means corporate 'profit.'
_	Rainville relied on the argument that a fuel pump used to service American MedEvac helicopters had been stolen deliberately to hinder the military effort, while critics pointed out that any saboteurs likely would have ignited the thousands of gallons of fuel surrounding it.
_	It was a radical shift in the basis of the argument that was to be followed through by theorists engaged in the debate on de facto government.
_	The organization announced that it will appeal this judgement, based on the argument that it was due to a couple of precise episodes beyond its control that did not cause any environmental or personal harm.
_	The film makes the argument that strike action could be justified by the poor conditions in which Belgian workers lived.
_	He has rejected the argument that voting for the Greens will elect Conservative candidates through vote-splitting, arguing that his party takes support from across the traditional political spectrum.
_	Several historians counter the argument that reparations caused the inflation and collapse of the mark.
_	After the 2006 midterm Congressional elections, Congress has pushed to begin withdrawing troops from Iraq, in part based on the argument that Iraq is a distraction, as opposed to a part of, the war on terror.
_	It is of some historical interest to point out that van der Waals, in his Nobel prize lecture, gave credit to Laplace for the argument that pressure is reduced proportional to the square of the density.
_	The court rejected the argument that the treatments to which Pitcherskaia had been subjected did not constitute persecution because they had been intended to help her, not harm her, and stated "human rights laws cannot be sidestepped by simply couching actions that torture mentally or physically in benevolent terms such as 'curing' or 'treating' the victims".
_	Additionally, Justice Scalia rejected the argument that the denial of the visa application implicated a fundamental liberty interest.
_	In this Memo he also concluded "the argument that resolution 1441 alone has revived the authorisation to use force in resolution 678 will only be sustainable if there are strong factual grounds for concluding that Iraq has failed to take the final opportunity.
_	With the prosecution case largely consisting of the argument that it was impossible for Alexander Cronkhite to have shot himself by accident, given the angle of the shot and the distance of the gun from his body when it was fired, their central claim collapsed when a friend of Alexander Cronkhite's, Eugene M. Caffey, and a second officer each demonstrated in court that an accidental shooting that fit the circumstances was not only possible, but that it was simple to recreate a plausible series of events which could have resulted in Alexander Cronkhite pulling the trigger by mistake.
_	When he returned he made the argument that the ban could not be overturned administratively but rather required a revelation from God.
_	For instance, many ERGs provided aid Hurricane Katrina victims, which leads to the argument that ERGs are expanding to also affect the world community.
_	On the other hand, David Zabecki affirms the argument that the battle "was a tactical Danish victory", while noting the lifting of the blockade.
_	The Foundation said that the Appeals Court "rejected the argument that general budget appropriations may be used by executive officials to endorse religion."
_	In a 1995 speech before the National Press Club, Lieberman said, "this business of deciding by group, the argument that some make that some groups are genetically less able than others.
_	Even among supporters of simplification, some make the argument that Classical Chinese texts should not be printed in simplified Chinese because of the complexities involved in the use of "tongjia" (通假) or phonetic loan characters.
_	An argument linked to the meaning of the words "includes" and "including" is the argument that for Federal income tax purposes, the term "employee" under Internal Revenue Code section 3401(c) does not include a regular, private-sector employee.
_	However, state and federal judges rejected the argument that since 1908 Virginia had executed 45 black men for raping white women, yet had executed no white man convicted of rape, so several clients were executed.
_	Nergal made the argument that he has artistic license to enhance his live performances by doing such an action, and suggested that it was not meant to be offensive.
_	This definition is developed out of the argument that the individual is in constant conflict in the world: at once attempting to assert the self as individual and establish difference, but at same time to gain acceptance by others.
_	The FRM employs the argument that being a biological father is different from being a social father because a biological father is simply the individual who makes a genetic contribution, while a social father is one who engages in all of their children’s activities (p. 727)
_	By the late 17th century, when Tillemont wrote his "Histoire des Empereurs", it was no longer possible to make the argument that Philip was a Christian "ſans difficulté", "without difficulty".
_	Firstly, it presents a theory that science changes due to an accumulation of observations and improvement in experimental techniques and methodology; secondly, it puts forward the argument that the popularity of science in 17th-century England and the religious demography of the Royal Society (English scientists of that time were predominantly Puritans or other Protestants) can be explained by a correlation between Protestantism and the scientific values.
_	The criminalisation of incitement is justified with the argument that incitement constitutes an attempt at conspiracy; the inciter's objective is to persuade others to engage in criminal acts, with his knowledge and cooperation, and as such is "more dangerous than a direct attempt, because it may give rise to that cooperation among criminals which is a special hazard".
_	The authors explain how technology has shifted the balance of power from companies to consumers and make the argument that the only way to succeed in this ever-changing landscape is to create superior products and attract a new breed of multifaceted employees, dubbed "smart creatives".
_	In 2011, Safari conducted various statistical and econometrics tests to check the argument that sukuk securities are merely the same as conventional bond.
_	Today, Iranian languages are still spoken in southern regions of the Caspian Sea (also called the Caspian languages), including Gilaki, Sangsari, Mazanderani, Tati, Semnani, and Talysh, and they are grammatically and lexically very close to Zaza; this supports the argument that Zazas emigrated from the southern regions of the Caspian Sea reaching eastern Anatolia.
_	King's friend and colleague, James Bevel, also disputed the argument that Ray acted alone, stating, "There is no way a ten-cent white boy could develop a plan to kill a million-dollar black man."
_	DPA presents the argument that all drugs are different and pose different risks.
_	Though his father had determined the everlasting succession of the firstborn prince in 1506, his younger brother Louis refused a spiritual career with the argument that he was born before the edict became valid.
_	This claim focuses on what conservatives, such as David Horowitz, say is discrimination against those who hold a conservative ideology and the argument that research has been corrupted by a desire to promote a progressive agenda.
_	A small number of cases in the United Kingdom and Australia were dismissed under the argument that a system's copy protection mechanism would not be able to prevent the actual infringement of copyright—the actual process of copying game media—and therefore cannot be considered an effective technical protection measure protected by anti-circumvention laws.
_	Denturists have campaigned for the right to practice independently in many states, with the argument that they can provide greater access and lower-cost prosthetic services.
_	Publishing several articles in the 1960s, the sociologist Seabury Colum Gilfillan advanced the argument that lead poisoning was a significant factor in the decline of the Roman Empire.
_	With the argument that he was tired of the corruption, Calderón abolished the AFI agency created in May 2009 and created an entirely new police force.
_	Paul L. Maier, former Professor of Ancient History at Western Michigan University and current professor emeritus in the Department of History there has stated "Anyone who uses the argument that Jesus never existed is simply flaunting his ignorance."
_	With regard to the argument that MySpace partially created Julie and Solis's posted content, the court ruled that Plaintiffs were barred from making this argument on appeal because they had not raised the issue earlier to the District Court.
_	The 1959 book "The Lore and Language of Schoolchildren" was meant to counter the argument that mass media and the entertainment industry had ruined childhood traditions.
_	In considering over-inclusiveness, he considered the argument that the "net cast by the legislature" would include a person whom the provision was not intended to catch, such as a Singapore citizen who is a foreign permanent resident, employed in the foreign country by the foreign government, receiving a bribe paid in foreign currency by a foreign payor.
_	In addition, Napoleonic toys started appearing in Great Britain right after Great Britain and Napoleonic France had renewed a declaration of war against each other, thus supporting the argument that Napoleonic toys were meant to be patriotic lampoons of an enemy.
_	Weininger rejected the demand of the women's rights activists for an active and passive female voting right with the argument that "children, mentally defectives and criminals" are also given no say in politics.
_	The League adopted the argument that no one segment of any mandate's population was entitled to favourable treatment over another, and the terms under which the mandate had been granted made no provision for special obligation towards whites.
_	This contradicts the argument that an intelligent designer is required for the most complex systems.
_	Pinker argues that while children can use syntax to learn certain semantic properties within a single frame, like the number of arguments a verb takes or the types of arguments such as agent and patient, there are serious problems with the argument that children pick up on these semantic properties from the syntax when a verb is found in a wide range of syntactic frames.
_	Much of the initial defence was based on the argument that they should be treated as prisoners of war as they were not paid mercenaries but "bona fide" soldiers of a legal government – Bose's "Arzi Hukumat-e-Azad Hind".
_	To those who see the tradition as constantly evolving and supplying answers to question that it itself has raised, the argument that there would be no reason to develop and transmit material which seems derogatory of the Prophet or of Islam is too simple.
_	Studies have sought to explore how children of interracial adoption are affected in these varying categories in an effort to counter the argument that transracial adoptions can have confusing and conflicting effects on a child's view of self-identity.
_	The defense moved for a new trial, based on Cox's having "misquoted and misinterpreted biblical authority in the argument that Jesus would punish one who harms a child with the death penalty and thus violated Crawford's right to a fair trial."
_	In a concession to Roosevelt, a "cash-and-carry" provision that had been devised by his advisor Bernard Baruch was added: the President could permit the sale of materials and supplies to belligerents in Europe as long as the recipients arranged for the transport and paid immediately with cash, with the argument that this would not draw the U.S. into the conflict.
_	Certainly from the prosecutors perspective the use of a dog in court may facilitate the proceedings but the defense attorney could make the argument that "There could be a feeling among jurors that the dog is assuring truth, as well as allowing the child to speak, and that is not necessarily the case."
_	This is often combined with the argument that if the brain had fixed views and the arguments were mere after-constructs with no causal effect on the conclusions, science would have been impossible and the use of arguments would have been a meaningless waste of energy with no persuasive effect on brains with fixed views.
_	In his book Language and Politics, Noam Chomsky makes the argument that language is used to shape the way in which political events and people are seen and remembered.
_	The backlash that they warned about did ensue, and was based on the argument that whites' immigrant descendants did not receive the benefits that were given to African Americans in the Civil Rights Act.
_	Researchers Jay F. Kirkpatrick and Patricia M. Fazio have publicly advanced the argument that free-roaming horses should be legally classified as "wild" rather than "feral" asserting that, due to the presence of "Equus ferus" on the North American continent until the end of the Pleistocene era, horses were once a native species and that "the two key elements for defining an animal as a native species are where it originated and whether or not it coevolved with its habitat."
_	Further to this, there are several criticisms for the mathematical modelling attempts of binocular rivalry from a quantum mechanical point of view, revolving around the argument that the mixed state should be considered as a separate entity in the modelling, and not as transitional between two dominant states.
_	This is the argument that technological civilizations may usually or invariably destroy themselves before or shortly after developing radio or spaceflight technology.
_	In "Boggs v. Commissioner", a penalty of $8,000 was imposed by the United States Court of Appeals for the Sixth Circuit on the taxpayers for filing a frivolous appeal using the argument that a portion of a wage amount was not taxable as a return on "human capital."
_	Rackin cites the same quote, "Antony/ Shall be brought drunken forth, and I shall see/ Some squeaking Cleopatra boy my greatness/ I'th' posture of a whore" to make the argument that here the audience is reminded of the very same treatment Cleopatra is receiving on Shakespeare's stage (since she is being portrayed by a boy actor) (V.ii.214–217).
_	Kisevalter apparently "never accepted the case for a mole in the CIA or the argument that Nosenko was planted by the KGB".
_	And in 2011, Fowler and Christakis published a follow-up paper on "Correlated Genotypes in Friendship Networks" in PNAS, advancing the argument that humans may be "metagenomic" with respect to the people around them.
_	In court, 9Live defended itself with the argument that a phone call does not cost more than sending a postcard to advertisement-financed lotteries of magazines and TV shows, which themselves are considered a "Gewinnspiel".
_	By contrast, the Court has accepted the relevance of the argument that a prohibition on television advertising deprived a trader of the only effective form of promotion which would have enabled it to penetrate a national market (see "De Agostini and TV-Shop", paragraph 43).
_	Holmes and Brandeis dissented in several more cases in this decade, however, advancing the argument that the Free Speech Clause protected a far greater range of political speech than the Court had previously acknowledged.
_	The first step in the argument that makes for an underlying SVO analysis of Welsh word order is to argue that the subject moves out of the verb phrase to a position higher in the clause.
_	It also provided the argument that the entire family would be responsible in supporting each other in the case of a rebellion against a ruler.
_	Justice O'Connor began with the argument that rather than allowing the Constitution to dictate what elements of crimes are, the Court usually deferred to the legislature's definition of the elements that constitute a crime.
_	Firestone singled out pregnancy and childbirth, making the argument that an artificial womb would free "women from the tyranny of their reproductive biology".
_	When scaled in the opposite direction, Hughes-Jones makes the argument that "social groups that fight each other are self‐sustaining, self‐replicating wholes containing interdependent parts" indicating that the group as a whole can have self-preservation with the individuals acting as the cells.
_	While admitting none of the defendants were involved in the bombing, the prosecution made the argument that Lingg had built the bomb and two prosecution witnesses (Harry Gilmer and Malvern Thompson) tried to imply the bomb thrower was helped by Spies, Fischer and Schwab.
_	It was initially decided to proceed with option 2, but farmers and landowners in the area of Nestelbach placed "inter alia" with the argument that "the locomotives would burn their fields" and obtained a change to option
_	Yassine used the argument that Islamic-Arab identity of Morocco is tied intrinsically to qu'ranic Arabic and therefore argued against the introduction of Amazigh to Morocco's education system.
_	Mohamad Ariff rejected the argument that "day to day" could permit "round the clock" interrogation, stating that this would "offend the legislative purpose" of the law, and violate the fundamental liberties of the person as guaranteed by Article 5 of the Constitution, citing the recent case of "Lee Kwan Woh v. Public Prosecutor", where the Federal Court held that constitutional liberties must be read in the "widest sense" possible.
_	In response to the argument that a cell phone has a much larger storage capacity than any item that Diaz could have carried on his person, the Court asserted that there was no evidence that Diaz's phone had a significant storage capacity.
_	However, the Court rejected the argument that these interests were sufficient grounds for criminal sanctions on nonparticipants in proceedings.
_	They instead concentrated on the argument that it was not necessary to believe in God in order to behave in moral fashion.
_	He acknowledged the argument that "everyone will be immortal" should follow if a survivor outcome is possible for all life-threatening events.
_	The Israeli Supreme Court, however, has rejected the argument that Khdeir's murder should be treated equally to that of the slain settlers.
_	He also criticised the argument that Georgia was legally bound by agreements not to use force, because the mission failed to discuss their validity if broken by either the South Ossetians or by Russia.
_	Butler's The International Jew presented the argument that "Hitler's policy was a Jewish policy".
_	Mio said of the rationale that only the most qualified actors are cast, "That's the argument that directors and casting directors make, but a lot of times ethnic actors will tell us that when they say we're just choosing the best actor, they mean we're choosing our friends, or people we're used to."
_	Far-right themes in Nazism include the argument that superior people have a right to dominate other people and purge society of supposed inferior elements.
_	According to Natasha Du Rose, Wilson (1993) makes the argument that women’s crime and drug use are rising to match men’s because of women’s emancipation.
_	Although the court accepted the argument that the 1974 constitution, under which she had been charged, was null and void, it also said the provisions of the 1975 security law, under which she has been kept under house arrest, remained in force.
_	In the phrase's broader application, applying to the entire post World War II era, the phrase refers to the argument that the possession of nuclear arms by several of the world's larger powers has tended to act to prevent the outbreak of full-scale warfare between any of these several powers, also due to the probability of MAD.
_	Churchill did not consider the argument that the alternative to appeasement was a premature war that Germany would win in 1938.
_	It made the argument that the writ allowed the judge only to ask for an explanation of why the prisoner was jailed known as the 'return'), not to debate whether that explanation was justified or to examine the facts of it ('controvert' it), which was the role of the jury.
_	In "People v. Black", the California Supreme Court rejected the argument that under "Blakely", the jury must find the additional facts necessary for the judge to impose the high term under the DSL.
_	Numerous ridings in and around St. John's remained more competitive than provincewide polling suggested, and some voters appeared to be swayed in the final days by the argument that even if they were inclined to support the Liberals, the province's democratic process would not be well-served by giving one party a clean sweep of the legislature with no opposition party to challenge them.
_	Some tax protesters cite a case called "Conner v. United States", with a quotation that "Congress has taxed income, not compensation" for the argument that wages are not taxable.
_	The concept of intelligent design involves the argument that an intelligent cause is responsible for the complexity of life and that one can detect that cause empirically.
_	Similarly, the United States Court of Appeals for the Tenth Circuit has rejected the argument that "the Internal Revenue Code has not been enacted into 'positive law'".
_	Henry George is best known for popularizing the argument that government should be funded by a tax on land rent rather than taxes on labor.
_	1804: A house-slave named Jeremiah goes on trial for running away, and his attorney presents the argument that, with the existence of sims, there is no need for human beings to enslave other human beings.
_	Set in a bedroom, the two lead characters make the argument that the only moral system that reinforces the recent political revolution is libertinism, and that if the people of France fail to adopt the libertine philosophy, France will be destined to return to a monarchic state.
_	Continually throughout the work, Sade makes the argument that one must embrace atheism, reject society's beliefs about pleasure and pain, and further makes his argument that if any crime is committed while seeking pleasure, it cannot be condemned.
_	The authors claim this study is the first experimental evidence to support the argument that nociceptive sensitisation is actually an adaptive response to injuries.
_	First, he suggested, the argument that haplodiploid inheritance (as in the Hymenoptera) creates a strong selection pressure towards nonreproductive castes is mathematically flawed.
_	There are several ways of deriving the formula—for example, the argument that it is wrong to blame people for things that they cannot control (essentially phrasing the formula as the contrapositive "'cannot' implies 'has no duty to'").
_	In 1980, a speculative and widely-debated paper entitled "Feeling and Thinking: Preferences Need No Inferences," invited in honor of his receipt of the 1979 Distinguished Scientific Contribution Award from the American Psychological Association, made the argument that affective and cognitive systems are largely independent, and that affect is more powerful and comes first.
_	The petition is based on the argument that the evidence supports the pardoning of Boyd based on his actual innocence of the Exodus shootings.
_	Without taking the argument that far, it is evident that in a market system with uneven distribution of empowering work, such as Economic Democracy, some workers will be more able than others to capture the benefits of economic gain.
_	In 2017, the Department of Justice filed an amicus brief in the 2nd U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals making the argument that Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 does not prohibit discrimination against employees who are gay or bisexual.
_	Atrocities such as the bombing of Guernica also undermined the argument that the Nationalists were the more morally correct side.
_	Criminal law lawyer Alicia Ozores explained to the newspaper "La Vanguardia" that some abusers tried to take refuge under the argument that "they were addicted to sex", this in order to reduce a sentence and cleanse their image because sex addiction is a recognized disorder.
_	This claim has been disputed with the argument that Pluto's escape velocity is too high for this to happen.
_	Regarding the argument that the Jews had waived their rights, Iacobucci noted it was still not certain whether constitutional rights can be waived.
_	The Supreme Court held that such prosecutions were not barred by the First Amendment, expressly rejecting the argument that a "specific intent" to assist terrorist acts was required, rejecting also the claim of the dissenting justices that the case was governed by the concurrence in "Whitney," or by the standard stated in "Brandenburg".
_	Deely, however, notably in "Basics of Semiotics", laid down the argument that the action of signs extends even further than life, and that semiosis as an influence of the future played a role in the shaping of the physical universe prior to the advent of life, a role for which Deely coined the term "physiosemiosis".
_	The rejection of Anicetus' position on the Quartodeciman, by Polycarp and later Polycrates' letter to Pope Victor I has been used by Orthodox theologians as proof against the argument that the Churches in Asia Minor accepted papal primacy or the teaching of papal supremacy.
_	A critique of this hypothesis included the argument that, whereas sweating sickness was thought to be transmitted from human to human, hantaviruses are rarely spread in this way.
_	The essay rejected the argument that it is “futile and unnecessary” to distinguish among the various types of companies in the “financial services industry.
_	Descartes takes the first and starts with the argument that the Self is the primary reality, self-consciousness the primary fact of existence, and introspection the start of the real philosophical process.
_	The Tree symbolically connects Christianity with Druidic belief, and makes the argument that Christianity is a continuation of previous customs.
_	But recently, the argument that auditing should go beyond just true and fair is gaining momentum.
_	Tobacco use in the Middle East can be dated back to the sixteenth century, however, there is some evidence and some scholars support the argument that tobacco products were used in Egypt as far back as the time of the Pharaohs.
_	Soon Beatty called back saying that he wanted to use the existing vintage Mercury recording of Foggy Mountain Breakdown, and rejected the argument that it was recorded 18 years prior at a radio station with no modern enhancements.
_	According to the defenders of the new calendar, the argument that the 25 December (N.S.) observance of Christmas is a purely "secular" observance and is therefore an unsuitable time for Orthodox Christians to celebrate Christ's Nativity, is plainly inaccurate, since the observances of Christ's birth among western Christians (and today, among many Orthodox Christians) obviously occur overwhelmingly in places of worship and involve hymns, prayers, scripture readings, religious dramas, liturgical concerts, and the like.
_	Regarding the Civil Code, the Court considered the argument that since the Code deals with fetuses as "juridical" persons, fetuses must legally be human beings.
_	In the 2008 publication "Knowledge of God" Plantinga presented a formulation of the argument that solely focused on semantic epiphenomenalism instead of the former four jointly exhaustive categories.
_	During the argument that followed, Stauffer emptied his glass of water at Weiss.
_	In November 2012, Juan Pedro Schaerer, head of the International Committee of the Red Cross′s (ICRC) delegation for Israel and the Occupied Territories issued a statement on behalf of ICRC "in its role as guardian of international humanitarian law" in response to the Levy Report's "misrepresentation" of a "commentary published by the International Committee of the Red Cross on the Fourth Geneva Convention," which the Levy Report "uses to support the argument that the Israeli settlement project does not entail a breach of international humanitarian law".
_	Richard Moon has developed the argument that the value of freedom of speech and freedom of expression lies with social interactions.
_	This is one of the argument that is often used as proof that Veldeke wrote for the imperial entourage.
_	The Court rejected the argument that the Act invaded Richard Nixon’s right of privacy, as there would be limited intrusion through the screening of his documents, the public has a legitimate reason to want to know more about the President’s historical documents (as he is a public figure), and the impossibility of separating the small amount of private materials without first thoroughly screening all of his documents.
_	Crow rejected the argument that Scargill was responsible for the defeats of the miners and the union movement more generally.
_	For example, against the argument that persons are insignificant specks of dust in the vast universe, Bowne would say that it is impossible for the entire universe to exist apart from a person to experience it.
_	In "You Duly Have My Permission", she reframed the argument that technology lowers sexual inhibitions as a benefit, not a danger.
_	Regan, furious over the situation, gets into an argument with Gena, who insists they confess everything to Becky, and it is revealed in the argument that Gena had an abortion.
_	From an economic perspective, the regional government aims to achieve a high degree of fiscal autonomy (based on the argument that the region pays in more to the national Spanish coffers than it receives, thus overlooking the "solidarity between regions" enshrined by the Spanish Constitution of 1978).
_	It was published through David McKay Publications and makes the argument that the American Revolutionary War should be seen primarily as an international world war between the European great powers.
_	The defense submitted a video as evidence that supports the argument that Mineo had a pre-existing medical condition.
_	In parliament, Menzies emphasised the argument that "our alliances made demands on us".
_	In their book "Freakonomics", authors Steven Levitt and Stephen J. Dubner make the argument that children that are born after their mothers are refused an abortion are much more likely to commit crimes or refuse to recognize authority when they reach adulthood.
_	The filmmakers, however, are not the first or the only ones to hold the argument that the polarizing approach of both sides made the tragedy inevitable.
_	The Court addressed the argument that the search of Arnold's laptop was carried out in a particularly offensive manner, and was so destructive that it required particularized suspicion.
_	The fact that the term 'Enlightenment' was first used in 1894 in English to refer to a historical period (see Schmidt 2003) lends support to the argument that it was a late construction projected back onto the 18th century.
_	Also, the new trees planted are not as big as the trees that were cut down, and the argument that there will be "more trees" is not compelling to forestry advocates when they are counting saplings.
_	In considering the rationale for prohibiting inferences from silence, they rejected the argument that it is unfair to place the accused in a position where he will suffer adverse consequences whatever his election, on the basis that hard choices were unavoidable in the adversarial process.
_	On Christmas Eve 1992, the argument that follows after he discovers Blair's deception, Asa has a heart attack and Blair leaves him on the floor to die (He is soon discovered by his ex-wife Renee Divine (Patricia Elliott) and recovers).
_	The main thesis throughout the lectures was the argument that it has been the cultural norm for societies to be composed of different ethnic groups.
_	Firstly, it presents a theory that science changes due to an accumulation of observations and improvement in experimental techniques and methodology; secondly, it puts forward the argument that the popularity of science in 17th-century England and the religious demography of the Royal Society (English scientists of that time were predominantly Puritans or other Protestants) can be explained by a correlation between Protestantism and the scientific values.
_	He was more impressed with the difficulties about where to draw the line if the claim was allowed to proceed than the argument that there would be a "chilling effect" on the availability of witnesses, wondering what the impact would be for experts involved in criminal proceedings or family cases involving children.
_	Based on the argument that people have a limited amount of time to spend on the consumption of different media, Displacement theory argue that the viewership or readership of one particular outlet leads to the reduction in the amount of time spent by the individual on another.
_	The third strand was scientific racism, based on the argument that races have fixed characteristics, and the Jews have highly negative characteristics.
_	It wasn’t until Millard Meiss made the argument that the works attributed to both "The master of the Ovile Madonna" and "Ugolino Lorenzetti" might actually be by the same artist, Bulgarini.
_	No evidence was produced to support the argument that it was a planned riot.
_	He rejected assertions by the university that government had a compelling interest in boosting the number of minority doctors, and deemed too nebulous the argument that the special admissions program would help bring doctors to underserved parts of California—after all, that purpose would also be served by admitting white applicants interested in practicing in minority communities.
_	The successes of such systems naturally give rise to the argument that these systems have captured the natural meaning of connectives like if-then far better than an ordinary, truth-functional logic ever could.
_	It seems to be valid, the argument that Vetrego comes from "Vetus Vicus" (Old Village).
_	In "On Truth", Frankfurt develops the argument that individuals should care about the truth, regardless of whether they intend to be truthful.
_	Herman first articulated the argument that Lord Baltimore’s charter was only good for lands that had not been previously settled, and that the short-lived, 1631 Swanendael settlement(usually spelled Zwaanendael), at present day Lewes, Delaware, gave the Dutch prior rights to the whole Delaware River watershed.
_	However, the argument that 'the music industry is meaner' fell apart this week.
_	On the argument that verses of Ali's rule had been removed, Al-Khoei states that the collection of the Quran by Abu Bakr, Umar, and Uthman occurred significantly after the caliphate was decided and so if Ali's rule had been mentioned it would have been the strongest argument for him to be the first caliph.
_	The merchants were of the argument that the country had no rights to impose taxes.
_	In "Night, an Epistle to Robert Lloyd" (also published this year), be answered the attacks made on him, offering by way of defence the argument that any faults were better than hypocrisy.
_	This image is rejected by one of the theoreticians of the party, Tibor Rabóczkay, in the book "Rethinking the Brazilian Green Party", with the argument that the going round and round between legends is so common in the big parties, as in the small ones.
_	Independent observers claimed that his military experience would help in the election by countering the argument that Democrats are "soft on terrorism"; however, this was not a large enough aid in the election.
_	A New York Times report in 2012 cited Rapaport among a list of other major industry players like Edahn Golan and companies like IDEX who are countering the argument that diamonds have too many characteristic differences to be traded in a standardized commodity market.
_	In 2000, a tribunal in Potsdam canceled the pension with the argument that a war criminal should not be granted a pension.
_	J equally rejected the argument that the prayer was sufficiently universal as to encompass all religions, since the prayer was still religious in nature, which violates the principle of neutrality.
_	J also dismissed the argument that the preamble to the "Constitution Act, 1867", which acknowledges that "Canada is founded upon principles that recognize the supremacy of God", had bearing on the issue.
_	The Court then turned to the argument that the 1926 "General Electric" decision saved the arrangement from the antitrust laws.
_	The French archaeologist Jean-Pierre Mohen in his book "" has written that British Isles megalithism are "outstanding in the abundance of standing stones, and the variety of circular architectural complexes of which they formed a part ... strikingly original, they have no equivalent elsewhere in Europe – strongly supporting the argument that the builders were independent."
_	This corresponds to the argument that we will have to find a way to resolve the trade-off between criteria (typically based on the preferences of a decision maker) when a solution that performs well in all criteria does not exist.
_	Suspected offenders have used the so-called "fantasy defense," the argument that they were only expressing fantasies and not plans of future behavior, to defend actions such as online communication.
_	The book attempts to cut a middle path between two poles of the public debate about global development: on one side, the argument that current approaches to poverty reduction could be successful if simply given more funding; on the other, the argument that present efforts are fundamentally flawed.
_	It found that the state's policy did not serve such an "overriding public interest", rejecting the argument that same-sex marriages would do harm by weakening the link between marriage and child rearing and finding no administrative or pragmatic difficulty with extending the rights of marriage to same-sex couples.
_	It also dismissed the argument that legal recognition of same-sex marriage would not conform to the practices of other states, pointing out that Vermont already allowed for certain marriage contracts not recognized by other states, including first-cousin marriages, and that such concerns had not prevented the passage of similarly distinctive laws allowing same-sex couples to adopt.
_	Land was in the spotlight in late 2009 when he tried the case "Rhodes v. Macdonald", in which Army physician Connie Rhodes attempted to secure a restraining order against her being deployed to Iraq on the argument that President Barack Obama was not born in the United States and was ineligible to serve as President.
_	Against the argument that several parts of Song's paper is appeared to overlap Dr. Park's proceeding in 2002, Dr. Park said that the proceeding is conventionally not considered as an 'official' paper, so citing the proceeding paper is not a requirement nor an offence against academic integrity or research ethics.
_	ILSR attempted to stop the creation of more than a dozen proposed incinerators with the argument that they were expensive and destroyed valuable materials that could be recycled and reused.
_	A 1980 exhibition at the Victoria and Albert Museum advanced the argument that "everything we know as 'Hollywood' traces to Wilfred Buckland."
_	Hall coined the term polychronicity and in subsequent works developed the argument that polychronicity is a measure of a culture's preference toward engaging in several activities at a time.
_	While social status matters, a balance of factors like amenities, safe areas, well maintained housing factor, turning the tide in favour of the argument that richer neighbours are happier neighbours.
_	Although Gladstone was sympathetic to the argument that better education had helped the Prussians to their unexpected victory over Austria in 1866 (as he remarked, "Undoubtedly, the conduct of the campaign, on the German side, has given a marked triumph to the cause of systematic popular education"), he was a devout Anglican and did not want to see the existing Church of England schools absorbed into any kind of National Education system.
_	By 1999, the Stanislaus County superior court had rejected Diablo Grande's second environmental impact report with the argument that it had failed to properly protect the surrounding environment and there was no answer to where water would come from due to the area not containing adequate on-site water.
_	Early scholarship held that the Athenians were responsible for its creation, on the argument that the quality of material and execution did not equal the other known buildings of Hadrian in Athens, and on the assumption that an emperor who loved
_	The article garnered substantial support online, although a number of people also disputed the article, making the argument that education involved more than just academic learning.
_	Even a well-prepared mind guesses oftener wrong than right, but our guesses succeed better than random luck at reaching the truth or at least advancing the inquiry, and that indicates to Peirce that they are based in instinctive attunement to nature, an affinity between the mind's processes and the processes of the real, which would account for why appealingly "natural" guesses are the ones that oftenest (or least seldom) succeed; to which Peirce added the argument that such guesses are to be preferred since, without "a natural bent like nature's", people would have no hope of understanding nature.
_	Richard Frye makes the argument that Khosrow's rationale behind his numerous wars with the Byzantine empire as well as the eastern Hephthalites was to establish the Sasanian dominance on this trade route.
_	The technocentric approach argues that sustainability can be attained through a variety of strategies, from the view that state-led modification of the industrial system like conservation-oriented farming systems should be implemented, to the argument that biotechnology is the best way to meet the increasing demand for food.
_	As such, it rejects the argument that the economic calculation problem is a barrier to such a society.
_	Less publicised controversies included the argument that the monarch was addressed as "Your Grace" in the pre-union Kingdom of Scotland (the monarchs of Renaissance England had been called both "Your Grace" and "Your Majesty") and that the standard title had been "King/Queen of Scots" ("rex/regina scotorum") rather than "of Scotland" ("rex/regina scotiae").
_	He reveals the flaws within the epic and presents the argument that the epic instilled a spirit of national romanticism within the Finnish society, which makes it so significant to the Finnish culture.
_	Rice responds to these allegations: "I just don't buy the argument that we weren't shaking the trees enough and that something was gonna to fall out that gave us somehow that little piece of information that would have led to connecting all of those dots."
_	However when Associated Newspapers wanted to launch their Metro in Manchester, Guardian Media Group (GMG) also decided to launch a freesheet daily paper in the city under the Metro name, with the argument that GMG's "Manchester Metro News" had been established in the region for many years.
_	Drawing upon Hannah Arendt and Theodor Adorno's books on totalitarianism and the Enlightenment, Bauman developed the argument that the Holocaust should not simply be considered to be an event in Jewish history, nor a regression to pre-modern barbarism.
_	Heidi Fjeld has put forth the argument that pre-1950s Tibetan society was functionally a caste system, in contrast to previous scholars who defined the Tibetan social class system as similar to European feudal serfdom, as well as non-scholarly western accounts which seek to romanticize a supposedly 'egalitarian' ancient Tibetan society.
_	Evans's detractors presented evidence and witnesses at the trial to press the argument that Evans did not truly invent much of what his patents protected.
_	Although the Israeli Supreme Court recognized that East Jerusalem had become an integral part of the State of Israel, it rejected in 1969 the argument that the imposition by Israel of its laws and administration on East Jerusalem was equivalent to annexation.
_	However, the reviewers also noted most of it having a role in gameplay and the argument that the text-based graphics forces players to use their own imagination, making it more engaging.
_	Against the argument that public policy should restrict the events allowing for crystallisation, Hoffmann J held that in his view it was not "open to the courts to restrict the contractual freedom of parties to a floating charge on such grounds."
_	Many advocates for education reform discount tracking based on the argument that a rigorous, quality education should be provided universally through public schools.
_	A common criticism of broken policing is the argument that it criminalizes the poor and homeless.
_	They tried to form the argument that this arrest was a breach of the Fourth Amendment of the United States Constitution.
_	The appeal decision accepted the argument that the key distinction was the location of the files, with this section applying only when the material is stored on equipment controlled by the OSP.
_	This hypothesis is based entirely on the argument that the Levonii of Ptolemy are the Swedes proper and therefore the east of them must be Finland.
_	Moynihan's report made the argument that the relative absence of nuclear families (those having both a married father and mother present) in Black America would greatly hinder further Black socio-economic progress.
_	Additionally, critics also brought up the argument that metaphoric thinking about diseases hasn't stopped research about disease from taking place and that humans deal with the reality of their lives through the help of metaphors.
_	But other scholars point out that there are records of women in pre-Islamic Mecca owning businesses, working as single women, and inheriting property, bringing into question the argument that Islam represented a clear advancement in the rights of women.
_	From this, Schumpeter extrapolated the argument that just as rent is the price paid for the use of what he called "unwrought stock, or the "natural agents" of [economic] production", interest is the price paid for "wrought stock—the "produced" means of production".
_	It is controversial because of the argument that it encourages people to commit rape.
_	It should be stressed that these field experiments used additives other than EM (effective microorganisms), leaving the results open to the argument that the more varied composition of EM could make such additives more effective than the three additives tested.
_	In particular, he developed the argument that forms the basis of analysis of traffic equilibrium, and has since become known as Wardrop's Principle:
_	This again supported the argument that the muscles had two different mechanisms by which they could respond to the same compound.
_	The judgements came from Walsh J., Budd J. and (dissenting) Fitzgerald J. Walsh J. disagreed with the High Court judge's interpretation of Article 5 in the Constitution to support the argument that the State enjoyed immunity, with the implicit understanding that the State is above the law.
_	With the argument that in elections the population should vote for the political parties rather than according to their ethnic allegiance, before the next elections in 1979 the originally single electoral district of Carinthia was divided into four constituencies.
_	On the argument that Protagoras was generous and assuming the debt initially, essentially teaching for free without pay all the while, Euathlus stated he was so disenchanted by the education he received -- or lack thereof -- he too knew that he would be in debt if learning the law was too frustrating or being a career attorney did not reap financial rewards, a matter of opportunity cost when he could have pursued some other profession, which was also a financial risk on Euathlus's part compared to other professions for a young man that paid a living wage outright.
_	This reasoning was obviously overthrown by the assertion that the mind contained within itself the standard of truth and falsehood; it was also attacked more generally by the argument that all such reasoning refutes itself, since it proceeds upon principles assumed to be true, and then concludes that there can be no certain ground for any assumption at all.
_	In an unpublished section, he withheld a frank passage of confession about his team writer where he contradicts the argument that Conrad "chose to live on terms of intimacy with a parasitic person", stating that such an accusation was as damaging to himself as it was to Conrad.
_	The "Merchants' Loan" argument has been litigated by tax protesters several times, and the courts have uniformly rejected the argument that income consists only of corporate profits.
_	The rejection of Bishop Anicetus' position on the Quartodeciman by Polycarp, and later Polycrates' letter to Pope Victor I, has been used by Orthodox theologians as proof against the argument that the Churches in Asia Minor accepted the Primacy of the Bishop of Rome and or the teaching of Papal supremacy.
_	Justice John Sopinka, writing for a unanimous Court, simply agreed with the argument that these specific abortion regulations, rather than being a valid provincial regulation of hospitals and medicine, instead constituted an invalid criminal law.
_	In 2004, the Alexis de Tocqueville Institution (ADTI) announced its intent to publish a book, "", showing that the Linux kernel was based on code stolen from Unix, in essence using the argument that it was impossible to believe that Linus Torvalds could produce something as sophisticated as the Linux kernel.
_	Local resident opponents led by a group called Citizens Right to Decide Committee gathered enough signatures to place the referendum (Measure H) on the November 4, 2008, ballot with the argument that "It's Just Too Big."
_	Dr. Grine is a major proponent in the argument that species of robust australopithecine should be given their own genus name, "Paranthropus".
_	From the discourse on this essay emerges the argument that the text contains some captured aspect of Chicago that still applies to the city today."
_	Many scholars have argued in favor of affirmative action on the argument that so-called merit standards for hiring and educational admissions are not race-neutral for a variety of reasons, and that such standards are part of the rhetoric of neutrality through which whites justify their disproportionate share of resources and social benefits.
_	In "Ong Ah Chuan", the Privy Council held that the argument that capital punishment is unconstitutional is foreclosed by Article 9(1) of the Constitution itself because it clearly states that a person can be deprived of his life "in accordance with law".
_	No defendant or claimant in such an action had ever persuaded a court to entertain the argument that the First Amendment's guarantees of free speech and free expression barred them.
_	In the past, for last two decades the State Government of Gujarat had concocted every possible reason to maintain its monopoly on wild Asiatic lions and the tourism revenue generated by them and of recent Gujarat's legal council had put forward the argument that Kuno Wildlife Sanctuary is being used for the introduction of African cheetah which might take several years to fully settle down and repopulate the area and hence reintroduction of lions should only be done after that, this scared the conservationists that Gujarat will use this pretext to delay the reintroduction of native lions by many more decades using the cheetah argument.
_	A study of all Danish children born in 1994–99 found that children born later were more likely to be diagnosed at a younger age, supporting the argument that apparent increases in autism prevalence were at least partly due to decreases in the age of diagnosis.
_	"Eclipse of Reason" represented the argument that the fetus is human, and therefore abortion is murder, a belief in line with the anti-abortion movement.
_	In the case of "Steward Machine Company v. Davis", the Supreme Court rejected the argument that "the relation of employment is one so essential to the pursuit of happiness that it may not be burdened with a tax," and upheld the validity of the Social Security tax.
_	He is responsible for developing the argument that firms have internal decision-making structures through which they act intentionally.
_	They present the argument that the United States has spent billions of dollars on making the country drug-free, but many illicit drugs, such as heroin, cocaine, methamphetamine and many others, are purer and more prevalent than ever before.
_	In an article of his authorship published in the "Jornal do Brasil" newspaper, law professor Ives Gandra Martins cited the words "under God's protection", from the Brazilian Constitution's introduction, as possible justification for the argument that the movement's aim is unconstitutional.
_	In 1936, James S. Allen, a high-ranking official of the CPUSA came to the Philippines to persuade Evangelista's group of accepting even a conditional pardon, under the argument that a United Front must be maintained against world fascism.
_	The Shakespeare authorship question is the argument that someone other than William Shakespeare of Stratford-upon-Avon wrote the works attributed to him.
_	Although Cisco employees allegedly witnessed counterfeited technology as late as September 2005, in a retrospective Cisco's Corporate Counsel noted that "Cisco was portrayed by the Chinese media as a bullying multi-national corporation" and "the damage to Cisco's reputation in China outweighed any benefit achieved through the lawsuit"; however the same article that quoted the remarks of the Corporate Counsel also notes the remarks of Jay Hoenig of Hill and Associates, a security and risk management consultancy, who encouraged foreign companies to take greater advantage of civil litigation and said that it was hard to make the argument that China's civil system was ineffectual if litigants did not pursue all of the legal remedies available to them.
_	Adding to the argument that it was undesirable to strive for a favourable balance of trade, Hume argued that it is, in any case, impossible.
_	Tax protesters also cite or quote from the case of "Truax v. Corrigan" for the argument that an income tax should not be imposed on labor and at least arguably relating "labor" to a right of "property":
_	This is similar to the argument that fire suppression in western United States has allowed ponderosa pine forests to become “overstocked”.
_	Robert D. Putnam, in his book "Bowling Alone" makes the argument that social capital is linked to the recent decline in American political participation.
_	Subsequent to the first trial culminating in a hung jury, Dupree was acquitted at the second, largely because ballistic evidence could not be recovered and Dupree's attorney's made the argument that either Cardillo shot himself or that he was shot by another police officer.
_	Variations of the argument that an individual is not subject to various laws because the individual is "sovereign" have been rejected by the courts, especially in tax cases such as "Johnson v. Commissioner" (Phyllis Johnson's argument—that she was not subject to the federal income tax because she was an "individual sovereign citizen"—was rejected by the court), "Wikoff v. Commissioner" (argument by Austin Wikoff—that he was not subject to the federal income tax because he was an "individual sovereign citizen"—was rejected by the court), "United States v. Hart" (Douglas Hart's argument—in response to a lawsuit against him for filing false lien notices against Internal Revenue Service personnel, that the U.S. District Court had no jurisdiction over him because he was a "sovereign citizen"—was rejected by the District Court and the United States Court of Appeals for the Eighth Circuit), "Young v. Internal Revenue Service" (Jerry Young's argument—that the Internal Revenue Code did not pertain to him because he was a "sovereign citizen"—was rejected by the U.S. District Court), and "Stoecklin v. Commissioner" (Kenneth Stoecklin's argument—that he was a "freeborn and sovereign" person and was therefore not subject to the income tax laws—was rejected by the United States Court of Appeals for the Eleventh Circuit; the court imposed a $3,000 penalty on Stoecklin for filing a frivolous appeal).
_	The control conversation group, however, saw a decrease in words recalled from pre to post test, supporting the argument that it is the actual reminiscing type of therapy that causes the positive cognitive effect, not just any conversation with peers.
_	At a philosophical extreme is the argument that the poem is about artists in North America imaginatively cultivating the reality of the New World with exuberant disregard for old European strictures.
_	The defendants' power to assign precluded the argument that the restrictions would not be enforced oppressively.
_	Kennedy's article presents the argument that there is more evidence suggesting that Kenneth Littleton, the Skakel family's live-in tutor, killed Moxley.
_	This lends to the argument that children were responsible for much of the graffiti.
_	The Seventh Circuit's critique lends credence to the argument that there is a split among U.S. courts as to what role "transformativeness" is to play in any fair use inquiry.
_	The doctrine [of exhaustion] finds its justification in the argument that the holder of the rights who puts into circulation the product produced under the application of the protected procedure has had the opportunity to avail himself of the advantages granted by the patent.
_	The first is volitional objection, which is the argument that the person cannot manage his or her own motives and therefore cannot be punished for them.
_	Another counterargument (to the argument that collocation constrains noncharters' space) is that the cost of renovating existing school space is far lower than the cost of renting, buying, or building fresh real estate.
_	Voting undermines the argument that voting for someone widely believed to have no chance is to throw away one's vote, and thus may increase voter turnout.
_	In his book, Dyer makes the argument that:
_	Countering this is the argument that most of the uses of "yâda‛" denoting sex is in Genesis, (including once for premarital sex: Genesis 38:26), and in verse 8 sex the obvious meaning.
_	Ronald Mann writing in SCOTUSblog noted: "The tenor of the Court came through most clearly when the Court ridiculed what it called Bowman’s 'blame-the-bean defense' – the argument that Bowman did not make new seeds, because it was the seeds themselves that replicated."
_	Soucy also questions the argument that La Rocque's movement was not fascist because it was a form of "patriotic social Christianity", i.e. too nationalistic and too Catholic to be fascist.
_	In 1992, Anne-Marie Casteret published a book "Blood scandal (L'affaire du sang)" which refuted the argument that nobody was aware in 1985 that the heating of blood made the virus inactive.
_	Under its original authors and for many years after they left, Gault Millau never awarded a score of 20 points, under the argument that perfection is beyond the limitations of a normal human being.
_	This depiction is based on the argument that Japan's war-time actions were misunderstood, and that these actions were not intended as acts of aggression, but as acts of self-preservation.
_	Walker, arguing against retroactivity as an "amicus", advanced the argument that, since the source of the ruling was a procedural constitutional provision, "Johnson" should not be held as retroactive.
_	To the argument that the common good requires merchants to have unrestricted access to foreign markets, he made the scathing reply that "the end of every private merchant is not the common good but his particular profit".
_	This line's claim to the Crown is based upon the argument that Edward IV was not the son of "Richard Plantagenet, 3rd Duke of York", and thus had no legitimate claim to the Crown.
_	The idea is based on James Gleick's 1999 book "Faster", which makes the argument that the pace of Western society in general, and American society in particular, has increased and that "a compression of time characterizes the life of the century now closing".
_	The Hindu newspapers from Jalandhar, exhorted the Punjabi Hindus to declare Hindi as their "mother tongue", so that the Punjabi Suba proponents could be deprived of the argument that their demand was solely linguistic.
_	Therefore, they concluded that the argument that Iry-Hor was not a king because his name was never found in a serekh was insufficient.
_	However, the Court rejected the argument that these interests were sufficient grounds for criminal sanctions on nonparticipants in proceedings.
_	Perr countered the argument that 14-year-olds lack experience by saying that the "same argument could be made for many adults, who are automatically given the right to vote when they turn 18."
_	Muses was arrested in March, 1957 in Egypt when he tried to remove a number of very valuable artifacts from Egypt on the argument that he did not realize that a license was required.
_	This is countered with the argument that Marshack overinterprets the data and that the evidence does not support lunar calendars.
_	Dixon CJ disregarded the argument that licensees may not renew their licences and hence not fall within the ambit of the provisions, by stating that the provisions "deal with the distribution of liquor in Victoria as a continuous operation and impose the tax accordingly"; it is immaterial that the tax on the goods is paid at a later date.
_	Supporters of Imperial Federation presented the argument that the two choices for Britain were Imperial unification or Imperial disintegration.
_	The Department of Health and Human Services rejects the argument that laboratory animals' failure to self-administer cannabis is conclusive proof of its low potential for abuse:
_	Praveen Swami, strategic affairs editor of Network18, felt that "There is also the argument that the threat of a cyber attack is deliberately overplayed ... it is far-fetched.
_	Ehrenreich concludes with the argument that all low-wage workers, recipients of government or charitable services like welfare, food, and health care, are not simply living off the generosity of others.
_	So Burning Man is a refutation of the argument that the state has a place in nature."
_	Reginald waits six hours, justifying his inability to keep his promise with the argument that it was extorted under duress.
_	Tejera offers the argument that nothing qualifies the works of Plato as expository tracts.
_	He counters the argument that the immersive environment of video games don't teach the right kind of attention by pointing to the concept of fluid intelligence.
_	Police are not required to conduct a search in a way that gives the individual an opportunity to revoke consent, as determined in "United States v. Rich", where the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit rejected the argument that “officials must conduct all searches in plain view of the suspect, and in a manner slowly enough that he may withdraw or delimit his consent at any time during the search.
_	The film builds the argument that streetcar systems purchased by these companies were deliberately sabotaged through service reductions and fare increases, then replaced with profitable, less convenient, bus systems.
_	However, Sinclair also expressed in the letters in question doubts as to whether Moore deserved to be trusted in the first place, and he did not actually assert the innocence of the two in the novel, focusing instead on the argument that the trial they got was not fair.
_	One site was noted to contain the argument that Saddam Hussein, Adolf Hitler, and Jeffrey Dahmer, were examples of children who were attachment-disordered who "did not get help in time".
_	A 2009 study by University College London, studying data at hospitals built since 1995, supports the argument that private-sector providers are more accountable to provide quality services:
_	The literature started with the argument that female orgasm is a byproduct of shared early male ontogeny, where male orgasm is an adaptation.
_	Rather than seen as a refutation to the hypothesis, instead these discrepancies are often cited in defense of the hypothesis because they counter the argument that the entire tradition is merely a repetition of Papias's original assertion (therefore, if he were wrong, the great many historical sources supporting the theory would be inconsequential).
_	In the lead-up to the invasion, the U.S. and UK emphasized the argument that Saddam Hussein was developing weapons of mass destruction and that he thus presented a threat to his neighbors and to the world community.
_	The consideration of situational factors leads to the argument that some offenders may be considered as ‘situational’, marking them out from other types.
_	In "Intelligent Life in the Universe" (1966) astrophysicists I. S. Shklovski and Carl Sagan devote a chapter to the argument that scientists and historians should seriously consider the possibility that extraterrestrial contact occurred during recorded history; however, Shklovski and Sagan stressed that these ideas were speculative and unproven.
_	"Touched With Fire" presents the argument that bipolar disorder, and affective disorders more generally, may be found in a disproportionate number of people in creative professions such as actors, artists, comedians, musicians, authors, performers and poets.
_	Also deserving consideration is the argument that the acrostic was most fashionable in ninth century poetry and Cynewulf’s own acrostic signature would have followed the trend during this time.
_	The Court dismissed the argument that refugees did not have effective access to the courts to bring a claim.
_	This collection of concert recordings makes the argument that Wayne’s long hiatus served an important artistic purpose, and one that the first two comeback discs did not fully acknowledge.
_	Walt rebuts the argument that it is necessary to go to war over Assad's use of chemical weapons, particularly when other regimes that used chemical weapons in the past were not then punished by the United States.
_	Like other feminist BDSM practitioners, Wakeman rejects the argument that women are taught what they enjoy and led to be submissive by a dominant sexist power structure.
_	Marshall rejected the argument that the Organic Act authorized criminal appellate jurisdiction.
_	This can be argued from a number of ways, all of them being different forms of the argument that we don't have enough statistical power to distinguish the equity premium from zero:
_	With the argument that the cantonal constitution at that time did not explicitly exclude women's voting rights, they went with their demand before the Federal Court.
_	In the 2008 publication "Knowledge of God" Plantinga presented a formulation of the argument that solely focused on semantic epiphenomenalism instead of the former four jointly exhaustive categories.
_	The House of Lords, by a majority, accepted the argument that the solvent employer should not be jointly and severally liable, but only proportionately liable.
_	It was later demonstrated that Oregon drew the highest bowl ratings in college football, calling the argument that TV ratings hurt the Ducks' BCS chances into question.
_	This adds weight to the argument that most prominent features of the buildings decoration are Central Asian.
_	He makes the argument that the comparison to the lucky construction of a watch is fallacious because proponents of evolution do not consider evolution "lucky".
_	Harris also dismissed the argument that Krajnc's actions created a safety risk via possible contamination, finding that the driver had delivered the pigs immediately afterwards with no mention of the incident because he did not think there was a real risk, and that in the past, despite knowing that the pigs had been given water, abattoirs had never refused them.
_	These results strengthen the argument that participants analyze the opponent's emotion to conclude about their limits and carry out their decisions accordingly.
_	In reference to the argument that cameras make witnesses nervous, former jurist Louis Gohmert stated, "I think nervousness is a good thing in a witness.
_	He responded to the argument that cameras may make witnesses more reluctant to testify by saying, "There is a thing called a subpoena," and noting that he "found that if people are not willing to come to court and they are reluctant to testify, officers with handcuffs and guns are very helpful."
_	Hans Lietzmann (1930) countered with the argument that all extant texts could be explained by a 7th-century exposure to, and conversion to, an oriental form of Christianity, taking on such Christian rituals as a Sunday Sabbath.
_	The Transcendental Argument for the Existence of God (TAG) is the argument that attempts to prove the existence of God by arguing that logic, morals, and science ultimately presuppose a supreme being and that God must therefore be the source of logic and morals.
_	Other commentators disagree with the argument that post-dispute arbitration agreements would be rare.
_	As time passed, southern states began to speed up the process by posing the argument that the deal between Georgia and the federal government had no contract and that southern states could pass the law themselves.
_	Criticizing the argument that complex structured investment securitization was instrumental in the mortgage crisis, Paul Krugman points out that the Wall Street firms issuing the securities "kept the riskiest assets on their own books", and that neither of the equally disastrous bubbles in European housing or US commercial property used complex structured securities.
_	Since the word "saulabi" (or something close to that) can not be found in surviving ancient Korean texts nor can be seen in Japanese texts (if the term "saulabi" transformed into "samurai", the transition should be evident in Japanese texts as well, but they are not), the argument that the word "saulabi" transformed into "samurai" seems, at least on a scientific level, very unlikely.
_	The competence of the Council to retract its earlier decision would "possibly" invoke the argument that a given competence to decide on a matter always includes the competence to retract that decision.
_	He said that while he understands the argument that Lexa should have had a heroic death, having such a powerful character die by a stray bullet was more realistic because it signifies that anyone can be in the wrong place at the wrong time.
_	"Quarles v. Oxford Municipal Separate School District", "NAACP v. Georgia", and "Montgomery v. Starkville Municipal Separate School District" each ruled in favor of school districts based on the argument that socioeconomic status was a legitimate reason for tracking.
_	The incident was used to amplify Dan Paul's allegations against Cornwallis and to support the argument that, despite the wording of the Halifax Treaties, the Mi'kmaw never surrendered to the British and that Nova Scotia is unceded Mi'kmaq lands.
_	In September 1889, Alles began circulating a petition to change the name of Fort Street in downtown Los Angeles to Broadway southward between First and Tenth Streets and to North Broadway northward of First Street, At first the petition "received but little encouragement," the "Los Angeles Times" reported, "as Fort Street is one of the oldest landmarks in Los Angeles, and the impression seemed to prevail that the name should not be blotted out," but eventually the argument that "Fort Street" sounded too much like "Fourth Street" prevailed, and the name changes were adopted.
_	In an April 9, 2013 hearing, the NFL's lawyer, Paul Clement, admitted it would be difficult for the NFL to make the argument that an arbitrator should hear the cases of former players who never signed the collective bargaining agreement.
_	The three firemen namely Narcisso (Bayani Agbayani), Elmo (Long Mejia) and Junior (Arnold Reyes) will discover that water will prevent Rona's "hot" temper because of the argument that Rona and Edgar (Jake Cuenca) got into.
_	Accusations that this was a u-turn on the EU treaties, which rule out any bail out of a euro member in order to encourage them to manage their finances better, were countered by the argument that these were loans, not grants, and that neither the EU nor other Member States assumed any liabilities for the debts of the aided countries.
_	He asserted that Lurton's opinion demolished the argument that the patentee was obtaining a practical monopoly of the market for unpatentable staples, previously an ordinary article of commerce:
_	Upon his enlistment as the best (and only) applicant he was more of an irreverend, but sobered up in the course of his duties, such as the AI Petey's funeral, where he used the argument that AI suicidees can not go to Hell because they have no souls to begin with.
_	Independent studies have supported the idea of addressing poverty through mixed-income developments, but the argument that New Urbanism produces such diversity has been challenged from findings from one community in Canada.
_	Though the Court rejected the argument that its previous holdings supported using age in the custody analysis, the Court did not rule against the use of age.
_	Several critics have pointed to grammatical errors in the Early Modern English style of the Book of Mormon and made the argument that because the original MS, the printer's MS, and the first edition of the Book of Mormon appear to have contained hundreds of grammatical errors, the book was therefore fabricated by Smith and not divinely inspired.
_	Bradley Nutting makes the argument that it was the early Golden Age pirates raping and pillaging of several Muslim pilgrims in 1695 that was initially responsible for the flood of legislation in the early eighteenth century.
_	To address the argument that the principle (rather than the details) of representation contained in the Article had not been, nor could have been, repealed by the Peerage Act or any other Act of Parliament, the Government submitted that the election of Scottish representative peers had not been "entrenched."
_	Pao filed an objection to this with the argument that an award against the plaintiff could result in a chilling effect on future discrimination cases.
_	Gorgias authored a lost work known as "On the Non-Existent", which centers on the argument that nothing exists.
_	Thaler has also provided experimental evidence for the argument that initial allocations matter, put forth by Duncan Kennedy (as previously noted), among others.
_	There are modifications to this definition, such as the argument that miscellanies could contain elements that might be considered anthological (the inclusion of classical literary pieces for example) or could be republished years later when their original contents had matured in literary value.
_	Here the speaker uses the argument that "if you only do X, then Y will be true" or "since you love Will, then you will love me because my name is Will".
_	White acknowledged the argument that refusing to recognize such a privilege would undermine the ability of the press to gather news, but wrote that "from the beginning of the country the press has operated without constitutional protection for press informants, and the press has flourished."
_	Milton Friedman's "A Monetary History of the United States", co-written with Anna Schwartz, advances the argument that what made the "great contraction" so severe was not the downturn in the business cycle, protectionism, or the 1929 stock market crash in themselves – but instead, according to Friedman and Schwartz, what plunged the country into a deep depression was the collapse of the banking system during three waves of panics over the 1930–33 period.
_	The book makes the argument that Zionist leaders collaborated with fascism, particularly in Nazi Germany, in order to build up a Jewish presence in Palestine.
_	However, having read a sermon by Richard Watson, the Bishop of Llandaff, which discussed the "Wisdom ... of God, in having made both Rich and Poor", he felt the need to publish, under the argument that "rich" and "poor" were arbitrary divisions, not divinely created ones.
_	Some tax protesters have cited the U.S. Supreme Court case of "Stratton's Independence, Ltd. v. Howbert" for the argument that an income tax on an individual's income is unconstitutional.
_	The book is centered on the argument that in order to bring about change in the Information Age, activists will need to learn how to bypass traditional barriers to mass communication by effectively exploiting newly emerging media such as blogs, podcasts and video hosting services like YouTube.
_	After examining results from longitudinal studies, meta-analysis, animal experiments, human experiments and natural quasi-experiments, Diener and Chan concluded that the evidences overwhelmingly support the argument that high SWB causes better health and longevity (Diener & Chan, 2011).
_	The contractor may feel that it is more advantageous to keep the project incomplete, than by never being paid its retainage and making the argument that the subcontractors are therefore not due their portion of the retainage.
_	Because of the presence of this clause, W.C. Anderson makes the argument that Christianity is adopted by this treaty.
_	"New York Times" columnist Ross Douthat, while "broadly convinced by the argument that our current era of relative peace reflects a longer term trend away from violence, and broadly impressed by the evidence that Pinker marshals to support this view," offered a list of criticisms and concludes Pinker assumes almost all the progress starts with "the Enlightenment, and all that came before was a long medieval dark."
_	Typically, this is either based on the argument that evolution's evidence is full of frauds and hoaxes, that current evidence for evolution is likely to be overturned as some past evidence has been, or that certain types of evidence are inconsistent and dubious.
_	In a sense, the controller assigns its index to PRO, which identifies the argument that is understood as the subject of the subordinate predicate.
_	Their third-place finish in 1987 under Grossman, also a Red Tory, buttressed the argument that the party needed to move to the right.
_	The petition is anchored on the argument that the tax law bill was invalid because there was no quorum when the House of Representatives ratified the joint bicameral conference report on the measure, and there was no voting involved.
_	His analysis strengthens the argument that the duration of schooling (coupled with its quality) and family and social environments affect aspirations and success.
_	The First Quatrain sets out the argument that the Speaker could perform grand external gestures such as the bearing of a ceremonial canopy or the building of some great monument, but that these actions cannot outlast ruination.
_	This verification process has been criticized by some in the gymnastics community, with the argument that countries can manufacture and submit falsified documents for underage athletes.
_	Charles Murray and Richard J. Herrnstein recommend in their book "The Bell Curve" two books on race and intelligence by Audrey Shuey and Frank C. J. McGurk, who were leading members of the IAAEE, in support for the argument that IQ tests are not racially biased.
_	The Clovis first hypothesis which most anthropologists now reject, is the argument that the people associated with the Clovis culture were the first widespread inhabitants of the Americas.
_	The confusion regarding Stalin's position on the issue stems from the fact that, after Lenin's death in 1924, he successfully used Lenin's argument – the argument that socialism's success needs the support of workers of other countries in order to happen – to defeat his competitors within the party by accusing them of betraying Lenin and, therefore, the ideals of the October Revolution.
_	These opinions generally lead to the argument that it is far more effective and beneficial for laws to monitor, limit, and guide healthy drinking habits rather than to outright ban it.
_	Matt's Law prevents unaffiliated fraternities from using the argument that they cannot be punished for hazing, simply because they are not student organizations.
_	There is also the argument that GOTV targets a more affluent demographic, which is already more likely to vote.
_	Research supports the argument that these other general factors improve dramatically into adulthood.
_	In 13 March 2017 Prime Minister Rama communicated the replacement of four ministers, including Mr. Klosi, with the argument that they will be included in the election campaign and make possible the Socialist Party's victory in June 2017 elections.
_	In the event that the Court rejected the argument that Pedra Branca was "terra nullius" in 1847, Singapore contended that the selection of Pedra Branca as the site for Horsburgh Lighthouse and the construction of the lighthouse between 1847 and 1851 constituted a taking of possession of the island "à titre de souverain" (with the title of a sovereign).
_	Furthermore, queer theorists have offered the argument that there is no essential self at all, and that people exist not just as subjects but also as objects of the social world.
_	Parker used the argument that Presley was his only client and he was thus earning only one fee.
_	Some of Dunin-Karwicki's most controversial notions to his contemporaries were about the need to weaken the royal prerogatives, and the argument that landless nobles should have no vote, as they are easily bribed or influenced by wealthy magnates.
_	Leviticus also states that the Israelites were the servants of Yahweh, which classical rabbis took as justification for the manumission of Israelite slaves at the Jubilee, using the argument that no man should have two masters, and thus, as the servants of Yahweh, the Israelites should not also be the servants of men.
_	The reference to the "double" diversion reflects the argument that this first diversion is made possible in large part by the second—the diversion of attention, or distraction, often ironically relying on the widespread but empirically inaccurate belief that environmental harm is economically beneficial to the population as a whole.
_	Ideas like this are used to support the argument that a more progressive, and male inclusive fourth-wave of feminism is in order.
_	Such factors feed the argument that spatial segregation based on ethnicity effects the social fabric of communities.
_	In the 1878 elections, voter unhappiness with these revelations led to Republicans gaining eight U.S. House seats in New York, which undercut the argument that Tilden should be renominated in 1880 because he was the only candidate strong enough to carry the largest state in the Union for the Democrats.
_	Republicans also won the governorship of New York in 1879, further undercutting the argument that Tilden could carry New York in 1880.
_	He has called "the height of asininity" the argument that the use of Latin in the Tridentine Mass is an approach to mystery better than the use of the vernacular language in the modern Mass.
_	Other criticism for hashtag activism includes the argument that online social movements are often started by privileged individuals, rather than by those who the causes are supposed to help.
_	The position is based on the argument that marketing necessarily commits at least one of three wrongs:
_	Graham noted, "Underlying both defenses was the argument that if this judgment was not unconstitutional, then persons who feel they have been defamed can perform an end run around the defenses established in "New York Times v. Sullivan" by suing for a violation of privacy."
_	The feast was interrupted by Eris, goddess of discord, who threw the golden Apple of Discord inscribed "for the most beautiful" into the company, provoking the argument that led to the Judgement of Paris, and ultimately to the Trojan War.
_	This claim has been supported with the argument that the DIY Kindle Scanner simply exploits the analog hole which is applicable to all digital rights management systems.
_	In the "Commentary on a Harmony of Matthew, Mark & Luke", Calvin rejected the argument that Mary had other children due to the mention in Scripture of brothers of Jesus.
_	"Ego Is the Enemy" puts forth the argument that often our biggest problems are not caused by external factors such as other people or circumstances.
_	They would perhaps present the argument that even if a person wished to die, it would be an irrational desire and they should not indulge it.
_	The merchants were of the argument that the country had no rights to impose taxes.
_	Many villagers pose the argument that the damage to the environment would be more than offset by the reduction in damage to the built environment along the High Street, and the cessation of the use of Low Street as a 'rat run' to avoid the traffic lights at the Station Road junction.
_	The CA put forward the argument that only the British government could affect a change in the deteriorating circumstances and the campaign for a bill of rights became the main focus of Association’s work.
_	In his 1991 book, "", Huntington made the argument that beginning with Portugal's revolution during 1974, there has been a third wave of democratization which describes a global trend which includes more than 60 countries throughout Europe, Latin America, Asia, and Africa which have undergone some form of democratic transition.
_	The Court of Appeal rejected the argument that confidential information was unfairly used in Vosper's book.
_	The Forest Service did acknowledge during the argument that an additional 19 tons of sediment would be deposited into streams around the area.
_	Such evidence lends credence to the argument that the doctrine of transubstantiation, as codified by the decrees of the Fourth Lateran and Tridentine councils, did not canonize Aristotelian philosophy as indispensable to Christian doctrine.
_	This combined with a Jacobin tradition of centralizing government, has given weight to the argument that French colonial rule stood in stark contrast to other models.
_	Ironically, those who led the argument that elections should be used to further the republican project in Ireland were subsequently sidelined electorally by a resurgent Sinn Féin, so that in the Assembly elections in 1982, O'Hare and the other People's Democracy candidates fared badly,: their vote largely going to Sinn Féin candidates.
_	Shankara develops the argument that God is not the Brahman, and that "a loving and good God could not have created the universe", a position held by Advaita Vedanta school of Hinduism.
_	Bernard Bailyn and Gordon Wood pioneered the argument that the American founding fathers were more influenced by republicanism than they were by liberalism.
_	Those who lobbied for the reforms made the argument that until then the Canadian civil service has been inefficient largely as a result of patronage.
_	Neistat then proceeds to comically ride his bike in the lane crashing into various obstructions, supporting the argument that lanes aren't the safest at all times and are even sometimes unusable.
_	Arguing that enjoyment can overwhelm disapproval, he rejects the argument that a book cannot be good if it expresses a palpably false view of life and concludes that in spite of its author, "Gulliver's Travels" is a great work of art.
_	In a letter sent to Chester Bowles, Muñoz admitted that the idea behind this strategy was not to actually change the status of Puerto Rico, but instead to disable the argument that Puerto Rico remained a colony, one that was "a weapon freely used by Communists, Fidelistas and enemies of the United States".
_	The reports advances the argument that federal antipoverty programs suffer from defects that “penalize families for getting ahead” and that “the complex web of federal programs and sudden drop-off in benefits create extraordinarily high effective marginal tax rates,” both of which “reduce the incentive to work”.
_	If a fourth party, Dave, (anyone other than Alice, Charles, or Bob) requires Alice to disclose her secret key, she can defend with the argument that she used the key merely for authentication and did not intend to make the message confidential.
_	It rejected the argument that allowing exclusive distributorships protected a distributor’s legitimate interest, by hypothetically preventing competitors (once the costs for initial market penetration had been spent) from free riding on the investment of advertising and marketing initially by the distributor, and then undercutting prices.
_	Conservatives at the state and local levels increasingly emphasized the argument that the soaring crime rates indicated a faiure of liberal policy in the American cities.
_	Both LG and Samsung have since challenged Commerce's findings in the U.S. Court of International Trade, using the argument that the ITC improperly used the zeroing method to calculate dumping margins.
_	Some of his subsequent writings, including "Hind Swaraj", were opposed to the activities of Savarkar and Dhingra, and disputed the argument that violence was innocent if perpetrated under a nationalist identity or while under Colonial victimhood.
_	The court also rejected the argument that Subbulakshmi Jagadeesan and Jagadeesan housed Gundu Santhan in their house in Erode.
_	Proponents of whaling in Japan have made the argument that forcing cultural norms on Japan is the same as Hindus hypothetically attempting to have an international ban on killing cows.
_	In a more unorthodox approach, Maryla Falk has made the argument that in the earliest form of Buddhism, a yogic path existed which involved the acquisition of a "manomayakāya" or "dhammakāya" and an "amatakāya", in which the "manomayakāya" or "dhammakāya" refers to the attainment of the "jhānas", and the "amatakāya" to the attainment of insight and the culmination of the path.
_	In the face of this scepticism I urged Catholics to accept this state and engage in it, among other things with the argument that the state has to rely on their ethical shaping force."
_	Justice Sweet found no evidence which could be considered by a jury in favour of the defendant, and dismissed the argument that the gene should be patented on the basis that it was isolated from the human body, referring to the practice as a 'lawyers trick'.
_	This can be explained by the argument that high levels of homophily may significantly decrease the viability of networks, hence making convexity less frequent in complex networks.
_	The distinction between denotation and connotation can be made in textual analysis and the existence of dictionaries is used to support the argument that the sign system begins with a simple meaning that is then glossed as new usages are developed.
_	When Sudhana protests at the snake's behavior, she makes the argument that than "ēn" (恩, a kind act) is repaid by a feud, and that is the way of the world.
_	Each defendant was separately committed for trial at the Crown Court and separately raised the argument that proceedings could not be brought against them due to the protection of parliamentary privilege.
_	Three lords, including Nicholls, rejected the argument that Pinochet was immune from arrest and prosecution for his acts as Head of State in Chile.
_	The Supreme Court had accepted the argument that the due process clause protected the right to contract seven years earlier, in "Allgeyer v. Louisiana" (1897).
_	Countering the view that the scheme constitutes civil conscription is the argument that the scheme is entered into voluntarily.
_	Since the LRA does not create a duty to bargain, this may give rise to the argument that the Act does not go far enough in protecting and giving content to the constitutional right.
_	Lewis was bothered by inequality in the United States and around the world, and was a strong advocate of the argument that aid to developing nations was a necessary component of American foreign policy, despite the budgetary costs and the potential for misuse, a position reflected in books he wrote and co-authored, including his 1995 book "India’s Political Economy: Governance and Reform" and his 1997 work "The World Bank: Its First Half Century".
_	While Inder goes to ring for the doctor Rupa taunts Sakina about her Aunt and in the argument that follows slaps Sakina.
_	According to the "New York Times", Karch "had staked his career on advancing the argument that the level of drugs found in a cadaver may have no relationship to the levels just before death."
_	A paragraph on "the great hippopotamus test" opens with the Professor, like Huxley, declaring "that apes had hippopotamus majors in their brains just as men have", but then like Owen presenting the argument that "If you have a hippopotamus major in your brain, you are no ape".
_	Hacking draws a sharp distinction between this argument and the argument that all possible worlds coexist in some non-temporal sense.
_	Research is complicated somewhat by the possibility that such differences could be the consequences of stuttering rather than a cause, but recent research on older children confirms structural differences thereby giving strength to the argument that at least some of the differences are not a consequence of stuttering.
_	Sometimes "C. teauteensis" is considered valid, based on the argument that as with many New Zealand birds, it is reasonable to assume that North and South Island populations were at least distinct subspecies, if not species.
_	In "All Saints High School vs. State of Andhra Pradesh", Markandeya strategized the argument that even minority institutions can not be allowed to terminate the services of teachers en masse as such a course would inevitably result in the lowering the standards of excellence, which was accepted by the Supreme Court.
_	Although there is specified time-limit, the Court noted that as time goes on, there will be less justification for the argument that authorization cannot be obtained with reasonable diligence.
_	Sometimes still seen is the alternative spelling "Petromyzoniformes", based on the argument that the type genus is "Petromyzon" and not "Petromyzonta" or similar.
_	Daly based his defense on the argument that the bank had not actually loaned him any money but had simply created credit on its books.
_	Later the amino acid alanine, which is also a protein amino acid, was found to have an excess of the L-configuration, which led several to suspect terrestrial contamination according to the argument that it would be "unusual for an abiotic stereoselective decomposition or synthesis of amino acids to occur with protein amino acids but not with non-protein amino acids."
_	This means that it supports the argument that top predators control the structure and population dynamics of an ecosystem, but it does not take into account that prey species and primary producers also have an effect on the ecosystem’s structure.
_	In 2017, the Department of Justice filed an amicus brief in the 2nd U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals making the argument that Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 does not prohibit discrimination against employees who are gay or bisexual.
_	Justice Alito also rejected the argument that the Court's ruling would "transform every bribe of a public official into a conspiracy to commit extortion" because "[i]n cases where the bribe payor is merely complying with an official demand, the payor lacks the "mens rea" necessary for a conspiracy".
_	In fact, the argument that existed between the proponents of Classical poetry who favored the single-rhyme and meter poem, and those advocated the free verse poem '"shi'r hurr"' remains till this day.
_	Although many other British press services covered Lord Kilbracken's public comments, none of them made the argument that the "Sun" did in its editorial and none of them presented Lord Kilbracken's ideas without context or criticism.
_	Countering this is the argument that the Council of 1059 had more urgent business on hand; and in any case, sodomy had been condemned by Leo IX at Rheims in 1049."
_	Ennis returns, thinks he smells a blackmailing scheme, and during the argument that follows is shot by Madge.
_	This decision ["Button-Fastener"] proceeds upon the argument that, since the patentee may withhold his patent altogether from public use, he must logically and necessarily be permitted to impose any conditions which he chooses upon any use which he may allow of it.
_	Ava tells her that Antía knew about the argument that precipitated Xoan's death and blamed Julieta and Ava, and that she had ultimately internalised guilt about this because she was away at camp at the time.
_	The railroads were scrapped with the argument that Venezuela did not need them having so much asphalt it could expand the road network at a lower cost.
_	He then raised the argument that since Article 21(1) states that the President shall, "in the exercise of his functions under this Constitution or any other written law, act in accordance with the advice of the Cabinet or of a Minister acting under the general authority of the Cabinet", it would be unconstitutional for the President to speak on his own volition in the absence of Cabinet's advice.
_	The Pythagoreans advanced the argument that unless an animal posed a threat to a human, it was not justifiable to kill an animal and that doing so would diminish the moral status of a human.
_	Nonetheless, his constant opposition to the government caused him to be expelled from the chamber with the argument that the election had not been held properly.
_	He used the argument that Carmouche, if successful, would cast his first vote for Speaker Nancy Pelosi of California.
_	Both Serbia and Greece, utilizing the argument that the war had been prolonged, repudiated important particulars of the pre-war treaty and retained occupation of all the conquered districts in their possession, which were to be divided according to specific predefined boundaries.
_	No defendant or claimant in such an action had ever persuaded a court to entertain the argument that the First Amendment's guarantees of free speech and free expression barred them.
_	The opinions authored by the judges on the Seventh Circuit's panel accepted the argument that the statute in question unduly infringed on freedom of expression; in this case, the message of "eroticism and sexuality" that the dancers were meant to convey.
_	Adopting the argument that the First Amendment to the U.S. Constitution generally bars courts from issuing a "prior restraint" on speech, the court denied Anderson's application for a temporary restraining order that would have barred, in advance, IEG's distribution of the video.
_	The Dutch scholar also noted that the argument that anthropology focused on examining "non-bourgeoisie" cultures was not new.
_	Further, the attorneys sought to invalidate the argument that the Khojas had been Sunni: they disassociated the Khojas from “classical Islam” by citing Perry’s 1847 ruling that “they possessed no translation of the Koran,” and asserted that since they had been identified as “Muslim” by Perry, this indicated they were Shia, as Perry had called them “Hindus with a "Muslim" cultivation and Muslim development of their creed.
_	The steroid hormones themselves are different enough from one another that they do not all affect all of the GPCR linked proteins; however, the similarities between the steroid hormones and between the receptors make plausible the argument that each receptor may respond to multiple steroid hormones or that each hormone could affect multiple receptors.
_	This gives some weight to the argument that it relates to health (plus or minus social) care and is amenable to change if we can change the cause(s), e.g. working patterns.
_	The EFF also makes the argument that all the side effects of the Sonny Bono Copyright Term Extension Act are negative for all parties except media companies.
_	Wade writes about racial differences in economic success between whites, blacks, East Asians and offers the argument that racial differences come from genetic differences amplified by culture.
_	Since new, more powerful, and thus more expensive ironclads could not be built, Sterneck made the argument that cheaper defensive weapons should be acquired; these included naval mines and more effective torpedo-armed ships.
_	Cyme is also believed to have been the port in which the Persian survivors of the Battle of Salamis wintered and lends considerable weight to the argument that Cyme was not only well served by defensive walls, but enjoyed the benefits of a large port capable of wintering and supplying a large wartime fleet.
_	There is also the argument that the paper of the envelope can be substituted with lesser-quality paper as the envelope no longer must be written upon.; this perhaps was more relevant at the time of Callahan's invention but is a somewhat specious claim today.
_	Texas-based Supreme Beef Processors, Inc. sued on the argument that Salmonella is naturally occurring and ultimately prevailed when a federal appeals court affirmed a lower court.
_	The majority also disagreed with the argument that privacy interests are minimized with this decision because warrants are more restrictive and require a judiciary to rule on the reasonableness of the warrant.
_	This criticism by the MRC does not address the argument that $1.1 trillion in additional annual revenue could be generated by closing loopholes and eliminating tax expenditures.
_	It underlines the argument that the strategies used in political communication emerged from the PR and advertising industries and, as a result, the political use of architectural imagery is similar to that found in commercial promotion.
_	Therefore, the objection goes, the step in the argument that assumes that the collection of contingent things is also contingent, is wrong.
_	The argument which eventually persuaded a majority of the members of the High Court was the argument that:
_	The Supreme Court never accepted the argument that the Fourteenth Amendment incorporated the entirety of the Bill of Rights.
_	Lord Ashley sought to remedy this by a short declaratory Act restoring the status quo but felt it impossible to draft one which did not introduce fresh matter (which would remove the argument that there was no call for further debate).
_	In court, the two men plead guilty to the charges whilst justifying their actions with the argument that limited violence against industrial equipment would prevent greater violence against the unique environmental heritage of Western Australia's native forests.
_	Edward Yourdon notes that in the 1970s there was even philosophical opposition to transforming unstructured programs into structured ones by automated means, based on the argument that one needed to think in structured programming fashion from the get go.
_	Oliass makes the argument that Jünger's argument is non-topical for the time period, claiming, "It doesn't appear that technology replaces nature of man the way that Jünger thinks.
_	On appeal to the California Sixth District Court of Appeal, in November 2003 a three-judge panel rejected the argument that the trial court lacked subject matter jurisdiction to conduct the trial because of Delfino and Days' pending appeal from the denial of their anti-SLAPP motion.
_	Here's example of autistic thinking with purely affective argument instead of logical: a person rejecting hypnosis with the argument that it "weakens the will", it is autistic, because his advance this imaginary opinion only because the power of hypnosis over the intimate ego happens not to suit him.
_	This time, Tony's comments about Sharon are placed before the court, with the argument that emotional distress provoked the assault; Shirine's history of miscarriages is also revealed.
_	He countered these instances of oppression with opportunities for liberation based on the argument that the Gospel advocates for the restoration of dignity to marginalised people.
_	Some researchers make the argument that the specimens and data should be publicly owned.
_	Sherwin used burrows constructed by the same mouse in an earlier part of the experiment, thereby addressing the argument that the mouse continued to burrow only because the ready-made burrows were inadequate.
_	As always, she tirelessly advanced the argument that the struggle for feminism must be linked to the struggle for socialism.
_	To the argument that Krasińska was not royal, he replied that it was only princes, not the monarchs themselves who were banned from marrying non-royals- and in any case, he would have her relative, the king of Italy, to give her royal status by adopting her.
_	Sternhell, pointing to the democratic path to power followed by the Nazi Party, has also made the argument that La Rocque's apparent respect for republican legality is not sufficient ground to disqualify his movement as fascist.
_	He published a series of articles on the topic in "Vestnik Kommunisticheskoi Akademii" (Courier of the Communist Academy) in 1924 detailing the argument that the moneys to finance mass industrialization would necessarily have to come from the country's rural peasantry, which comprised about 80% of the nation's population.
_	It was accepted that he did not agree with the argument that the federal government lacked authority over agriculture and was going to write a separate opinion upholding the act's regulation policy while striking down the act's taxation policy on the grounds that it was a coercive regulation rather than a tax measure.
_	The most prominent of these is the argument that Danny Way landed the 900 in 1989, and it appears in an early Santa Cruz film.
_	However, several pieces of evidence support the argument that the dust is interstellar rather than centered on V838 Monocerotis.
_	This is the argument that although church attendance has decreased, people may still think of themselves as religious on an individual level.
_	The Court rejected the argument that the neutral and especially reliable nature of the forensic chemical testing would exclude it from the confrontation requirement.
_	It is the argument that today, if we go before the laborers, we must offer them something right away.
_	Early critics developed the argument that "The Spanish Viceroy" was a play about the Count of Gondomar, the diplomat who had served as Spain's ambassador to England to 1622.
_	Roy Greenslade wrote that few, "apart from the man himself and his friends", could disagree with the argument that the public had a right to know.
_	While a judge initially ruled in the favor of the dismissed employees, the decision was later overturned on appeal in 2001 based on the argument that " "'for a religious corporation, association, or society to hire and employ employees of a particular religion,' is severable and valid."
_	Dion expanded upon his earlier arguments against the territorial integrity of Quebec following secession by highlighting the inconsistency in the argument that Canada is divisible but Quebec is not.
_	This is especially shown in Alzheimer's research as the Women's Health Initiative Memory Study refuted the argument that a decline in oestrogens and progestogens seen during menopause increases vulnerability to neurodegenerative diseases.
_	Her advice to Henry that he seeks medical assistance from Holloway, assuming him to be "a figure in the fiction he [has been] weaving", would add weight to the argument that Ada is both part imagined as well as part remembered.
_	In answer to the argument that Native Americans ought to focus on social issues larger than a team name, Ross stated that "Native people shouldn't be forced to choose between living or racial discrimination.
_	Even Peter Singer, that faithful to Jeremy’s Bentham positivism, refused to talk about animal rights, currently defends the extension of the human rights for the great primates, under the argument that we already have enough evidences that they are part of our sort.
_	It is also considered to be the argument that persuaded John Wesley give women the provision to preach.
_	The Report also dismissed the argument that the trial had been subject to judicial review, noting that "the system for reviewing murder cases at the time ... failed to provide the safeguards now present."
_	Teitel wrote that many on Twitter expressed skepticism that all it takes is a pretty face to change sexual orientation, and this was accompanied by the argument that saying "you [can] 'go gay' for Ruby Rose reinforces the idea that sexuality is a choice, and is homophobic."
_	In 1869, author Allan Park Paton advanced the argument that Macbeth personally served as the Third Murderer.
_	But more importantly, the retention of Canada was motivated by the argument that removing the French presence from North America would reinforce the security of Britain’s Empire in the region.
_	The theory of sexual selection was also needed to counter the argument that beauty with no obvious utility, such as exotic birds' plumage, proved divine design, which had been put strongly by the Duke of Argyll in his book "The Reign of Law" (1868).
_	The Court rejected the argument that an exception for Commerce Clause challenges to state tax or spending decisions should exist, as an analogy to the Establishment Clause taxation challenge the Court had permitted in "Flast v. Cohen", 392 U.S. 83 (1968), because both constitutional clauses operate as a specific limit on the Taxing and Spending Clause.
_	The logo was based on the argument that the station would change people's lives for the better in terms of socio-economic development.
_	Jubilee USA, Jubilee Debt Campaign (UK) and others, called for the immediate cancellation of Haiti's debt to multilateral institutions, including the World Bank, International Monetary Fund (IMF), and the Inter-American Development Bank, based on the argument that this debt is unjust (under a legal term called odious debt) and that Haiti could better use the funds going towards debt service for education, health care, and basic infrastructure.
_	Coulton's own lawyers told him that as he only used a compulsory license to make the cover, it would be difficult to sue for damages using the argument that he retained copyright over his own version.
_	Pastor Lennox Zamore said that he rejected the argument that legalizing same-sex marriage would benefit the local economy: "We don't want to balance our books by bringing the sex industry – whether it is same sex or not – to the Virgin Islands",
_	The authors regard the Agreement as a sub-optimal deal for Australia and in later work put forward the argument that the Australian government misread their special relationship with the US and proceeded with the Agreement for public relations reasons, particularly with regard to the issue of Australia-US relations during the 2004 Australian federal election.
_	Marable addresses the confounding factors of the publisher and Haley's authorial influence, passages that support the argument that while Malcolm X may have considered Haley a ghostwriter, he acted in actuality as a coauthor, at times without Malcolm X's direct knowledge or expressed consent:
_	The Liverpool councillors did appeal – bringing in the argument that the extraordinary audit had not notified the councillors of their right for an oral hearing to put their case before making a finding of wilful misconduct.
_	Catton then considered the argument that Tottenham, who had also been relegated with Chelsea should likewise be reinstated, although he noted there was nothing to link Tottenham’s relegation with anything amiss in the final season before the cessation of the League for the duration.
_	Fontenelle quickly followed with his "Digression sur les anciens et les modernes" (1688), in which he took the Modern side, pressing the argument that modern scholarship allowed modern man to surpass the ancients in knowledge.
_	This is closely related with the argument that parties, particularly government bodies lack the power to enter into derivative contracts.
_	James' appeal depends entirely on blurring the distinction between those who hold out for 100 percent proof in a matter in which any reasonable person rests content with, let us say, 90 percent, and those who refuse to indulge in a belief which is supported only by the argument that after all it could conceivably be true.
_	Troake who died at sea just before the start of production, the director advances the argument that sealing is a time-honoured and environmentally responsible industry, while debunking what she sees as misconceptions about the hunt, including how seals are actually killed.
_	Experts argue that there is absolutely no empirical evidence that supports the argument that transgender people are unfit for service.
_	This gives merit to the argument that the first attack years earlier was an independent group.
_	Chang got sufficiently angry over the argument that he submitted an accusation against Cui, stating that Cui had frivolously changed the proper regulation of the rites and requesting that Cui be demoted to be the prefect of Chao Prefecture (潮州, in modern Chaozhou, Guangdong).
_	The band has previously defended the use of the word with the argument that "Jah" is a shortening for "Yahweh" (also spelled "Jahweh") as used in the Bible.
_	In 2017, the organisation reported that no children had been assigned to such a category, viewing this as a vindication of the argument that such classifications exacerbate parental fears.
_	Jones said that although he had been averse to naming the school after himself, his friends overcame his reluctance "with the argument that the school would be called by that name because of my connection with it, and to attempt to give it any other name would confuse the people."
_	Ms. Carroll and Mr. Kahn help revivify the argument that the right actresses can perform some of the great classic roles traditionally denied to women and make them their own.
_	In particular, the Darwinists took issue with the argument that discourse constructs reality.
_	He refers to the other villains as mortals, which further supports the argument that he is the devil.
_	He specifically rejected the argument that he was tired of Parliament, which was probably true since he chose to return there at the by-election in Rossendale in 1917.
_	An offshoot of this interpretation is the argument that Browning is applying evolutionary theory to religious development.
_	Scholars, following the lead of sociologist Robert Bellah, often make the argument that the United States has a secular "civil religion" – one with no association with any religious denomination or viewpoint – that has incorporated Memorial Day as a sacred event.
_	Though some deep ecologists may reject the argument that ecological behavior is rooted in the social paradigm (which, according to their view, would be an anthropocentric fallacy), others in fact embrace this argument, such as the adherents to the deep ecologist movement Deep Green Resistance.
_	Diplock courts were created in the 1970s during The Troubles, to phase out Operation Demetrius internments, and because of the argument that juries were intimidated, though this is disputed.
_	The Chinese consulate continued to make the argument that the expulsion and related acts of anti-Chinese violence were a direct violation of the Burlingame Treaty.
_	One possible approach in justifying capital controls lies in the argument that conditions in the global economy are sometimes turbulent.
_	The court explained that although the court, in "Betamax", emphasized that the plaintiffs had failed to show that they had sustained substantial harm from Sony's video recorder, it did so in the context of assessing the argument that time shifting of television programs was fair use rather than infringement.
_	Critics of electoral thresholds dispute the argument that the Nazis' token presence in the Reichstags of the 1920's significantly aided their rise to power and that the existence of thresholds in the Weimar constitution would not in fact have hindered Hitler's ambitions - indeed, once the Nazis had met the thresholds they would likely their existence would have actually aided the Nazis by allowing them to marginalize smaller parties even more quickly.
_	This had no noticeable effect, however, and resistance from pupils' organizations moved the exams back, with the argument that the only effect was to have pupils sacrifice grades for partying.
_	The speaker makes the argument that since he and the youth are one, they must then share the same woman.
_	On other occasions, Dawkins has replied to the argument that Hitler and Stalin were antireligious with the response that Hitler and Stalin also grew moustaches in an effort to show the argument as fallacious.
_	Firstly, it presents a theory that science changes due to an accumulation of observations and improvement in experimental techniques and methodology; secondly, it puts forward the argument that the popularity of science in 17th-century England and the religious demography of the Royal Society (English scientists of that time were predominantly Puritans or other Protestants) can be explained by a correlation between Protestantism and the scientific values.
_	Some evidence from basketball supports the argument that the hot-hand belief is an illusion based on people's systematic misjudgment of random sequences.
_	These discrepancies with thematic links and common word usage have given legitimacy to the argument that the Sonnets may not be in a finalized order.
_	The nonfiction series examines and critiques the history of the United States of America, from the arrival of Europeans to the early 21st century, making the argument that the founding and evolution of America as a nation has been driven primarily by conquest, exploitation, and murder.
_	Others disagree, pointing to Lawrence's own writings to support the argument that he was egotistical.
_	Highly critical of the argument that "Zionists saw anti-semites as nationalists like themselves with a common objective in the removal of Jews from Europe", Ben-Noah asks rhetorically "where does one begin to review work like this?".
_	However, the Chief of Air Staff put forth the argument that in order to create a suitable environment for the helicopters, fighter action was required.
_	The T44 was selected over the T48/FAL primarily due to weight (T44 was a pound lighter), simplicity with fewer parts, the T44's self-compensating gas system, and the argument that the T44 could be manufactured on existing machinery built for the M1 rifle (this later turned out to be unworkable).
_	A 2009 paper published by Rajesh P N Rao, Iravatham Mahadevan and others in the journal "Science" also challenged the argument that the Indus script might have been a nonlinguistic symbol system.
_	One of the proofs for Cayley–Hamilton theorem above bears some similarity to the argument that formula_118.
_	The Merton thesis has two separate parts: firstly, it presents a theory that science changes due to an accumulation of observations and improvement in experimental technique and methodology; secondly, it puts forward the argument that the popularity of science in England in the 17th century, and the religious demography of the Royal Society (English scientists of that time were predominantly Puritans or other Protestants) can be explained by a correlation between Protestantism and the scientific values.
_	The law, howevever, was vetoed by governor Oscar Mario Jorge as one of his first acts of government, less than three weeks later, with the argument that its new interpretation of previous legislation could be deemed unconstitutional.
_	He said that all the evidence indicated that Kennedy was shot from behind and that the argument that one bullet hit both Kennedy and Texas Governor John Connally was "very persuasive."
_	Cities like Baltimore, Austin, and New York passed legislation to require CPCs to disclose their status and that they did not offer abortion services, but organizations representing the CPCs have been successful in courts challenging these laws, principally on the argument that forcing the CPCs to post such language violated their First Amendment rights and constituted compelled speech.
_	Russill makes the argument that the pragmatist tradition "conceptualizes communication in response to the problem of incommensurability."
_	Repulsion and discomfort being the sole means by which this workhouse test works—that repulsion and discomfort must be carefully kept up for its operation." and of the argument that as a 'self-acting test' it had the great virtue of removing any need for moral judgement on applicants:
_	Literary scholars employ the same methodology to attribute works to the poet and playwright William Shakespeare as they use for other writers of the period: the historical record and stylistic studies, and they say the argument that there is no evidence of Shakespeare's authorship is a form of fallacious logic known as "argumentum ex silentio", or argument from silence, since it takes the absence of evidence to be evidence of absence.
_	It took 150 constables and 400 armed volunteers to break up the rioting in what became known as the 'Chiniquy Affair', and this added weight to the argument that the colony desperately needed a permanent military presence.
_	Sociologists Loïc Wacquant and John L. Campbell contend that since the rise of neoliberal ideology in the late 1970s and early 1980s, an expanding carceral state, or government system of mass incarceration, has largely supplanted the increasingly retrenched social welfare state, which has been justified by its proponents with the argument that the citizenry must take on personal responsibility.
_	The argument that wages, tips and other compensation received for the performance of personal services are not taxable income, the argument that such items are offset by an equivalent deduction, the argument that a person has a "basis" in his or her labor equal to the fair market value of the wages received, and variations of these arguments, have been officially identified as legally frivolous federal tax return positions for purposes of the $5,000 frivolous tax return penalty imposed under Internal Revenue Code section 6702(a).
_	If the argument that the supervisory jurisdiction of the courts cannot be ousted holds, there is no need to distinguish between jurisdictional and non-jurisdictional errors of law.
_	If the ceratopsians that lived alongside "Tyrannosaurus" were fast, that casts doubt on the argument that "Tyrannosaurus" did not have to be fast to catch its prey.
_	Major rejected the argument that the law was a "colourable" attempt to enact criminal law.
_	Rapper Mihail Mihaylov, who was described in the media as "one of the faces of the counter-protests", in a similar fashion expressed dismay at the alleged meddling of outside agents in Bulgarian affairs and in addition to that criticized the Borisov Government for its supposed authoritarian tendencies, thus subscribing to the argument that GERB was bound to be the beneficiary of any anti-government protests.
_	Store owners’ complaints concerning upkeep are countered by the argument that it increases foot traffic and business.
_	She makes the argument that grouping all people of African descent together regardless of their unique ancestral circumstances would inevitably deny the lingering effects of slavery within the American community of slave descendants, in addition to denying black immigrants recognition of their own unique ancestral backgrounds.
_	Both jittering and stochastic undersampling impair the recognition of speech in noisy backgrounds without degrading recognition in silence, support the argument that TFS is important for recognizing speech in noise.
_	"Law and Order" became a conservative campaign theme, using the argument that liberalism had subsidized unrest and failed to cure it.
_	Additionally, Müffelmann argues against the argument that indeterminism is the only viewpoint that allows the maintenance of human dignity.
_	There is, of course, the argument that by pinning Sting you eliminate a potential rival.
_	Because it rests on the argument that disparate, spatial temporalities can not be unified, critics have argued that their analysis seems incomplete.
_	This branch of economic analysis starts from the argument that income is a bad approximation for happiness.
_	She founded the Yanomami-Hilfe e.V. in 2006 after she revoked her association and membership at the Society of Threatened Peoples with the argument that the Society for Threatened Peoples (GfbV) organization had embezzled money's and enriched itself by collecting donations meant to help the Yanomami but were not paid out for the allocated Yanomami projects.
_	In 1936, a mass arrest of homosexual men prompted legislation to legalize and regulate heterosexual prostitution based on the argument that men were turning to homosexuality out of desperation.
_	He focuses extensively on the argument that the conflict was not between the proletariat and the bourgeoisie, but between different factions within the bourgeoisie.
_	Motivated by this situation and the argument that more diversity in leadership positions leads to better management and more competitiveness, Prime Minister Abe has been encouraging companies and governmental agencies to create alternatives for women’s career advancement.
_	In addition, he believed that the Greeks had derived some of their thought from older civilizations, and specifically that Plato had received many of his notions from the Jews ("ibid"., p. 230)—an idea which recalls the argument that Dryden in "Religio Laioi" had employed against the deists, furthermore, he had, like many of his learned contemporaries, a profound respect for Hebrew culture and the sublimity of the Hebrew scriptures, going so far as to remark in the "Essay on Heroic Poetry" that "most, even of [the heathen poets'] beat Fancies and Images, as well as Names, were borrow'd from the Antient Hebrew Poetry and Divinity."
_	Hanna is confronted with the fact that one legacy of the Holocaust was the dispossession of the Palestinians while her colleagues attempt to persuade her of the merits of the arrangement for Salim with the argument that Israel must be “defended” even if Palestinians are denied their rights.
_	Vulture.com's Angelica Jade Bastién described Pfeiffer as "an actress of such depth, breadth, and tenacity" that "she obliterates the argument that an untrained actor has less capability than her trained counterparts."
_	In a debate strongly echoed four years later in the case of Chumbawamba, the band justified the move with the argument that the financial and promotional support of EMI would enable their political message to reach a wider public; they also argued that the deal gave the band more money to spend on political causes.
_	Treatment provided to women by men was justified to some by prophetic medicine (al-tibba alnabawi), otherwise known as "medicine of the prophet" (tibb al-nabi), which provided the argument that men can treat women, and women men, even if this means they must expose the patient's genitals in necessary circumstances.
_	It rejected the argument that HMG's reliance on legal advice at the time of passing the 1988 Act did not deprive the breach of its grave and manifest character.
_	Uncle Joe basically makes the argument that (¬A ⇒ B) and (¬A ⇒ ¬B) are contradictory, saying that the same antecedent cannot result in two different consequents.
_	Lenin made the argument that capitalism was in its last stages and had been taken over by monopolists.
_	Six other states would follow South Carolina's lead before the Battle of Fort Sumter; some felt if they did not secede now, they might lose the argument that a state had the right to secede, a right that has never been confirmed or denied by a court of law.
_	Justice William O. Douglas filed a concurring opinion; he criticized the argument that "First Amendment rights are somehow not fully realized unless they are subsidized by the State", noting that the argument "may indeed conflict with the underlying premise that a complete hands-off policy on the part of government is at times the only course consistent with First Amendment rights."
_	Supporter Mark Jaccard of Simon Fraser University, defended the tax by saying that BC’s aviation fuel usage, which is not subject to the carbon tax, "did not diverge from the Canadian pattern, supporting the argument that the carbon tax really did have an effect.
_	And BC’s disconnect from the rest of the country was evident for all taxed fuels, not just gasoline; so the argument that BC’s divergence is caused by increased cross-border shopping for gasoline is not supported."
_	A study by Reiner & Gearhart provides some insight into what can happen when genetically male children with cloacal exstrophy are sexually assigned female and raised as girls, according to an 'optimal gender policy' developed by John Money: in a sample of 14 children, follow-up between the ages of 5 to 12 showed that 8 of them identified as boys, and all of the subjects had at least moderately male-typical attitudes and interests, providing support for the argument that genetic variables affect gender identity and behavior independent of socialization.
_	In an interview in March 2010 he rejected the argument that it was the turn of Ife/Ijesha to present the next governor of the state.
_	As for the argument that the Federal Government's refusal to recognize same-sex marriages as "marriages" justified the use of a different term, the court said: "Courts define what is constitutionally permissible, and the Massachusetts Constitution does not permit this kind of labeling...
_	Andrew Brennan was an advocate of ecologic humanism (eco-humanism), the argument that all ontological entities, animate and in-animate, can be given ethical worth purely on the basis that they exist.
_	He also finds that the effect is larger for people who have a high preference for consistency, which supports the argument that surrogation is due to an attempt to reduce cognitive dissonance.
_	Notably, Avicenna develops what is called the "flying man" argument in the Psychology of "The Cure" I.1.7 as defense of the argument that the soul is without quantitative extension, which has an affinity with Descartes's "cogito" argument (or what phenomenology designates as a form of an ""epoche"").
_	In order to frame the censorship into a positive context and to rationalize the it, the Soviet regime was openly opposing Western culture with the argument that it was a source of the detrimental bourgeois influence threatening the values of the communist society.
_	It rejected the argument that the Supreme Court's 1988 decision in R. v. Morgentaler prohibited provinces from passing laws that simply made clinic abortions illegal.
_	"Antebellum American Culture" (1979), his panoramic look at the cultural discourse surrounding ethnicity, gender, family, race, science, and wealth and power in the pre-Civil War United States, advanced the argument that American culture needs to be understood in terms of an ongoing “moral civil war.”
_	According to Gal Beckerman there are many individual pro-Israel op-ed columnists, but the argument that the media as a whole is part of the Israel lobby cannot be concluded from Mearsheimer and Walt's cherry picked evidence:
_	The Allmusic review by Thom Jurek awarded the album 4 stars and stated "While the argument that there should be a moratorium on Christmas recordings is a good one in the 21st century, "Carla's Christmas Carols" provides a powerful counter to that view.
_	In the refutation, the respondent, continuing, seeks to refute the argument that the proponent had advanced against the thesis.
_	After the Battle of Fort Sumter in April, however, despite his recognition of the illegality of secession, Bell fell for the argument that Fort Sumter had no right to defend itself and let himself feel deceived by Lincoln.
_	North spends much of his book devoted to the argument that there was a god known as "Ing" in Anglo-Saxon England.
_	No federal court has upheld the argument that the term "state" as used in the Internal Revenue Code excludes the fifty states or that the term "state" means only the "District of Columbia."
_	He ruled further that even if he accepted the argument that the speech code only restricted fighting words, it was still illegal using the Leonard Law and "R. A. V. v. City of St. Paul" as the code restricted speech based on content.
_	The authors claim this study is the first experimental evidence to support the argument that nociceptive sensitisation is actually an adaptive response to injuries.
_	There was one exception though, as the publisher of the alternative namesake of the genre, "Dick Bos" managed to convince authorities to make an exception for Mazure's creation, using the argument that his hero used his martial art skills exclusively in service of the authorities, and was thus a "good guy".
_	Citing a verse of the Qur'an, we developed the argument that, by ceasing to be amenable to the Sharaa Court, the naturalized French ipso facto lost his Muslim attributes", he declared in 1973.
_	To the argument that someone denying the jurisdiction of a court must also indicate some jurisdiction that is competent, Barry said that the customary legal system of the Aboriginal people themselves was the correct jurisdiction.
_	ALF activists respond to the criticism with the argument that, as Ingrid Newkirk puts it, "Thinkers may prepare revolutions, but bandits must carry them out."
_	Marx makes the argument that, as the bourgeoisie reach a point of wealth accumulation, they hold enough power as the dominant class to shape political institutions and society according to their own interests.
_	Meanwhile, Alton approached Myles with the argument that since Deputy Warden Rothe had been shot and killed, their escape plan was now null.
_	They shared the argument that, because the proposition "no-p is a not-p" is not logically equivalent to "It is thought that 'no-p is a not-p'", psychologism does not logically stand.
_	Fukuyama makes the argument that patronage behavior is rooted in the following biological roots:
_	The Supreme Court rejected the argument that the wage did not apply because the airport is owned by the Port of Seattle.
_	Despite producing a less saturated illusory color, the induction of an AME may override a previously induced ME, providing additional weight to the argument that AMEs occur in the higher visual areas than MEs.
_	Because Albania did not participate any further in the compensation proceedings, the United Kingdom was awarded judgment by default on 15 December 1949, with the court accepting the argument that the question of its jurisdiction was "res judicata" under Article 60.
_	Responding to the argument that if land is being reasonably used in itself, then there is a public interest that it should be carried on Bramwell B went on…
_	Brackett makes the argument that without being able to grow outside their homes, women face two dangers.
_	The Russian government's stated purpose for the law is to protect children from being exposed to homonormativity — content presenting homosexuality as being a norm in society — under the argument that it contradicts traditional family values.
_	This is integral to his stance as he explains “the argument that much of talk consists of replayings and that these make no sense unless some form of storyteller's suspense can be maintained shows the close relevance of frame-indeed, the close relevance of dramaturgy-for the organization of talk.”
_	In the 2003 case "Halpern et al. v. Attorney General of Canada et al.", the Ontario Court of Appeal rejected the argument that a failure of the law to recognize same-sex marriages violated the religious rights of the church that performed the ceremonies, though the court found the definition of marriage to be unconstitutional on other grounds.
_	Abbott’s case was based on the argument that she was a victim of discrimination based on the ADA.
_	Calgary's ascension to the 2015 Stanley Cup playoffs was one of the NHL's most unlikely stories for the season; only one member of the sports media, TSN's Aaron Ward, predicted the Flames would make the post-season and he did so on the argument that "there is always one team that surprises, and Calgary is it."
_	A poem in the Greek Anthology which echoes the first stanza of the poem is explicitly about a wedding; this perhaps strengthens the argument that fragment 31 was written as a wedding song.
_	A new development emerges as a rebuttal of Crowley's elaboration of the argument that vestments are wholly negative.
_	Against this prohibition, the leader of the Upper Silesians, published the anonime edited German-language brochure "Oberschlesien auf Subhasta!", in which it premised the shrinking German majority at the time a plebiscite and showed the need for the creation of an independent Upper Silesian state with the argument that "Upper Silesian nation is homogeneous people about mixed blood".
_	Dillinger wanted to attack the lawmen and rescue her, but accepted the argument that he would die in the attempt.
_	Instead, Billings and Hebard persuaded House members to support it with the argument that if Vermont didn’t solve the problem, the federal government and the courts would do it instead.
_	The subject is the argument that appears outside of the VP, but the object appears inside it.
_	She stated that if the stern were not removed, the argument that the ship is trespassing on state property (used in the state's lawsuit against "New Carissa" owners) would be undermined should another vessel wreck off the Oregon coast.
_	There is the argument that collision between two continents should slow down because of continental buoyancy, and that for convergence to continue, it should do so at a new subduction zone where oceanic crust can be consumed.
_	William Cobbett used Lingard's history as an unbiased reference source for his own "History of the Protestant Reformation" in which he puts forward the argument that the reformation had disastrous consequences for the ordinary people of England.
_	He has advised Pakistani authorities to shoot down NATO aircraft should a similar event take place in the future, and to keep the supply lines closed, on the argument that the U.S. cannot afford a war with Pakistan.
_	For Hegel, the most important achievement of German idealism, starting with Immanuel Kant and culminating in his own philosophy, was the argument that reality ("being") is shaped through and through by thought and is, in a strong sense, identical to thought.
_	Relying on its earlier decision in "Shively v. Bowlby", 152 U.S. 1 (1894), the Court also dismissed the argument that the Indians’ treaty rights were subordinate to the powers acquired by the state upon its entry into the Union.
_	They are generally based on the argument that the act of immigrating illegally does not make the people themselves illegal, but rather they are "people who have immigrated illegally".
_	"There is the argument that by going down many false paths one has enriched one's vocabulary, if only minimally, but positively enriched it.
_	In addition, the machines cost money, the semi-skilled workers needed food and clothing, and the customers refused to pay marked prices with the argument that he had a seemingly cheaper workforce.
_	The book puts forth the argument that the hegemony of neoliberal market fundamentalism is blocking any serious reforms to halt climate change and protect the environment.
_	Finally, Sullivan counters the argument that the decision undermines all marriage law thus:
_	Unless one is prepared to accept that any planning decision authorises any nuisance which must inevitably come from it, the argument that the nuisance was authorised by planning permission in this case must fail".
_	These discussions usually turn (to varying degrees) on the argument that decision by a monarch is undemocratic and there is no parliamentary oversight over the decision and the monarch might make use of this to push for a government of his or her liking.
_	Smyth's success hinged on the argument that, at the time his uncle had suffered a recovery of the land to Talcarn that uncle was only in possession of the land under the later Tregoz entail to him and Jane, rather than the original Trevistarn entail.
_	In terms of infected populations, women are more likely to be affected than men, a fact that supports the argument that gender inequalities, especially in the Mozambican workforce, are still prevalent and disproportionally lead women over men to pursue opportunities in sex work in order to garner enough funds to provide for their families.
_	John Philoponus was probably the first to use the argument that infinite time is impossible in order to establish temporal finitism.
_	This application was ultimately rejected with the argument that the party name was too similar to Venstre's formal name: "Venstre, Liberal Party of Denmark".
_	In deciding the case, the Court rejected the argument that the Fourteenth Amendment did not apply to corporations.
_	Many "naysayers of the late nineteenth and early twentieth century" have made the argument that Smith's maps were not reliable because he "lacked a formal education in cartography".
_	In addition Cole stated that Keller had provided "little evidence" for the argument that the business community had caused the peaceful desegregation, even though the claim was plausible.
_	Intelligent design advocate Michael Behe of Lehigh University reviewed the game and said that "Spore" "has nothing to do with real science or real evolution — neither Darwinian nor intelligent design," contradicting the argument that the game promotes intelligent design over evolution.
_	The cases "Calero Toledo v. Pearson Yacht" (1974) and "Examining Board v. Flores de Otero" (1976) were used by the conservatives to justify the argument that "Congress renounced its control on local affairs" and that "[it] granted [Puerto Rico a degree of] autonomy comparable to that of the [US] states".
_	But it's only fair to put forward the argument that this is down to the marketing of the machines rather than the quality of the product."
_	In 2010 he left the PSDB with the argument that the political party had turned conservative.
_	Because this distributed knowledge, while incomplete, is essential to economic planning, its necessity is cited as evidence in support of the argument that economic planning must be performed in a similarly distributed fashion by individual actors.
_	Mazrui made the argument that Israel and the Zionist movement behaved in an imperialist fashion and that they used their biblical beliefs and the events of the holocaust for political gain .
_	In this book, Comas makes the argument that Christianity is in fundamentally unprejudiced and does not define people inferior due to their physical characteristics (Kleg 1993).
_	In this Stabaka, Udayana tries to refute the argument that the transmission of Dharma or religious duties is possible without an Isvara.
_	Kripke writes that this paradox is "the most radical and original skeptical problem that philosophy has seen to date", and that Wittgenstein does not reject the argument that leads to the rule-following paradox, but accepts it and offers a "skeptical solution" to ameliorate the paradox's destructive effects.
_	On January 31, 1940, in a 5-2 decision by Jesse W. Curtis, the court upheld the contempt ruling against the "Los Angeles Times", rejecting the argument that it had a First Amendment right to criticize the court.
_	In a final appeal, the Supreme Court of Japan accepted the argument that imposing a harsh penalty on Aizawa would violate the principle of human equality before the law found in the constitution.
_	Defense attorneys then made the argument that the original indictments were flawed because the pool of jurors from which the grand jury was drawn contained insufficient numbers of minorities.
_	The successful appeal was significant because it supported the argument that courts should take long-term issues such as "battered woman syndrome" into account when considering a defence of provocation.
_	This is as the initial presiding judge, Emile Henry Lacombe in the Circuit Court only reluctantly conferred American citizenship on Balsara, as he reasoned that there "“was much force in the argument that the Congress which framed the original act for naturalization of aliens ...intended it to include only white persons belonging to the races whose emigrants had contributed to the building up on this continent of the community of people which declared itself a new nation ..."".
_	Although the poem was defended by a few critics, E. C. Pettet returned to the argument that the poem lacked a structure and emphasized the word "forlorn" as evidence of his view.
_	Olbers' paradox, the argument that the dark sky at night shows that stars cannot be evenly distributed through infinite space, is named for him, though others had also advanced it.
_	Further criticisms of the JTPA stem from the argument that individuals can take advantage of the system due to the way that it is set up.
_	In "Bicycling & the Law," Mionske advanced the argument that cyclists have a legal right to travel (that is, bicycling is protected under Freedom of Movement jurisprudence, in contrast to licensed forms of transportation, such as driving, which are not by right, but by permission only), a theme he first explored in his "Legally Speaking" column.
_	Several Muslim writers raised the argument that it is describing no one other than Muhammad for the following reasons:
_	On the argument that subsequent behaviour could ‘cure’ a fundamental breach of contract, this could not stand because its introduction into the general law of contract could not be justified.
_	In Dion's second open letter to Jacques Brassard, Quebec's intergovernmental affairs minister, Dion expands upon his earlier arguments against the territorial integrity of Quebec following secession by highlighting the inconsistency in the argument that Canada is divisible but Quebec is not.
_	The book also makes the argument that the humanities are necessary today because ideas are their "stock and trade."
_	Edward Foxe coordinated the research effort and the team produced the "Collectanea Satis Copiosa" ("The Sufficiently Abundant Collections") and "The Determinations", historical and theological support for the argument that the king exercised supreme jurisdiction within his realm.
_	The case of "California v. Freeman" in 1989 is one of the most prominent examples where a producer/director of pornographic films was charged with pandering under the argument that paying porn actors to perform sex on camera was a form of prostitution covered by a state anti-pandering statute.
_	The book proposes the argument that "homosexuality" is a loaded term.
_	The defense would focus on the argument that the federal government doesn't actually have jurisdiction of federal land, as they lost the right to own the land inside of Oregon once it became a state.
_	Barlaam cited Dionysius' "Mystical Theology" to support the argument that God is unspeakable and therefore unknowable.
_	Despite this ambiguity, this statement of Herodotus is one of the pieces of evidence most often cited on behalf of the argument that Lydians invented coinage, at least in the West, even though the first coins were neither gold nor silver but an alloy of the two called electrum.
_	The piece presents the argument that the preponderant power of the United States (in this case, projected into Europe) acts as a pacifying force in the region, preventing the region's multipolarity from leading to conflict.
_	Caudill came to believe in Shockley's theory of "dysgenics," the argument that unintelligent people weaken the genes of a 'race' over time.
_	The booth solution is often put forward with the argument that female use of open urinals is socially unacceptable and associated with embarrassment.
_	Philanthropy was not known to be a highly profitable business and Friedman had provided a widely accepted academic basis for the argument that the costs of behaving in an ethically responsible manner would outweigh the benefits.
_	On December 4, 2008, in an appearance on CNN's Situation Room with Wolf Blitzer, Nardelli was asked, "So what do you say about the argument that the Japanese, the Germans, Koreans make better cars than the Americans?"
_	Finally, Laskin discarded the argument that the discrimination in question is not offensive to the "Bill of Rights" simply because Parliament enacted the impugned section of the law under its constitutional authority as provided by the "British North America Act".
_	To exacerbate matters further, the NMA's leadership continued to support compulsory health insurance while AMA members largely distanced itself from such a scheme due to (a) the red scare, (b) the belief in U.S. health superiority to other nations with national health insurance schemes and (c) the argument that a national health insurance would potentially ruin the "sacred" practitioner-patient relationship.
_	This balance between DFI and IRRF expenditures might be justifiable by the argument that the IRRF was not intended to finance the Iraqi government ministries or the Public Distribution System (state food rations from the Oil-for-food program), which the DFI was intended to cover.
_	The story is one of the least known of the biographical fictions about Homer; it is mentioned neither by Samuel Butler nor by Andrew Dalby, both of whom have developed the argument that a woman poet was responsible for the "Odyssey".
_	The "Capistrano" decision also rejected the argument that higher water tier prices that exceed the cost of service may be justified as “penalties” not within the purview of Proposition 218 restrictions.
_	Despite the previous rulings, such as the 1706 declaration (which was clarified a year later) by Lord Chief Justice Holt on slavery not being legal in Britain, it was often ignored, with the argument that the slaves were property and therefore could not be considered people.
_	There is also the argument that gentrification reduces the social capital of the area it affects.
_	Ethical issues relating to private healthcare primarily concerns the argument that the seriously ill be entitled to spend money on saving their lives.
_	She makes the argument that the difference in speech "reinforces the thematic division between the women's identification with the social group and Richard's individualism".
_	Ackerman was a longtime critic of the argument that sun exposure should be avoided, stating that the risk of wrinkles or squamous cell carcinoma from exposure to the sun needs to be balanced against the advantages from exposure to ultraviolet radiation, a position he advocated in his book "The Sun and the "Epidemic" of Melanoma: Myth on Myth!".
_	Mapuche leaders filed an injunction against Michelle Bachelet and minister of the presidency José Antonio Viera Gallo, who is also coordinator of indigenous affairs, with the argument that the government had failed to fully comply with the Convention 169 clause on the right to "prior consultation," which must be carried out "in good faith and in a form appropriate to the circumstances, with the objective of achieving agreement or consent to the proposed measures," such as logging, agribusiness or mining projects in indigenous territories.
_	At the hearing the union tried to make the argument that hiring blacks who had applied for the non-menial positions since June 1941 but were denied would adversely affect the seniority rights of the presently employed white workers.
_	He justifies the pursuit of pure mathematics with the argument that its very "uselessness" on the whole meant that it could not be misused to cause harm.
_	Fay however, reinforces the argument that the INA was relatively less significant in military terms.
_	Clemency lawyer Rick Hayes (Rob Morrow) tries to save her, based on the argument that she was under the influence of crack cocaine when she committed the crime of which she was found guilty and that she is no longer the same person she had been at the time of the murder.
_	From this, he derives the argument that the mystery religions of Late Antiquity were actually offshoots of one ancient religion founded at the Tower of Babel.
_	Librarians and others who disperse information to the public also face the dilemma of the ethics of censorship through the argument that censorship harms students and is morally wrong because they are unable to know the full extent of knowledge available to the world.
_	This study has wide implications because both long-term sensitisation and pain are often considered to be maladaptive rather than adaptive; the authors claim this study is the first evidence to support the argument that nociceptive sensitisation is actually an adaptive response to injuries.
_	Mitra's proof that black holes cannot form is based in part on the argument that in order for a black hole to form, the collapsing matter must travel faster than the speed of light with respect to a fixed observer.
_	Taking up the argument that vestments are indifferent, Crowley is clearer than Hooper as he focuses not on indifference in general but indifferent things in the church.
_	Environmental or green accounting is a method of social accounting for formulating and deriving such measures on the argument that an educated valuation is superior to a value of zero (as the implied valuation of environmental assets).
_	Constant Mown disables the Vogon gunner, and uses the argument that their orders are to kill Earthlings and not Nanites (legally two distinct groups, with the latter being taxpaying citizens).
_	His lawyer advanced several arguments against his extradition, including the argument that Burns, having been brought to Oregon as prisoner, had not left California voluntarily in the first place.
_	Senior chaplain officials responded with the argument that atheists were not a religious group and thus did not qualify for such duty.
_	When she retires to her room, Wolverine confronts Jessica about the Skrull body; she convinces him that what she did was right with the argument that it is more important then their problems with Iron Man.
_	For example: a Supreme Court justice deliberating on whether or not the denial to homosexuals of the ability to marry constitutes a violation of the 14th Amendment's Equal Protection Clause may not advert to his religious convictions on the matter, but he may take into account the argument that a same-sex household provides sub-optimal conditions for a child's development.
_	Although there are legal documents that can help protect medical and financial security (power of attorney, living will, medical power of attorney), these could have been contested in court based on the argument that they recognize a domestic legal union between the two parties.
_	He states that the argument that "Operation Vistula was the revenge for the slaughter of Poles by the Ukrainian Insurgent Army" in 1943–1944, was "fallacious and ethically inadmissible," as it invoked "the principle of collective guilt."
_	Ripley however dismissed Requa with the argument that such a weapon would consume expensive ammunition at such a rate that it would cause logistical problems.
_	There is also the argument that girls should feel like they are able to play football whenever they want, and having to have a special spectacle just for female students to participate in a male-dominated sport is a mockery of the abilities of female athletes.
_	James Beilby has argued that the purpose of Plantinga's "Warrant" trilogy, and specifically of his "Warranted Christian Belief", is firstly to make a form of argument against religion impossible—namely, the argument that whether or not Christianity is true, it is irrational—so "the skeptic would have to shoulder the formidable task of demonstrating the falsity of Christian belief" rather than simply dismiss it as irrational.
_	The novel advances the argument that, had Jesus succumbed to any such temptation, especially the opportunity to save himself from the cross, his life would have held no more significance than that of any other philosopher.
_	For his part, the journalist mounted his defense based on the argument that he was only repeating what was said by Fernández.
_	Pat Padua of "The Washington Post" positively reviewed the series and said, ""The Witness" makes an encouraging case for the argument that society is not as apathetic as we fear.
_	Neither the District Court nor the Court of Appeals considered the argument that Mid Atlantic's claim was not "appropriate" apart from the contention that it was not "equitable," and from our examination of the record it does not appear that the Sereboffs raised this distinct assertion below.
_	The CAA concludes that a severe reduction in GA would give "some merit to the argument that pilot recruitment would be threatened", but that the data on flying hours "does not support such a gloomy outlook."
_	The symptoms of the tumor quickly disappear, and defense lawyers are able to have him freed on the argument that his criminal behavior was caused solely by the brain tumor.
_	He rejected the argument that section 46 denied "equality before the law" and found that the Act was a perfectly valid exercise of Parliament's authority to create legislation.
_	The IMBOK is based on the argument that there are six areas of required management competency, two of which (“business process management” and “business information management”) are very closely related.
_	Intrinsic properties are fundamental in understanding Kantian deontological ethics, which is based upon the argument that an action should be viewed on its intrinsic value (the value of the action in itself) with regard to ethics and morality, as opposed to consequentialist utilitarian arguments that an action should be viewed by the value of its outcomes.
_	Even though there is no direct function for the colour black in this case, protection was denied under the argument that consumers prefer it for aesthetic purposes.
_	Moreover, the argument that the exam is legitimate, but would be charging a very high level of legal knowledge, similar to competitions such as the judiciary or prosecutors, absolutely unfounded.
_	According to "The Washington Post", "the numbers do not bear out the argument that the sisters have been repressed."
_	Contrary to this position, however, is the argument that every figure (except the standing figure in the centre of the Chicago recto) is a drawing of the emperor.
_	Cynewulf of Lindisfarne (d. c. 780) is a plausible candidate for Cynewulf the poet, based on the argument that the poet's elaborate religious pieces must lend themselves to "the scholarship and faith of the professional ecclesiastic speaking with authority", but this conclusion is not universally accepted.
_	This overlap supports the argument that the model depicts the developing of a single, integrated architecture.
_	His targets denounced Roosevelt for trying to take over the Democratic party and to win reelection, using the argument that they were independent.
_	The judge accepted the argument that Mr Anker's actions were founded in the ancient right of "self help" and that as the use of a car park space was a valuable commodity being prevented from using it as the result of the presence of a trespasser therefore incurred a loss.
_	Growing pressure led the CJLS to adopt a motion that females may be counted as part of a quorum, based on the argument that only the "Shulchan Aruch" explicitly stated that it consist of men.
_	Especially famous for helping to revive virtue ethics in his book "After Virtue", MacIntyre revises Aristotelianism with the argument that the highest temporal goods, which are internal to human beings, are actualized through participation in social practices.
_	Drawing on the depth, power, and histories of African mythologies, spiritualities, and naturalisms, Kahiu has made the argument that African peoples and cultures have been engaging in afrofuturistic thought for centuries, if not longer.
_	Despite strong criticisms of Singlish, linguist David Yoong has put forward the argument that "Singaporeans who subscribe to Singlish and have a positive attitude towards the code see Singlish as a language that transcends social barriers" and that the language can be used to "forge rapport and, perhaps more importantly, the Singaporean identity".
_	This may not be helpful: it is based on the argument that the hamadryas baboon is behaviorally and physically distinct from other baboon species, and that this reflects a separate evolutionary history.
_	Til illustrated this alleged inconsistency as a child, elevated on the father's knee, reaching up to slap his face, and Bahnsen used the analogy of a man breathing out air to make the argument that air doesn't exist.
_	The investigation into this matter by the Greek organization for communications privacy was closed with the argument that if this investigation would carry on, the information revealed would be dangerous for the national
_	Christopher Newton makes the argument that Hankin was the comic bridge between Wilde and Noël Coward.
_	When asked in 2011 about the argument that the fight for same-sex marriage is the modern-day equivalent of the civil rights struggle, Barron answered, "I don't consider it the civil-rights issue of our time.
_	Postmodern feminism's major departure from other branches of feminism is perhaps the argument that sex, or at least gender is itself constructed through language, a view notably propounded in Judith Butler's 1990 book, "Gender Trouble".
_	Increasing the bargaining power of residents has been proposed, on the argument that they would then choose the best training programs.
_	There is some evidence for the argument that modern humans left Africa at least 125,000 years ago using two different routes: through the Nile Valley heading to the Middle East, at least into modern Israel (Qafzeh: 120,000–100,000 years ago); and a second one through the present-day Bab-el-Mandeb Strait on the Red Sea (at that time, with a much lower sea level and narrower extension), crossing it into the Arabian Peninsula, settling in places like the present-day United Arab Emirates (125,000 years ago) and Oman (106,000 years ago) and then possibly going into the Indian Subcontinent (Jwalapuram: 75,000 years ago).
_	There is also the argument that their brother Charles Houchin, who was known as a great hunter and trapper, was the man who shot that bear and chased it into the cave.
_	In August 2017, a Louisiana Judge dismissed the case with the argument that the court had no jurisdiction over the embryos, which were conceived in California.
_	The court held that the argument that the memorandum of agreement had to be signed, at least by the applicant, if not by both parties, before a contract of lease came into existence, could not be upheld.
_	Similarly, in "United States v. Buras", the argument that the taxpayer can be subject to the federal income tax only if he benefits from a "privilege extended by a government agency" was ruled to be without merit.
_	The experts ultimately decide that while workmanship is important, the ability to follow instructions correctly is even more vital (especially given that the argument that ultimately saw the Purple Team expelled started out over Steve's refusal to follow the instructions), and thus the Pink Team become the first to be named the best for a second time, something that visibly disgruntles the other teams.
_	Pius took issue with the argument that abstinence is an impossibly heroic act.
_	In the Great Depression of the 1930s, when unemployment rose to 20–30% of the working population in many countries, people generally believed it was involuntary, but if unemployment levels are relatively low, the argument that unemployment is a matter of choice is more often heard.
_	The use of the term “logos” indicates that Justin likely drew upon prior philosophical teachings, but Justin makes the argument that these teachings represent only partial truth because they possess and are connected with only part of the overall logos.
_	Though widely dismissed by Rutgers 1000 supporters as a logical fallacy the argument that having a very visible football program increases the donations to the athletic department and even the university as a whole is made by some Scarlet R supporters.
_	This pyramid was most likely the burial place for Itzam K'an Ahk II, and—seeing as how Ha' K'in Xook, Yo'nal Ahk III, and K'inich Yat Ahk II all revered the site as a dynastic shrine—it is further evidence to back the argument that Ha' K'in Xook was the son of Itzam K'an Ahk II.
_	Germany's demand to have Bamberski extradited to stand trial for the kidnapping was rejected in 2009 by a court in Toulouse with the argument that Bamberski would be tried in France.
_	Building on the argument that Holmes changed his mind, scholars have claimed not only that the dissent in "Abrams" expressed a different and more liberal understanding of the First Amendment, but that the "Abrams" dissent set the standard for modern First Amendment jurisprudence.
_	While generally known as Old Gujarati, some scholars prefer the name of Old Western Rajasthani, based on the argument that Gujarati and Rajasthani were not distinct at the time.
_	Unlike Bellamy who praised the idea of elites implementing policies, Hayek makes the argument that socialism inherently leads to tyranny, claiming that “[i]n order to achieve their ends, the planners must create power – power over men wielded by other men – of a magnitude never before known.
_	This connects with the argument that the pursuit of self-interest is self-defeating.
_	Polycrates' letter has been used as proof against the argument that the Churches in Asia Minor accepted the authority of the bishops at Rome.
_	That crucial clause was not in Iturbide's Plan de Iguala, a point against the argument that Iturbide entertained the notion of becoming the ruler when he started his campaign for Mexico's independence.
_	NhRP argued that the fact that a chimpanzee is not a human being should not prevent the argument that it is a legal person with a habeas corpus right to liberty.
_	However, it could be seen as a variation of the very same naturalistic fallacy; the difference between them could be considered pragmatical, depending on the intentions of that who uses it: naturalistic fallacy if he wants to justify existing social practices with the argument that they are natural; moralistic fallacy if he wants to combat existing social practices with the argument of denying that they are natural.
_	Thus, the argument that Max's final speech is a Communist promotion is not supported by the texts in the novel (Kinnamon 96).
_	The pervasive emphasis of death and apotheosis has led to the argument that the whole complex became overwhelmingly funerary in character from this point, and that the memorial references generated by Romulus extend, spatially and ideologically, to the heart of Rome.
_	She makes the argument that intentions are understood (coded) at a more complex level of neural activity than that of individual neurons.
_	Volokh concludes by claiming that the analysis in his article "implicitly rebuts the argument that slippery slope arguments are inherently logically fallacious: the claim that A's will inevitably lead to B's as a matter of logical compulsion might be mistaken, but the more modest claim that A's may make B's more likely seems plausible."
_	A corollary to the Fermi paradox—"nobody else is doing it"—is the argument that, because no evidence of alien colonization technology exists, it is statistically unlikely to even be possible to use that same level of technology ourselves.
_	Reviewing the Macintosh version, a "Next Generation" critic commented that "There is some substance to the argument that pinball is not a game meant for the monitor, but "3-D Ultra Pinball" works, and it works very well."
_	Authors Alyson J.K. Bailes, Bradley A. Thayer, and Baldur Thorhallsson make the argument that small states differ from larger states in how they form alliances in their article "Alliance theory and alliance 'Shelter': the complexities of small state alliance behavior".
_	The political and economic weakness of Germany was emphasized by its new Weimar government, which effectively made the argument that it would be unable to maintain the specified payment schedule.
_	Another method which can be used is based on the argument that we can restructure the tree on our way down the access path instead of making a second pass.
_	In resonance, but in a different critical direction, while applying the concept of Hyper-real religion to Hinduism, Scheifinger makes the argument that Hyper-real Religion is a Western construction.
_	The argument that the Internal Revenue Service is not an agency of the United States government, the argument that the IRS is a private-sector corporation, the argument that the IRS is an agency of some state or territory without authority to administer the internal revenue laws, and variations of these arguments, have been officially identified as legally frivolous Federal tax return positions for purposes of the $5,000 frivolous tax return penalty imposed under Internal Revenue Code section 6702(a).
_	Miller dismissed the argument that the Act was proper under the Indian Commerce Clause, noting that the case did not present a commerce issue.
_	James Madison, often referred to as "The Father of the Constitution", strongly opposed the argument that secession was permitted by the Constitution.
_	While Susser's discussion centers on healthcare as a positive right, Paul Hunt refutes this view and makes the argument that the right to health also encompasses certain negative rights such as a protection from discrimination and the right to not receive medical treatment without the recipient's voluntary consent.
_	Crick's book "The Astonishing Hypothesis" made the argument that neuroscience now had the tools required to begin a scientific study of how brains produce conscious experiences.
_	In the 1960s, Michel Foucault renewed the argument that moral treatment had really been a new form of moral oppression, replacing physical oppression, and his arguments were widely adopted within the antipsychiatry movement.
_	Recently however, Paterson et al. propose to remove "Buenaspis" from the order Nektaspida entirely, on the argument that it lacks the 'waist' that is a common feature in "Liwia", "Soomaspis", "Tariccoia", "Misszhouia", "Pseudonaraoia" and "Naraoia".
_	Another case that has been cited for the argument that wages are not taxable is the United States Supreme Court decision in "Colonial Pipeline Co. v. Traigle".
_	For many years, Hugh Nibley, for instance, preferred the argument that the Sensen text has two meanings: one that can be determined by standard translation (a "literal translation"), and another (a "secret meaning") that can only be divined, possibly with the help of a tool like the Urim and Thummim or one of the seer stone's that Joseph Smith purportedly used to translate the Book of Mormon.
_	Kennan agreed the argument that the Soviets even had a world design after Stalin's death, being far more concerned with maintaining control of their own bloc.
_	Upon hearing of his father's death, Cyrus the Younger declared his claim to the throne, based on the argument that he was born to Darius and Parysatis after Darius had ascended to the throne, while Artaxerxes was born prior to Darius II gaining the throne .
_	The Government raised the argument that the Lanham Act should be classified as a Government Subsidy and therefore exempt from the strict scrutiny requirement.
_	Some anti-intentionalism, such as that of Ned Block, is based on the argument that phenomenal conscious experience or qualia is also a vital component of consciousness, and that it is not intentional.
_	Some objections were based on the argument that Lala Lajpat Rai, Bal Gangadhar Tilak, Bipin Chandra Pal, Aurobindo Ghosh, and Bhagat Singh had been wrongly described as "militants".
_	Yagi is the creator of this film, with the argument that people must respect each other's food culture, and that cetacean meat has been lean meat provided for years in Japanese culture.
_	All five judges upheld the appeal on the ground that the French authorities had no intention to try him at this stage; four of the judges also upheld the argument that the European Arrest Warrant prohibited surrendering Mr Bailey to France because the alleged offence occurred outside French territory and there was an absence of reciprocity.
_	Lord Reid, giving the leading judgment, rejected the argument that there was no precedent for the claim, instead acknowledging "a steady trend towards regarding the law of negligence as depending on principle so that, when a new point emerges, one should ask not whether it is covered by authority but whether recognised principles [from "Donoghue"] apply to it".
_	Furthermore, Skavdahl considered the argument that the “final rules lack factual or scientific support” and that the opposition is supported by the recent publication of the June 2015 EPA report.
_	Asimov was dismayed over the pardon extended to Nixon by his successor: "I was not impressed by the argument that it has spared the nation an ordeal.
_	It was really a device to introduce the argument that "Wilko" turned primarily on the acceptance of arbitration, a reading he described as "overly narrow", feeling it contradicted what he had written in "Mitsubishi Motors".
_	However, another school of thought believes that his reluctance in sharing power with the Muslim League in the provinces after the 1937 elections with the argument that the Congress Party has achieved majority on its own may have precipitated matters towards partition.
_	He alleges that at $10,000 each, Driver has underpaid him for the jobs—on the argument that it would have cost $15,000 to have Mickey kill Squirrel.
_	The book presents the official position of the People's Republic of China on the legal status of Tibet, i.e. the argument that, in one way or another, Tibet has always been a Chinese domain, roughly from the thirteenth century.
_	Books that have made the argument that the United States followed unilaterism instead of isolationism include Walter A. McDougall's "Promised Land, Crusader State" (1997), John Lewis Gaddis's "Surprise, Security, and the American Experience" (2004), and Bradley F. Podliska's "Acting Alone" (2010).
_	Tax protesters also cite the U.S. Supreme Court case of "Butcher's Union Co. v. Crescent City Co." for the argument that an income tax should not be imposed on labor, sometimes quoting the following language:
_	Those in favor of an age limit made the argument that players entering the league out of high school did not know the fundamentals of playing professional basketball and also were not mature enough to handle playing in the NBA.
_	The dissent also relied on the argument that past cases including Robertson v. Thomson Corp. had held that the transfer of "any interest in the right by licence" as mentioned in section 13(4) was more than a simple permission but in fact amounted to a property right.
_	Firstly, it presents a theory that science changes due to an accumulation of observations and improvement in experimental techniques and methodology; secondly, it puts forward the argument that the popularity of science in 17th-century England and the religious demography of the Royal Society (English scientists of that time were predominantly Puritans or other Protestants) can be explained by a correlation between Protestantism and the scientific values.
_	al-Hawari put forward the argument that the Arab states did not want the refugees, would not assimilate them and that masses of refugees living on the cease fire lines, stateless and impoverished would give Israel nothing but grief.
_	They sought the assistance of William F. Buckley, Jr. (himself once in the CIA) in authoring "New Lies for Old", which advanced the argument that the USSR planned to fake its collapse to lull its enemies into a false sense of victory, but Buckley refused.
_	The Court rejected the argument that §119 incorporated the doctrinal exclusion for benefits that were noncompensatory (or "for the convenience of the employer") under lower court and administrative rulings.
_	In addition, Regan rejects the idea of contractarianism, as he makes the argument that children are "unable to sign contracts and lack rights".
_	Furthermore, he makes the argument that if he were to approach animal rights through a contractarianism, when somebody kicks your dog, it is morally wrong because it upsets you but not the dog.
_	Carl Pilcher, who leads NASA's Astrobiology Institute commented that "The discovery of glycine in a comet supports the idea that the fundamental building blocks of life are prevalent in space, and strengthens the argument that life in the Universe may be common rather than rare."
_	Given that the matching vocabulary and astronomical content is drawn from throughout Polynesia, far afield from Easter Island, this supports the argument that rongorongo was not a recent, localized development; rather it was a product of thriving Polynesian trade and cultural interaction throughout the Pacific.
_	Early on, an analogy is made describing how humans once displaced horses from their jobs (by creating mechanical muscles such as automobiles), dismissing the argument that humans will always find new work, seeing as horses are not nearly as much used now.
_	In particular, Bonolio's paper (2003) "Kant’s Explication and Carnap’s Explication: The Redde Rationem", and Maher's (2007) "Explication defended", add weight to the argument that explication is an appropriate methodology for formal philosophy.
_	The Choctaw memorial also established the argument that Natives and white American shared similar political values and ideologies of liberty, equality, etc.
_	I know the argument that you should only own your best 30 or 40 ideas, but I've never proven over time that I actually know in advance what those are".
_	There is evidence to support the argument that women receive such perceived traits or skills in a non-formal and independent setting.
_	Both Bloomberg and the Times noted that the FEC had accepted the argument that the eighteen percent rate was equivalent to the early withdrawal penalty that Napolitano was subject to by withdrawing $150,000 from her employee retirement fund and then loaning those funds to her campaign.
_	Thus, the argument that the horns functioned in digging is not supported by the morphology or the evolutionary progression.
_	Firstly, it presents a theory that science changes due to an accumulation of observations and improvement in experimental technique and methodology; secondly, it puts forward the argument that the popularity of science in 17th-century England and the religious demography of the Royal Society (English scientists of that time were predominantly Puritans or other Protestants) can be explained by a correlation between Protestantism and the scientific values.
_	Since the argument that controls PRO in (1a) is the subject, this is called subject control, and PRO is co-indexed with its antecedent "John", As shown in (2a), it is also possible to have object control, where the argument that controls PRO is the object of the main clause, and PRO is co-indexed with its antecedent "Bill".
_	Plotinus offers a version of the argument that Kant calls "The Achilles of Rationalist Psychology".
_	To the argument that the application of this standard of commercial honesty would be fatal to most company prospectuses, he observed drily: "So much the better".
_	The Federal Circuit rejected the conclusion of district court Judge Pfaelzer that the claims were abstract, and rejected the argument that the claims are directed to "the concepts of organizing data into a logical table with identified columns and rows where one or more rows are used to store an index or information defining columns."
_	Responding to the argument that the crime did not constitute "hiraba" because no money was taken and no weapons used, Ibn 'Arabi replied indignantly that ""hirabah" with the private parts" is much worse than "hiraba" involving the taking of money, and that anyone would rather be subjected to the latter than the former.
_	They also made the argument that the Equal Protection Clause in the 14th Amendment was being violated since not all similarly situated people were being treated the same.
_	These past examples of theatre artists integrating their modern technology with theatre strengthens the argument that theatrical entertainment does not have to be either purist involving only “live” actors on stage, or be consumed by the dominant televisual mass media, but can gain from the strengths of both types of communication.
_	Catholic attacks on this concept have been based on the argument that it is incoherent.
_	Sistrunk and McDavid made the argument that women conformed more because of a methodological bias.
_	The Executive Council approved Tramways' plan to relocate its depots to Sai Wan Ho and Sai Ying Pun in July 1986, on the argument that the HK$3.5 million in operating costs would be saved.
_	As languages like French, German, and English became more widely known, use of a 'difficult' auxiliary language seemed unnecessary—while the argument that Latin could expand readership beyond a single nation was fatally weakened if, in fact, Latin readers did not compose a majority of the intended audience.
_	All of these right hemisphere features are more prominent for signed languages than spoken languages, hence the argument that signed languages engage the right hemisphere more than spoken languages.
_	Joe L. Kincheloe in "Understanding the New Right and its Impact on Education" (1983) made the argument that the actions of Kanawha County School Board Member Alice Moore and her fundamentalist Christian allies in the 1974 controversy represented a defining moment in not only educational politics but American political history as well.
_	Nationalisation includes, amongst others, the argument that entities should be either private or public, and that the objectives of public entities should differ significantly from that of private entities.
_	He presented the argument that while a computer may be able to manipulate the symbols that we give it, the machine could attach no meaning to these symbols.
_	As for the armed forces of the North Vietnamese and National Front for the Liberation of South Vietnam (NLF), American readers rarely encountered the argument that the communists were waging a war of reunification rather than "a campaign to further the interests of a communist conspiracy masterminded by the People's Republic of China and the Soviet Union."
_	Opponents of the tower used the argument that "a tower would cost money and would only be good to look at, not to use".
_	The weight of long-standing practice could not be ignored, stated the Chief Justice, and served to bolster the argument that the usage of the pardon power was not incorrect.
_	Carl Pilcher, who leads the NASA Astrobiology Institute commented that "The discovery of glycine in a comet supports the idea that the fundamental building blocks of life are prevalent in space, and strengthens the argument that life in the universe may be common rather than rare."
_	In his essays, Ehrenfels began with the argument that men are not naturally monogamous, and that monogamy was something that had come to Europe with Christianity.
_	"IQ and Global Inequality" is follow-up to their 2002 book "IQ and the Wealth of Nations", an expansion of the argument that international differences in current economic development are due in part to differences in average national intelligence as indicated by national IQ estimates, and a response to critics.
_	We achieve this by eliminating half of the codewords from the code with the argument that the proof for the decoding error probability holds for at least half of the codewords.
_	The cabinet unanimously advised Adams to refuse, but he instead granted the pardon, using as justification the argument that the men had instigated a mere riot as opposed to a rebellion.
_	Because the architects who had promoted Japonesque architecture had lost their political influence, they were unable to counter the argument that Japonesque architecture represented fascism.
_	Its rationale hinged on the argument that the house and its inner workings were no different from that of a restaurant or even a milliner’s shop.
_	He used the term to describe the argument that judicial review is illegitimate because it allows unelected judges to overrule the lawmaking of elected representatives, thus undermining the will of the majority.
_	Urquhart made the argument that sentencing someone to the death penalty is an arduous process that drags the victim's family through judicial mud.
_	The arbitrator based his decision on the argument that the governor was within his rights to make the layoffs.
_	This notion rests on the argument that the signifier only has an arbitrary relationship to the signified) — in other words, that there is nothing about the sound or appearance of (verbal) signifiers (as, for example, the words "dog" or "chien") — to suggest what they signify.
_	On appeal from the panel, the full First Circuit Court of Appeals affirmed, rejecting the argument that §706(a) gives a Chapter 7 debtor an absolute right to convert to Chapter 13.
_	Other MDs opposed the ban stating that the, "trauma of the operation remains with the girl for the rest of her life..."[disputing] the argument that the procedure prevents women from "moral deviation," and argued that it is not, "a legitimate medical practice, and when it is conducted by untrained people it frequently results in infection and other medical problems..."
_	They say they want to give a voice to all the people affected by the cuts, and to demonstrate to Westminster that the public rejects the argument that there is no alternative.
_	Some people dismiss ROC (treating it as income) with the argument that the full cash is received and reinvested (by the business or by the shareholder receiving it).
_	However, reviewer Gail Whiteman is unconvinced by the argument that naked greed and market forces will drive businesses to cut their greenhouse gas emissions.
_	Judge Lynne A. Battaglia wrote a dissenting opinion stating that the statutes and ordinances in Maryland barring discrimination based on sexual orientation, in addition to the state's lack of prohibiting LGBT adoption and its recognition of same-sex couples as co-parents, support the argument that denying committed same-sex couples the full benefits and privileges of marriage is not related to any rational government interest.
_	In 1978, psychologist Martha L. Rogers wrote an article ("Fascinating Womanhood as a Regression in the Emotional Maturation of Women") positing the argument that women who follow the book's teachings were doing so out of a fear of being self-actualized individuals.
_	Functional analysis of stone tools – a term given to a variety of approaches designed with the aim of identifying the use of a stone tool – is based on the argument that the uses to which tools were put in antiquity leave diagnostic damage and/or polish on their working edges.
_	Such marketing was not always appreciated on aesthetic grounds with the argument that the decorated versions of various sorts related poorly to Sarpaneva's refined shapes, and that "Suomi" was extraordinary only in plain white.
_	During the lawsuit, the Long Island Rail Road defense relied on the argument that the Montaukett had lost their cultural identity because of intermarriage; they did not understand that the Montauk and other tribes could absorb newcomers, and that their children were raised to identify as Montauk regardless of mixed race.
_	Indian government, however, from 1962 onward, forwarded the argument that border should be based on the ridge lines of the mountain Om Parvat.
_	Oxford biologist John Odling-Smee (1988) was the first person to coin the term 'niche construction', and the first to make the argument that ‘niche construction’ and ‘ecological inheritance’ should be recognized as evolutionary processes.
_	To the argument that it would be anomalous to recognise two different jurisdictions within the one country, Barry referred to the case of "Mostyn v Fabrigas".
_	Paul's statement in Romans 4:6, that God "imputes righteousness apart from works," is the basis for the fourth step in the argument that this righteousness of Christ is imputed to the believer's account.
_	In the wake of the killings, some Twitter users made the argument that "not all men" are like this, or would commit such crimes.
_	Plotinus makes the argument that specific stars influencing one's fortune (a common Hellenistic theme) attributes irrationality to a perfect universe, and invites moral turpitude.
_	These doubts initially took the form of the so-called "Zeus Problem," or the argument that the playwright who demonstrated such piety toward Zeus in "The Suppliants" and "Agamemnon" could not have been the same playwright who, in "Prometheus Bound", inveighs against Zeus for violent tyranny.
_	A discrepancy of one calendar cycle would push the date of the battel of Femen forward to the year 530, which ... would lend weight to the argument that it was the son or sons of Coirpre, and not Coirpre himself who defeated the Ui Enechglaiss at the battle of Femen.""
_	At Roosevelt's urging, a "cash-and-carry" provision allowing presidential approval of weapons sales to the belligerent nations -- on the condition that the recipients arranged for the transport and paid immediately with cash, with the argument that this would not draw the U.S. into the conflict -- had been inserted into the Neutrality Act of 1937, which was passed when war clouds were looming over Europe and the Sino-Japanese conflict was already underway, and after the provision officially lapsed in 1939, it was re-inserted into the follow-up Neutrality Act of 1939.
_	Indeed, neither our report nor that of Memorial includes any evidence to support the argument that Azerbaijani forces obstructed the flight of, or fired on Azeri civilians".
_	If collection of zakat by force was not possible, use of military force to extract it was seen as justified, as was done by Abu Bakr during the Ridda Wars, on the argument that refusing to submit to just orders is a form of treason.
_	Maylender, who backed the governor, was attacked by Tivadar Batthyány with the argument that since it was Maylender who created Autonomism and championed the struggle against Banffy he should have been among the first to react.
_	"Somebody at the Non-Aligned Nations Conference advanced the argument that the era of classical colonialism is gone and dead...contrary to facts."
_	Conceding the argument that money has an intrinsic value is potentially a greater act of disbelief”.
_	In the argument that follows, Harry suffers from what he believes is another heart attack, but he is told by the young ER physician, Dr. Martinez, who treats him like her father, that it was only a panic attack.
_	The "Memoirs "contain all of the elements that continue to characterize conspiracy narratives today, including the argument that a hidden group is orchestrating world events behind the scenes, and an attempt to construct a direct lineage from the past to the present.
_	Third, the Court rejected the argument that the federal government could not bring suit on behalf of the tribe.
_	The court first rejected the argument that a person has an absolute right to the unique products of their body, as his products were not unique, as the cells are "no more unique to Moore than the number of vertebrae in the spine or the chemical formula of hemoglobin."
_	Hoyle and Wickramasinghe have advanced the argument that various outbreaks of illnesses on Earth are of extraterrestrial origins, including the 1918 flu pandemic and certain outbreaks of polio and mad cow disease.
_	Applying the above principles to the case in point, the court dismissed the argument that the appellants had a legitimate expectation on the ground that the various statements made by government officials regarding the allocation of fishing quotas did not amount to statements which were "clear, unambiguous and devoid of relevant qualification."
_	In order to do so, Teo has made the argument that psychology needs to draw on the psychological humanities (including history, philosophy, political theory, science and technology studies, etc.) to understand human mental life .
_	Commenting upon the 2018 bill criminalizing such expressions (see ), Israeli politician Yair Lapid justified the expression "Polish death camps" with the argument that "hundreds of thousands of Jews were murdered without ever meeting a German soldier".
_	Justice Scalia filed a dissent that included the argument that the regulation falls under "Chevron deference," introduced by "Chevron U.S.A., Inc. v. Natural Resources Defense Council, Inc."
_	Emeritus Professor Victor Prescott has claimed Richardson "brilliantly demolished the argument that Java la Grande show(s) the east coast of Australia."
_	Previously it was widely considered that this incident took place at Attanagalla in Gampaha district now most scholars have raised the argument that this must be the place that it really took place.
_	Despite its closing, Venetian Macao resort owner Las Vegas Sands Corp. claimed, "Using Las Vegas as a benchmark, "Zaia"’s 3 1/2-year run should be deemed successful and provide strong support for the argument that the future of entertainment in Macau is on the right track."
_	On 26 October 2009, Pope Benedict XVI modified canon law to clarify the distinction between deacons and priests, noting that only the latter act "in the person of Christ", that the diaconate and priesthood are specific ministries rather than stages the sacrament of order, thereby ending the argument that women can not be deacons because they can not be priests.
_	The end result of this inquiry is that there are certain fundamental antinomies in human Reason, most particularly that there is a complete inability to favor on the one hand the argument that all behavior and thought is determined by external causes, and on the other that there is an actual "spontaneous" causal principle at work in human behavior.
_	She described the argument that the accident had been staged as requiring someone to have inflicted head injuries after the phone call to Erics, placed Duggan on the road, inflicted damage to two cars, scattered debris, and created skid marks, all without attracting attention.
_	Although the scope of the power was the subject of submissions in "Plaintiff S156" (the PNG solution case), the Court's finding that the law was supported by the Aliens power made it unnecessary to consider the argument that the "Migration Act" 1958 when it relates to cancelling an Absorbed person visa was not supported by the Immigration power.
_	This supports the argument that blocking all retinal activity prevents eye-specific projection formation remains to be determined.
_	J. Devrecker has offered the argument that the elements in his name ought to be set out as Gaius Messalla Vipstanus Gallus.
_	Dr. Aviad Bakshi, who was also a member in the IZS constitution team, published an article in which he stated that in practice Arabic is not the official language in Israel nowadays, and therefore the argument that the proposal would harm the status of the Arabic language is not valid.
_	Marat's entry contained many radical ideas, including the argument that society should provide fundamental (natural) needs, such as food and shelter, if it expected all its citizens to follow its (civil) laws, that the king was no more than the "first magistrate" of his people, that there should be a common death penalty regardless of class, and that each town should have a dedicated ""avocat" "des" pauvres" and set up independent criminal tribunals with twelve-man juries to ensure a fair trial.
_	Price raised a furor of opposition so in 1777 he wrote another tract that clarified his position and again restated the "de facto" basis for the argument that the "liberty of men as agents is that power of self-determination which all agents, as such, possess."
_	She centered her campaign around the argument that Jefferson's corruption scandal left New Orleans with a lack of credible and respected representation in Congress.
_	It also rejected suggestions that the proposed meticulous reconstruction would be an unauthentic 'Disney' replica, drawing attention to the fact that most centuries-old stone buildings are, by dint of aging and repair, at least partial reconstructions; and that the argument that the present time can only represent itself in its own architectural language, is simply ideology.
_	It held the UK had consulted widely before legislating, the court recognized the legitimacy of limiting political advertising on television, acknowledging the argument that there was a "risk of distortion" of public debate by wealthy groups having unequal access to advertising, and accepted that the ban was not a ban on free speech given that other methods of communication were available.
_	Dubos is often attributed as the author of the popular maxim "Think Globally, Act Locally" that refers to the argument that global environmental problems can turn into action only by considering ecological, economic, and cultural differences of our local surroundings.
_	Many have made the argument that Native American mascots focus on bravery, courage and fighting skills rather than anything derogatory.
_	The second was to present the argument that the language spoken by the local population had no relation upon their national affiliations.
_	However, he considers "Karl Marx and the Close of His System" to be the best statement of the argument that the fact that the law of value is not directly controlling in capitalist production requires the rejection of the theory of value.
_	He then abruptly declares to Pecksniff that he wants to marry Merry, and jilts Cherry - not without demanding an additional 1,000 pounds on top of the 4,000 that Pecksniff had promised him as Cherry's dowry, with the argument that Cherry has better chances for matchmaking.
_	Looney also introduced the argument that the reference to the "ever-living poet" in the 1609 dedication to Shakespeare's sonnets implied that the author was dead at the time of publication.
_	However, their opposition to the reforms was based on the argument that no similar provisions would be applied for the Muslims on the claim that they weren't sufficiently advanced.
_	Following a prolonged debate, the United States managed to convince the United Nations to remove Puerto Rico from the Commission's scope with the argument that a new status -in association by mutual agreement [and] invested with political sovereignty – had been reached.
_	Griffin’s paper, “End Products of Historic Sites Archaeology”, made the argument that “archaeology was merely a body of methods and techniques for the recovery of information, and that the archaeologist often served as a technician in projects designed by persons from other disciplines”.
_	His request was refused with the argument that since his parents had not been recorded as ethnic Romanians in their birth and marriage certificates, it was impossible for him to be recorded as an ethnic Romanian.
_	Countering the argument that widespread abstinence would lead to a cessation of the human race, he describes chastity as an ideal that provides guidance and direction, not as a firm rule.
_	He advances the argument that because biological systems are the products of (an ongoing) natural selection, the mechanisms are not necessarily optimal in an obvious sense.
_	The Court rejected the argument that the international community itself (or countries which can be said to have been historically high emitters of carbon dioxide or other greenhouse gases) were the “persecutor” for the purposes of the Refugee Convention.
_	Dawkins writes about his attendance at a conference in Cambridge sponsored by the Templeton Foundation, where he challenged the theologians present to respond to the argument that a creator of a complex universe would have to be complex and improbable.
_	He decided that the argument that the wall's purpose was to defend Israel was “a lie.”
_	Therefore, the argument that Djedefre enjoyed a short reign because his pyramid was unfinished is somewhat discredited.
_	Carbon dating and the absence of pig bones strengthen the argument that Qeiyafa is She'aryaim and not a Canaanite fortress.
_	By the 20th century, theories had also been proposed that Jesus was black, but not necessarily a descendant of any specific black African ethnicity, e.g. based on the argument that the ancient Israelites, as a group, were in whole or part originally a black people.
_	Similarly, in "United States v. Sloan", the taxpayer's contention — that he is "not a citizen of the United States, but rather, that he is a freeborn, natural individual, a citizen of the State of Indiana, and a 'master'—not 'servant'—of his government" — was ruled to be not a legal ground for the argument that the taxpayer was not subject to the federal tax laws; the tax evasion conviction was upheld by the United States Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit.
_	He called the argument that "Windsor"'s use of the phrase "careful consideration" meant intermediate or heightened scrutiny amounted to "intellectual anarchy".
_	The case has been cited (unsuccessfully) in such cases as "Hill v. United States" and "Cameron v. Internal Revenue Service, in support of the argument that a tax on an individual's income is unconstitutional, even though the decision in Stratton did not rule either corporate or individual income tax unconstitutional.
_	Rowlinson invokes the Marxist theorist Louis Althusser's extension of the argument that ideology is ahistorical, finding that Tennyson's poem "comes before an ideological construction for which it nonetheless makes people nostalgic".
_	This was appealed, with the argument that his aunt and uncle were both his legal guardians and Canadian citizens, and Levin was granted an exception.
_	The tablet has been used to support the argument that ancient Macedonian was a Northwest Greek dialect and mainly a Doric dialect.
_	They share the argument that such actions amount to protectionism and competitive devaluation.
_	He further stated that racism required advancing the argument that one race is superior to other races of human beings.
_	The first day at school several of my classmates came around to suggest that of course I was coming out for football; and although I protested that I had never had a ball in my hands, they countered with the argument that I was a good sized lump of a boy and would make a fine prospect.
_	One of the employees fought back in court, with the argument that a "like" should be protected by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution about free speech.
_	In June 1986, a spokesman for the Soviet-backed Jaruzelski regime, Jerzy Urban, revealed Kukliński's existence to the world in order to make the argument that the Reagan administration had been informed by Kukliński of the plans to install martial law but had betrayed the Solidarity movement by not passing that information on to its "friends" in Solidarity.
_	In concluding his opinion, Rix LJ further stated that the argument that:
_	In a 1995 speech before the National Press Club, Lieberman said, "this business of deciding by group, the argument that some make that some groups are genetically less able than others.
_	These coins supply evidence for the argument that Quentovic had an economic resurgence in the 860s and the 870s.
_	However, in response to the argument that Native Americans ought to focus on social issues larger than a team name, Ross stated that "Native people shouldn't be forced to choose between living or racial discrimination.
_	His most important contribution so far is "The Happy Youth of a Desperate Country" ("Zetsubō no Kuni no Kōfuku na Wakamono-tachi"; see short review and further links at ), a best-selling book released by Kodansha in 2011 where Furuichi makes the argument that, regardless of looming problems with the social security system and a host of other societal challenges, Japanese youth (those in their 20s) are now happier than ever before (for details, see ).
_	Politically, the battle invalidated the argument that continuation of the revolutionary Reign of Terror was necessary because of the military threat to France's very existence.
_	The above-mentioned reports are also used to justify the argument that the Islamic market is characterized by free information.
_	The reasons behind the argument that "larger is better" include the reduction in the negative impacts of patch edge effects, the general idea that species richness increases with habitat area and the ability of larger habitats to support greater populations with lower extinction probabilities.
_	The rejection of Bishop Anicetus' position on the Quartodeciman, by Polycarp and later Polycrates' letter to Pope Victor I has been used by Orthodox theologians as proof against the argument that the Churches in Asia Minor accepted the Primacy of the Bishop of Rome and or the teaching of Papal supremacy.
_	Kemppinen's claim was countered by Heikki Ylikangas with the argument that less educated conscripts were more likely to be assigned to the high risk infantry units than more technical field artillery, signals, or technical units which relied on mathematical and literacy skills.
_	In the light of what was known at the time, and increasingly in the light of subsequent events, the argument that the business was not really insolvent at all has, if anything, gained support.
_	In an interview on BBC Radio 4's "Today" Programme on 1 April 2013, the sponsor of the bill Iain Duncan Smith defended the welfare changes with the argument that the new benefits system would encourage people to be in work and reduce overcrowding whilst reducing benefit costs.
_	The Maori gesture of Whakapohane had countered the argument that was aimed at her.
_	Forever 21, a supplier of knock-offs, had been sued for copyright infringement in the past, but this was among the first times that a company used the argument that, in the case of Puma's Fenty Fur Slides, their "wide plush fur strap extending to the base of the sandal" was capable of being represented in another tangible medium, and therefore covered by copyright as separable from the shoe itself.
_	But through their mistakes and repeated rebuffs, the airmen had learned what they were lacking to prove the argument that the Air Corps could perform a unique mission—strategic bombardment—and the real threat of another world war would soon reverse their fortunes.
_	The state has put forward the argument that translocation would break social bonds between members of groups or prides, which are vital for lion survival.
_	In "R. v. Secretary of State for the Home Department, ex parte Hargreaves" (1996), the Court of Appeal of England and Wales initially rejected the argument that the courts could perform a substantive review function beyond that permitted by "Wednesbury" unreasonableness.
_	Syama Prasad Mookerjee, the former Vice-Chancellor of the University of Calcutta and the former Finance Minister of Bengal, dismissed the argument that the Noakhali incidents were ordinary communal riots.
_	The government is using the argument that Afrikaners form only a minority in all municipalities since the ruling African National Congress used a form of gerrymandering to reset the municipal boundaries in 2000.
_	On the argument that such arrangements also enabled packers to more easily conceal potential anti-competitive practices, Congress passed the Livestock Mandatory Reporting Act of 1999 (P.L. 106-78, Title IX).
_	The court approved instead the argument that "a patentee's right to shut off all competition must necessarily include the lesser right to restrict the exercise of the granted privilege so long as the patentee does not attach a condition that enlarges his monopoly beyond that given by the patent statute and the patent itself."
_	In the absence of absolute documentary proof of intent, scholars have also made the argument that the Holodomor was ultimately a consequence of the economic problems associated with radical economic changes implemented during the period of liquidation of private property and Soviet industrialization, combined with the widespread drought of the early 1930s.
_	With autonomous cars, the plaintiff could make the argument that a different design, whether in the physical features of the vehicle or in the software that controls the movements of the vehicle, could have made the vehicle safer.
_	Mack's appeal, which was based on the argument that the judge should have allowed him to withdraw his guilty plea, was heard by the Nevada Supreme Court in 2010, and denied.
_	To counter the argument that mere mental events have no causal efficacy, he uses the example of a wet dream.
_	He argues that Wittgenstein does not reject the argument that leads to the rule-following paradox, but accepts it and offers a "skeptical solution" to alleviate the paradox's destructive effects.
_	The court rejected the argument that the treatments to which Pitcherskaia had been subjected did not constitute persecution because they had been intended to help her, not harm her, stating that "human rights laws cannot be sidestepped by simply couching actions that torture mentally or physically in benevolent terms such as 'curing' or 'treating' the victims."
_	Even more, the fact that Spain aided the colonies in their struggle against Britain weakened the argument that ending allegiance to the mother country could be considered a crime.
_	"The Republic of Guatemala dispenses with the argument that has held about his rights to the territory of Chiapas and Soconusco department."
_	Gould favored the argument that evolution has no inherent drive towards long-term "progress".
_	He put forth the argument that legislative majorities control the veto gates in the legislature which allows them to block unfavorable bills and, thus, allows them to decide what gets voted on and what doesn't.
_	They also note that the argument that the court would not be independent has been disproved by the Supreme Court's willingness to overrule decisions of the Court of Appeal.
_	The court, in delivering its verdict, cautioned against the argument that participation in trade-union activities destroys the trust relationship between employer and employee; such an argument is unacceptable on policy grounds.
_	Furthermore, although the "black drug user" stereotype is heavily associated with young African Americans, recent studies show that African American young people are less likely to use illegal drugs than other racial groups in the U.S. Michelle Alexander furthers the argument that the disproportionate mass incarceration of African Americans in drug-related offenses is caused by racial bias within the criminal justice system, terming this phenomenon as "The New Jim Crow", in a book of the same name.
_	Polygenists reject the argument that human races must belong to a single species because they can interbreed.
_	In the report, Ryan advances the argument that federal antipoverty programs suffer from defects that "penalize families for getting ahead" and that "the complex web of federal programs and sudden drop-off in benefits create extraordinarily high effective marginal tax rates," both of which "reduce the incentive to work".
_	Maaherra lost the case at this level, on the argument that the members of the receiving group had been given an original direction to the writings by selecting and formulating their questions, thus fulfilling the obligation of creative effort required to gain a copyright under U.S. law.
_	Simpson noted that there "are too many places where the inevitable shortage of evidence is circumvented by that familiar device, the argument that although we cannot prove X, neither can we prove not-X, so let us assume X."
_	In response to the argument that no one has the right to take another's life, then-Malaysian Prime Minister Mahathir Mohamad replied, "You should tell that to the drug traffickers."
_	Conservatives at the state and local levels increasingly emphasized the argument that the soaring crime rates indicated a failure of liberal policy in the American cities.
_	Mainstream modern academic opinion strongly favours the argument that the Greek word is related to the cognate , ', ultimately derived from the Akkadian '.
_	Historian David Woods further notes that Zosimus' "Historia Nova" includes a description of Julian punishing cavalry deserters in just such a manner, further strengthening the argument that the author of "The Passion of Sergius and Bacchus" took material from the stories of martyrs of Julian's time rather than that of Galerius.
_	Gene selection provides one explanation for kin selection and eusociality, where organisms act altruistically, against their individual interests (in the sense of health, safety or personal reproduction), namely the argument that by helping related organisms reproduce, a gene succeeds in "helping" copies of themselves (or sequences with the same phenotypic effect) in other bodies to replicate.
_	Committees for the Defense of the French Film were organized to draw attention to the argument that the agreement’s motive was to make France a “free market” for dumping US films.
_	Finally, the Court rejected the argument that not allowing tribes to prosecute nonmembers, those nonmembers would escape prosecution altogether for criminal activity engaged in within tribal boundaries.
_	His contention was premised on the argument that the Privy Council's decisions in the cases following "Ong Ah Chuan" and "Nguyen Tuong Van" did not necessarily have to be followed as the Privy Council "does not dictate human rights standards for the rest of humanity".
_	It is clear that no law of this kind can be effective without a penalty; and the argument that the Courts must therefore be held to have the power to inflict a penalty, wherever the Legislature has intended to create an offence, is of considerable weight.
_	Many other authors followed the argument that civilization had originated in Hamitic Ethiopia, a view that became intermingled with biblical imagery.
_	The state of Pennsylvania sought to invalidate the will, in part on the argument that the bequest would benefit criminal behavior and thus would be "against public policy".
_	The jury appeared to be convinced by the argument that the complainants had chosen to build knowing what trades were carried on there so had no right to complain, and found for the defendant.
_	British–American trade wars had virtually vanished by 1820 and with it the argument that protectionist tariffs were necessary to sustain war industries.
_	Stylistic differences in dialect, rhyme scheme and stanza pattern between the banns (an advertisement for the coming performance that begins the play) and certain sections of the play text lead to the argument that the play may have had two or even three authors.
_	So instead of thinking that these veiled women are being oppressed and need saving, Fernea made the argument that they like the protection of the veil and feel wrong without it.
_	Third, the Massachusetts court said that stun guns could be banned because they were not "readily adaptable to use in the military", but the Supreme Court held that "Heller" rejected the argument that "only those weapons useful in warfare" were protected by the Second Amendment.
_	Field was also at the forefront of the argument that Anglicanism should accept the decrees of the first seven ecumenical councils as binding.
_	The Company then requested that some of the taxes be refunded by the IRS under the argument that the taxes should be paid based on the year that they were supposed to be paid instead of the year they were actually paid.
_	In Croatia, this is often based on the argument that the official language in Yugoslavia, a standardized form of Serbo-Croatian, was "artificial" or a political tool used to combine two distinct people.
_	The point of these examples, as used by Riley and Pagels, is to support the argument that the text of Thomas must have existed and have gained a following at the time of the writing of John's Gospel, and that the importance of the Thomasine logia was great enough that John felt the necessity of weaving them into his own narrative.
_	The story is a fairytale, but features the same trio of gods, Odin, Hœnir and Loki, as in the story of Þjazi in the "Prose Edda", the prose introduction to the Eddic poem Reginsmál, and also the late Icelandic "Huldar saga", which has contributed to the argument that Loki is the same as Lóðurr, who appears elsewhere with Odin and Hœnir.
_	Embodied cognition reflects the argument that the motor system influences our cognition, just as the mind influences bodily actions.
_	On education, he advanced the argument that the current grammar schools lacked provision for the most elementary schooling, to the detriment of the quality of the latter.
_	Defence Lawyer Ron Mansfield's 300 page submission began with the argument that the case should be thrown out because the United States Supreme Court ruled in a parallel case in 1982 that copyright infringement was a civil matter and could not be prosecuted as criminal fraud.
_	The unexpected death of Aaron appears to make the argument that his death is merely an allusion to the mysterious and miraculous death of Moses.
_	The United States Court of Appeals for the Tenth Circuit has rejected the argument that the Internal Revenue Service was not lawfully created.
_	The Court also rejected the argument that the IRS is an agency of the "International Monetary Fund".
_	Its biggest challenges were not centered on the argument that megabats and primates are evolutionarily related, which reflects earlier ideas (such as the grouping of primates, tree shrews, colugos, and bats under the same taxonomic group, the Superorder Archonta).
_	Practitioners often legitimise the incorporation of elements from folk culture into Slavic Native Faith through the argument that Slavic folk practices have long reflected the so-called "double belief" ("dvoeverie"), a conscious preservation of pre-Christian beliefs and practices alongside Christianity.
_	Mitre gave a series of speeches rejecting the agreement, with the argument that the Governor had not been authorized by the House to sign an agreement, and that powers bestowed to the Provisional Director were dictatorial.
_	Ronald Weitzer, a well-known proponent for the legalization/decriminalization of prostitution, stated that the use of nonscientific evidence about prostitution has contributed to a "moral panic" because opponents commonly use the argument that prostitution is inherently violent and unable to be regulated.
_	By 1923, bullet comparison technology had improved somewhat, and Van Amburgh submitted photos of the bullets fired from Sacco's .32 Colt in support of the argument that they matched the bullet that killed Berardelli.
_	In 2017, the U.S. Department of Justice filed an amicus brief in the 2nd U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals making the argument that Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 does not prohibit discrimination against employees who are bisexual or gay.
_	The discovery of a Roman fort around the parish church in Moresby to the south, and fortifications to the north at Risehow (Flimby), Maryport and Crosscannonby support the argument that the coastal wall extended down the whole Solway coast and formed a key part of the empire's defences.
_	Making the argument that Stevens was appointed by the Conference of the Pan-American States and not as a U.S. delegate, FDR agreed to give permanent status to the CIM, if each state was allowed to appoint their own delegates.
_	In "Three Magic Words", Andersen makes the argument that the physical world is derived from the mental.
_	He endorsed Lauritsen's argument that the quality of "Frankenstein" is inconsistent with that of works known to have been written by Mary Shelley, suggesting that the work was not by her, and also credited Lauritsen with refuting the argument that the fact that the surviving parts of the original manuscript of "Frankenstein" are in Mary Shelley's handwriting shows that the work must have been composed by her.
_	Secondly, Marshall refuted the argument that states retain ultimate sovereignty because they ratified the constitution:
_	There is thus some merit to the argument that performance metrics should be developed to suit the particular system being measured.
_	In 1788, Société des Amis Noirs ("Society of the Friends of the Blacks") was founded with the goal of abolishing the slave trade using the argument that slavery was in fact not economically profitable.
_	In it, Sanchez makes the argument that since most Hispanics share core beliefs with the Republican Party (GOP) and represent the fastest growing minority, they should garner more attention.
_	The criticism of the economic policies of Pius IX included the argument that the Pope maintained in Rome large areas for agriculture and forestry at the expense of potential industrial development.
_	According to Tsereteli, the Georgian equivalent of "Assyrians" appears in ancient Georgian, Armenian and Russian documents, making the argument that the nations and peoples to the east and north of Mesopotamia knew the group as Assyrians, while to the West, beginning with Luwian, Hurrian and later Greek influence, the Assyrians were known as Syrians.
_	The list bolsters the argument that Narmer was the founder of the First Dynasty as opposed to being the last of the pre-unification kings of Thinis.
_	Plantinga proposed a "free will defense" in a volume edited by Max Black in 1965, which attempts to refute the logical problem of evil, the argument that the existence of evil is logically incompatible with the existence of an omnipotent, omniscient, wholly good God. Plantinga's argument (in a truncated form) states that "It is possible that God, even being omnipotent, could not create a world with free creatures who never choose evil.
_	Although continuing to influence business thinking, the concept has already been superseded within the service marketing and management literature by the argument that the value of all goods and services is co-created or co-produced through the interaction between consumers and producers.
_	The Association's trump card was the argument that the canal could be a significant shipping route for grain from western Canada, which at that time was having trouble moving eastward due to the odd collection of railway links that all travelled through Toronto.
_	In the opinion of the court the Judge Chester C. Cole makes the argument that separate was not equal because he concluded that the people of color was just a separation of nationality.
_	Copan also believes that belief in God is generally not a psychological crutch, claiming that the argument that Christianity is wish fulfillment itself falls victim to a number of fallacies.
_	Egan explained that both Singer and other men threatened him and his family under the argument that they controlled Hollywood, and that they added:
_	Johnson and Downing stated that these findings supported the argument that deindividuation increases the influence that identity cues have on individuals.
_	The court also rejected the argument that three other statutory provisions, when read together, created a "background sentencing principle" that the court should follow the latest views of Congress and the Sentencing Commission.
_	The book puts forward the argument that Manchester's unique musical heritage is directly traceable to the 1960s beat-boomers who started their own studios, namely Graham Gouldman and Eric Stewart of The Mindbenders; Keith Hopwood and Derek Leckenby of Herman's Hermits.
_	Aristotle makes the argument that when one's own son or land is rightfully one's own, one puts much more effort into cultivating that item, to the ultimate betterment of society.
_	The most precise expression of the argument that international law would guarantee a sovereign Quebec’s right to its current boundaries was given, in 1992, from the Bélanger-Campeau Commission, by a panel of international law experts (Thomas Franck, Rosalyn Higgins, Alain Pellet, Malcolm Shaw, Christian Tomuschat) commissioned by the government of Quebec in the aftermath of the failed Meech Lake Accord.
_	Finally the Court rejected the argument that Congress had authorized the waiting period because Congress does not have the power to authorize violations of the equal protection clause.
_	In 1309, he appointed David as Archbishop of Novgorod and David was instrumental in the argument that led Mikhail to withdraw his lieutenants and cut the grain supplies to the city.
_	The Theravadin counters with the argument that the other aggregates like feeling do not feel themselves and uses similes like a knife that cannot cut itself or a needle that does not pierce itself.
_	The Court then quoted Nova Scotia's Hansard, which reinforced the notion that the provincial government saw Morgentaler's clinics as a "public evil which should be eliminated" and minimized the argument that the law had been meant to combat privatization.
_	It draws heavily from the "Survey of Americans and Economists on the Economy" in making the argument that voters have systematically biased beliefs about many important economic topics.
_	Some legal experts have said that Comey's testimony advanced the argument that Trump attempted to obstruct justice in his dealings with then-FBI Director James Comey.
_	That higher prices make the trade lucrative for criminals is recognized but countered by the argument that capitulating to illicit drug use on these grounds makes no more sense than capitulating to those who continue to traffic in human lives, a more expensive business because of its illegality and therefore more lucrative for the criminal, but necessary for the rights of vulnerable citizens.
_	Fromkin's research helps support the argument that language processing is not modular.
_	Cardinal Sarah rejected the argument that priests celebrating Mass facing the apse, or "ad orientem", are turning their backs on the faithful or "against them".
_	This assessment was supported with the argument that, unusually for Bulgaria, he apparently didn't make any personal profit from his position and indeed left politics as poor as he had entered it.
_	In March 1921, Hawley received a letter of commendation from Major General Leonard Wood, who was then the commander of the VI Corps Area for an excellent report submitted while Hawley was assigned at Camp Grant, Illinois, supporting the argument that his assignments were sequential and not concurrent.
_	However, Marsden justified his actions with the argument that the problem of detecting asteroids needs more attention:
_	He considered the argument that an herbalist should be held to the same standard as a normal NHS doctor, but disagreed.
_	On appeal, the death penalty was commuted to a three-year prison term, a decision which lends weight to the argument that the original judge, Salavati, was swayed more by political than judicial interests.
_	Specifically in terms of Sonnet 136, the term "will" amplifies the argument that "seduction is the resolution to a formal... problem that one content alone (Will) can solve".
_	Although such results are always likely to be controversial, and working intensively with a single animal always incurs the risk of Clever Hans effects, Pepperberg's work has strengthened the argument that humans do not hold the monopoly on the complex or semicomplex use of abstract communication.
_	Only three years prior in 1964, at a time when the national assembly of Czechoslovakia was "showing an uncharacteristic liveliness for a communist parliament" (322), Mlynář had made the argument that 'pressure groups' should be allowed to have their say concerning the state machinery.
_	He rejected the argument that Baathist Iraq's "weapons of mass destruction" or backing of terrorism posed threats to the United States.
_	This request was denied by the court based on the argument that "the specified statutory provisions apply to the law on public holidays days ..., and do not contain provisions indicating the violation of constitutional rights and freedoms referred to by the applicant.
_	The lack of excess AIDS cases and death in the AZT arms of these placebo-controlled trials in effect counters the argument that AZT causes AIDS.
_	However, the decision was based not on the due process clause, but on the argument that a right to privacy was found in the "penumbras" of other provisions of the Bill of Rights.
_	However, high rates of crime are observed in some communities where residents have strong feelings of trust and solidarity for each other, leading some researchers to question the argument that mutual trust and solidarity reduce crime.
_	First is the argument that the internet is a form of media, put out and accessed by citizens of governments and therefore should be regulated by each individual government within the borders of their respective jurisdictions.
_	In the early 1960s, the anthropologists Murray and Rosalie Wax put forward the argument that scholars should look at the "magical worldview" of a given society on its own terms rather than trying to rationalize it in terms of Western ideas about scientific knowledge.
_	This hypothesis is originated from countless experimental studies in non-human mammals, yet the argument that similar effects can be seen in human neurobehavioral development is a much debated topic among scholars.
_	In fact, other travel works published at the time made the argument that Napoleon was responsible for Italian unification.
_	Posner also rejected the argument that the defendants were removing the painting to save Chicago from racial riots that the continued showing of the painting might have started, and in which it might have been destroyed.
_	He seconded the Arab anthropologist Abduhu Badawi on the argument that the early Muslim missionaries had benefited their works from the fall of Kush in southern Sudan and the prosperity of the politically multicultural Abbasid period in the continent which, according to him, had created several streams of migration, moving west in the mid-9th century into Sub-Saharan Africa.
_	In response to the argument that Article 23 legislation is constitutionally required, opponents to the government bill point out that the Basic Law does not set up a specific time for passage of the legislation, and that the Basic Law also constitutionally requires that the HK government work toward a system of universal suffrage.
_	In reply to Chapra's citing of Western economist Milton Friedman, M.O. Farooq notes that the monetarist economists such as Friedman blame interventionist monetary policy in general rather than interest charges for the instability, and when asked specifically about any economic danger from interest charges Friedman himself stated that the work Chapra quoted did "not provide any support whatsoever for the zero interest doctrine" and that he (Friedman) did "not believe there is any merit to the argument that an interest-free economy might contribute toward greater economic stability.
_	Another subject raised in this book is the argument that Japanese ideals up until the Pacific War have since ceased to exist among modern Japanese.
_	Giddens accentuated this theme with his notion of "reflexive modernity" – the argument that, over time, society is becoming increasingly more self-aware, reflective, and hence reflexive.
_	During the elections of 2017, Long said that there was an attempt to influence the population "with the argument that Ecuador is going to become like Venezuela.
_	The clear association here between a labyrinth and master masons adds weight to the argument that such patterns were an allusion to the emerging status of the architect (through their association with the mythical artificer Daedalus, who built the Labyrinth of King Minos).
_	Firestone singled out pregnancy and childbirth, making the argument that an artificial womb would free "women from the tyranny of their reproductive biology."
_	The document also called for reductions in defense spending and foreign aid, basing these recommendations on the argument that a healthy economy "relies at the very basis of a sound capability for defense."
_	The parents sent a protest to the publisher but were turned down with the argument that the German Wikipedia was using the name as well.
_	Courts have also rejected as frivolous the argument that the mere legislative act of authorizing or regulating the nonjudicial foreclosure process thereby transforms the process itself into state action.
_	The appeal was made on two grounds; the first was the question of jurisdiction, and the second was the argument that there were errors in the conduct of the trial itself.
_	In the end, the T44 was selected over the T48/FAL primarily because of weight (the T44 was a pound lighter than the T48), simplicity (the T44 had fewer parts), the T44's self-compensating gas system, and the argument that the T44 could be manufactured on existing machinery built for the M1 rifle (a concept that later turned out to be unworkable).
_	Finally, the Court rejected the argument that the minimum ten-year sentence might be so long as to be cruel and unusual and thus unconstitutional under section 12 of the "Charter".
_	The Privy Council terminated the appeal abruptly in July 2006, saying that the argument that Pitcairn has always been self-governing was unrealistic.
_	Meanwhile, Valerie Cooper and the Commission were directly involved in the events of the government demanding the identity of Captain America under the argument that he was their property.
_	Black thought that the Court's use of natural law to discard the argument that the right to be free from self-incrimination should be incorporated was misguided: "I further contend that the 'natural law' formula which the Court uses to reach its conclusion in this case should be abandoned as an incongruous excrescence on our Constitution.
_	Lastly, the court rejected the argument that the admissions were voluntary because Thomas knew he had a right to silence, because he did not have any practical opportunity to exercise the right.
_	Some scholars disagree with the argument that all violence is decreasing arguing that not all types of violent behaviour are lower now than in the past.
_	They presented the argument that the 1982 standard increased overall consumer costs without any attendant benefits except to automakers.
_	Eighty years later, in 1972, Parliament repealed the offence of attempting suicide from the Criminal Code based on the argument that a legal deterrent was unnecessary.
_	In drawing this parallel between young people's socio-historical consciousness and their political activism, Goodman made an early contribution to the argument that the philosophical underpinnings of the New Left were largely informed by postwar disenchantment with Enlightenment conceptions of science, technology, truth, knowledge, and power relations.
_	Vogel, presents the argument that Chen Xitong exaggerated the dangers posed by the initial protests in his April 24 report to the PSC.
_	The argument that the Internal Revenue Code is not law, the argument that the Internal Revenue Code is not "positive law," and variations of these arguments, have been officially identified as legally frivolous Federal tax return positions for purposes of the $5,000 frivolous tax return penalty imposed under Internal Revenue Code section 6702(a).
_	Heider first made the argument that people tend to overweight internal, dispositional causes over external causes—this later became known as the "fundamental attribution error" (Ross, 1977) or "correspondence bias" (Fiske & Taylor, 1991; Jones, 1979, 1990).
_	In "The Sources of Social Power", Michael Mann makes the argument that within state formation, "increased organizational power is a trade-off, whereby the individual obtains more security and food in exchange for his or her freedom."
_	Variations of the argument that an individual is a "sovereign" have been rejected in tax cases such as "United States v. Hart", "Risner v. Commissioner", "Maxwell v. Snow", "Rowe v. Internal Revenue Serv.", "Cobin v. Commissioner", and "Glavin v. United States".
_	The decision also rejected the argument that the Illinois laws had an effect on gun crime, noting that Chicago's criminal element was undeterred by the ban on handguns overturned by "McDonald".
_	In 1936, James S. Allen, a high-ranking official of the CPUSA came to the Philippines to persuade Evangelista's group of accepting even a conditional pardon, under the argument that a united front must be maintained against world fascism.
_	The first Congressional bill for Hawaii statehood was proposed in 1919 by Kuhio Kalanianaole, and was based upon the argument that World War I had proved Hawaii’s loyalty.
_	In his view, these matters increased the risk that the government would reject the report However, although some minor changes were made to the report at the suggestion of Lord Perth, one softening the argument that there was nothing in the murder plot, another removing a sentence critical of police indifference to the rule of law, and one removing statements that there was no official expression of regret about burning huts, the British government preferred to attack the Commission's Report rather than amend it.
_	The objection is usually based on the argument that the presence of the dog may make the prosecution witness more appealing to the jury.
_	Confident of success Johnstone attempted to sway influential Americans with the argument that reconciling with Britain was preferable to dependence on France.
_	This is designed to prevent the argument that the company is present where-ever a company officer or director is present.
_	Data on the supply of new works are consistent with the argument that file sharing did not discourage authors and publishers.
_	She has written against agnosticism, calling "philosophically silly" the argument that because you can't prove a negative we have to allow for the possibility of God.
_	This data acted as a launching point for much of the legislation Hernandez was to champion during his early years as a council member and gave weight to the argument that his district was being short-changed causing one writer to note about Hernandez:
_	While this could be interpreted as a justification for state action to reduce poverty, it was used by classical liberals to justify inaction with the argument that the net benefit to all individuals would be higher.
_	At that time in New Mexico, the argument that Pueblos were citizens (but denied the right to vote) was being used to remove any federal protection from their lands and water rights so they could be sold on the open market.
_	Various traits support the argument that "Sinotyrannus" is a Proceratosaurid.
_	He was released not long afterwards, after during a 13–14 November Prague trial the jury sentenced him to only 48 hours in jail, with 8 votes against 4, under the argument that he had not acted on behalf of the Tsankov government, and had committed the deed under pressure from death threats by the IMRO.
_	In the case of University of Utah v. Shurtleff, 144 P.3d 1109 (Utah 2006)., the Utah Supreme Court ruled in a 4-1 decision that the University of Utah has no right to ban guns on campus, rejecting the argument that prohibiting firearms is part of the school's power to control academic affairs.
_	The application of agreement is automatically explained if PRO is co-indexed with the subject of the main clause, with the predicate nominal simply agreeing with the number features of the argument that controls PRO, just as it would be if an overt subject had been introduced.
_	Mr Apostolides' case centred on the argument that although following the Turkish invasion the government of Cyprus had lost effective control over the northern part of the island, its laws still applied even if these were not easily enforceable.
_	In response to the argument that facilitating contraception would encourage promiscuity, a rebuttal was that if such persons used contraception, there would tend to be fewer people like them since fewer people would inherit inclinations towards promiscuity.
_	Since United States law does not allow civil lawsuits against "acts of war", Speer and Morris relied on the argument that Khadr's throwing the grenade was an act of terrorism, rather than war.
_	He was reluctant to confer citizenship as he reasoned that there "“was much force in the argument that the Congress which framed the original act for naturalization of aliens ...intended it to include only white persons belonging to the races whose emigrants had contributed to the building up on this continent of the community of people which declared itself a new nation ...""
_	While the Court did not hold that the State could never intervene in a woman's pregnancy it limited such intervention to instances where fetal viability was proven by the state and rejected the argument that viability is set by gestational age of the fetus.
_	"Delusions and Other Irrational Beliefs", in which Bortolotti challenges the argument that delusions cannot be beliefs due to their irrationality, was the winner of the 2011 American Philosophical Association book prize.
_	For example, part of the argument that he submitted to the Spanish Catholic Monarchs when he sought their support for his proposed expedition to reach the Indies by sailing west was based on his reading of the Second Book of Esdras (Ezra): see , which he took to mean that the Earth is made of six parts of land to one of water.
_	Evidence supporting the argument that Robertson misspelt "Turnour" as "Turner" includes the entry for Sir Edward Turnour provided in "The judges of England, from the time of the Conquest" by Edward Foss.
_	This proposal received considerable debate, and was countered by the argument that the Unknown Warrior in Westminster Abbey represented all of the dead of the British Empire.
_	He counters the argument that "lack of direct knowledge of a certain business or its technology has been cited as a significant obstacle to intelligence services engaging in economic espionage.
_	In "Night, an Epistle to Robert Lloyd" (1761), he answered the attacks made on him, offering by way of defense the argument that any faults were better than hypocrisy.
_	The radical government opposed them with the argument that the wine crisis was caused by overproduction of wine in the South.
_	He made the argument that the climate feedback system involving current warming trends was weaker than generally asserted, coming to a conclusion that set his views apart from that of the IPCC's estimates.
_	Exploring the similarities between feminist and other critical and progressive pedagogies, the argument that feminist pedagogy is not entirely distinct from other pedagogies in its ideologies and strategies contains some validity (Hoffman and Stake).
_	Supported by the argument that the eugenics office would collect information for human genetics research, Davenport convinced the Carnegie Institute to establish the ERO.
_	Samples of the pottery were radiocarbon dated, and although one result is consistent with the argument that pottery emerged at very early date (i.e. 10,180±65 BP [AA-38105]), other dates are somewhat later.
_	However, the findings of Lefebvre des Noëttes were not without challenges, notably the argument that there was an early partial horse collar, a dorsal yoke system, dating to ancient Rome, and that Lefebvre's designs did not accurately reflect those actually used, but rather created an inaccurate design that was less efficient than any actual ancient harnesses used.
_	Still, the Austrian People's Party (ÖVP) had advanced, and still advances, the argument that the establishment of the Dollfuss dictatorship was necessary to maintain Austrian independence.
_	Japanese lawyers have made the argument that the provisions of the Treaty of Taipei and the subsequent Sino-Japan joint communique waived the right of Chinese nationals to seek compensation from the Japanese government or corporations based in Japan.
_	Underlining the argument that Hitler had overt eliminationist intentions for the Jews is the quote from the 30 January 1939 Reichstag speech:
_	Forsythe presents a more recent account of the argument that the "comitia tributa"/"concilium plebis" distinction is a misplaced convention established by modern historians.
_	In response to the argument that his jurisdiction exceeded Article Three, Cranch replied that: "The causes of which they have cognizance, are causes arising under the laws of the United States, and, therefore, the power of trying them, is part of the judicial power . . . ."
_	In response to the argument that the fees would never have been paid at a "time Stated," Cranch replied that: "[I]t may, perhaps, be a compliance with the clause of the constitution, which requires that it shall be receivable at stated times, to say that it shall be paid when the service is rendered.
_	Pastor Lennox Zamore said that he rejected the argument that legalizing same-sex marriage would benefit the local economy: "We don't want to balance our books by bringing the sex industry – whether it is same sex or not – to the Virgin Islands",
_	Hoyle and Wickramasinghe have advanced the argument that various outbreaks of illnesses on Earth are of extraterrestrial origins, including the 1918 flu pandemic and certain outbreaks of polio and mad cow disease.
_	Judge Stanley Sporkin rejected the argument that a non-U.S. citizen had the right to enter Puerto Rico, noting that Puerto Rico was part of the United States for purposes of the Immigration and Nationality Act, and so aliens required documentation from the U.S. government in order to enter and reside there.
_	Justice Thomas began his opinion by emphasizing that the Supreme Court had "firmly rejected the argument that reasonable cause for an investigative stop can only be based on the officer’s personal observation, rather than on information supplied by another person.”
_	The government now advanced the argument that "technical data" was not protected by the First Amendment.
_	Finally yet importantly, is the argument that “the essence of nation-building and electoral salience have also shifted away from resource-based mega projects and towards citizen-driven infrastructure and policies in areas like health, education and income distribution”.
_	Sen makes the argument that the utilitarian view of individual well-being can be easily swayed by mental conditioning and peoples' happiness adapting to oppressive situations.
_	His major contribution is the argument that macroeconomics should not be seen as a separate mode of thought from microeconomics, and that analysis in both should be built on the same foundations.
_	Rendsburg cited this as further support for the argument that royal scribes living in Jerusalem during the reigns of David and Solomon in the tenth century BCE were responsible for Genesis.
_	In 2014 Christie's put forward the argument that this could be explained as experimentation by Vermeer, the young artist trying to recreate and adapt the technique used to create the original.
_	The unanimous three-judge panel rejected the argument that the negligence standard established for private defamation actions by the U.S. Supreme Court in "Gertz v. Robert Welch, Inc." only applied to "the institutional press."
_	1984's "Ator 2 - L'invincibile Orion", released in America as "The Blademaster" (and in a re-edited TV version years later as "Cave Dwellers") lends credence to the argument that Joe D'Amato was using Ator as a ploy to make money from the Conan franchise.
_	The Court dismissed the argument that the offence would punish the morally innocent by not requiring proof of intention to bring about the consequences.
_	Furthermore, many advocates for placing harsher restrictions on bail enforcement and decreasing the amount of detainees out on pretrial release point to the argument that allowing bail greatly increases the risk of allowing arrestees out on bail to skip their trial.
_	One of the key ideological justifications used by many of the early ritualists, apart from the fact that it was a symbolic way of affirming their belief in the essentially Catholic nature of Anglicanism, was the argument that it provided a particularly effective medium for bringing Christianity to the poorest, "slum parishes" of the Church of England.
_	Many feminists opposed Buduong with the argument that there are many hardworking women in the country who have been successful without the need for a man to support them financially.
_	The book cites evidence against the argument that conservation is bad for economies.
_	The Court rejected the argument that a defendant, by asking for a new trial, waives his right against double jeopardy.
_	Scholars have disputed the argument that these individuals are pygmoid in stature, or that they were the result of insular dwarfism; in an article titled "Small Scattered Fragments Do Not a Dwarf Make", anthropologists Scott M. Fitzpatrick (NC State), Greg C. Nelson (University of Oregon), and Geoffrey Clark (Australian National University) conclude that "[p]rehistoric Palauan populations were normal-sized and exhibit traits that fall within the normal variation for "Homo sapiens"," hence, concluding that their evidence did "not support the claims by Berger et al. (2008) that there were smaller-bodied populations living in Palau or that insular dwarfism took place…"
_	In "Federalist No. 12", Alexander Hamilton made the argument that tariffs on imports would need to be the primary source of revenue for the new federal government and that the federal government could more effectively impose tariffs on imports than the states could separately.
_	His critique of the Soviet Union as an equally "bourgeois" society also came with the argument that Futurism, not Surrealism, could transform into art the communist version of voluntarism.
_	The federal courts have consistently ruled that the argument that Section 861 excludes income of U.S. citizens and resident aliens from taxation is without legal merit.
_	Informally, this is the argument that the (alleged) difference between "what can be mechanically proven" and "what can be seen to be true by humans" shows that human intelligence is not mechanical in nature.
_	Functionalists represent the argument that the decision to kill the Jews developed over time with a concept called "cumulative radicalization" (Hans Mommsen).
_	The decision marked the first time a U.S. industry has won a decision to impose tariffs on a Chinese product based on the argument that the Chinese government was unfairly subsidizing a Chinese industry.
_	To take this view does not necessarily commit one to the argument that accounts of the virtues must therefore be static: moral activity—that is, attempts to contemplate and practice the virtues—can provide the cultural resources that allow people to change, albeit slowly, the ethos of their own societies.
_	Around 1918, the Turkish government attempted to recover payments for the people it had killed, with the argument that there were no identifiable heirs to the policy holders.
_	During a visit to Slovakia in March 2008, Klaus stated his disagreement with the argument that Kosovo was an exceptional case, and suggested that the precedent set by the recognition of Kosovo would open a "Pandora's box" in Europe, leading to disastrous consequences.
_	Members of the abortion-rights movement counter the "pro-life" terminology with the argument that being pro-choice is pro-life: pro-women's lives.
_	Resultant "doubts and frustrations" provided fertile soil for the argument that southern rights and liberties were menaced by Black Republicanism.
_	Judge Smith's opinion rejected the argument that the Obama Administration's rule violated the Religious Freedom Restoration Act, finding that it did not substantially burden the religious exercise of religious organizations.
_	Theriophily (or animalitarianism) is "the inversion of human and animal traits and the argument that animals are in some way superior to men".
_	Their book, "The Maya Forest Garden: Eight Millennia of Sustainable Cultivation of the Tropical Woodlands", examines both contemporary tropical farming techniques and the archaeological record to make the argument that these ancient techniques, still in use today, can support significant populations over long periods of time.
_	Dickins countered with the argument that involuntary servitude was practiced in Japan in the form of the sale of prostitutes and in the contractual debts of apprenticeship, and was thus not illegal.
_	The causee is the argument that actually does the action in a causativized sentence.
_	Barton finally succeeded during the administration of President Chester Arthur, using the argument that the new American Red Cross could respond to crises other than war such as natural disasters like earthquakes, forest fires, and hurricanes.
_	When the viewer is placed into the mindset and understanding of a Sienese citizen of the day, it strengthens the argument that the perspective is from that of Justice, as her gaze then creates and illuminates this peaceful scene.
_	This chapter expands on the argument that difference underlies thought by proposing a conception of Ideas based on difference.
_	Some commentators critical of the concept of nuclear peace further make the argument that nonstate actors and rogue states could supply nuclear weapons to terrorist organizations and thereby undermine conventional deterrence and therefore nuclear peace, especially with the existence of international terrorist networks seeking access to nuclear sources.
_	Jean Dobbins speculated that her mother's refusal to take Rushmore to Brazil might have started the argument that ended in the shooting.
_	The massacre disproved the argument that the bureaucratic polity was on the retreat as the military came to play a central role once more in Thai politics, a situation that would continue throughout the 1970s and 1980s until the 1988 general election when all seats were democratically elected, including that of the prime minister, who from 1976 to 1988 was appointed by the king.
_	They include the argument that jizya was a fee in exchange for the dhimma (permission to practice one's faith, enjoy communal autonomy, and to be entitled to Muslim protection from outside aggression), and the argument that imposition of jizya on non-Muslims is similar to the imposition of zakat (one of the Five Pillars of Islam, an obligatory wealth tax paid on certain assets which are not used productively for a period of a year) on Muslims.
_	The original argument for awarding formerly German territory to Poland – compensation – was complemented by the argument that this territory in fact constituted former areas of Poland.
_	Simulation output is also discussed, with Frasca drawing attention to the argument that the sequence of signs produced by the film and the simulation look exactly the same.
_	Mangope justified it with the argument that donkeys were dangerous and had become a hazard on the roads.
_	Dr. George Greer, Dr. Lester Grinspoon, Professor James Bakalar, and Professor Thomas Roberts contributed to the argument that MDMA belonged in Schedule III, a category that would more readily enable future research and permit the continuation of its use in psychotherapy.
_	Edwin M. Yamauchi states that "A growing number of scholars, however, have accepted the argument that the "Chrestus" mentioned in Suetonius was simply a Jewish agitator with a common name, and that he had no association with Christianity."
_	The company has recently (2007) won a case in the Environment Court which will allow it to continue extracting sand from the Mangawhai-Pakiri embayment, with the court agreeing that the removal was environmentally sustainable, mainly due to the argument that the removal would not exceed the natural buildup of new sand, a point that had been contested by various local opponents and the ARC.
_	Although Robert Barro, an American economist from Harvard University, did not directly respond to the arguments posed by the book, his research on the relationship between democracy and growth disagrees with the argument that inclusive institutions give rise to economic growth.
_	In "Working with Emotional Intelligence" (1998, Bantam Books), Goleman developed the argument that non-cognitive skills can matter as much as IQ for workplace success, and made a similar argument for leadership effectiveness in "Primal Leadership" (2001, Harvard Business School Press).
_	Closing arguments were made on February 20, 1920, with the defense making the argument that the prosecution had failed to prove Whitney guilty of having committed a single illegal act.
_	This follows on to the argument that the interests of the environment, and the working class, should never be pitted against one another, and that working toward a just transition in collaboration with and alongside the working class, is needed in order to "uncover a renewable world".
_	He rejected the argument that because he made it clear in his discussions with the Gas Board that he was speaking in a private capacity, Mr. Cooley was under no fiduciary duty.
_	However, this theory is countered by the argument that Peñarol did not adopt a full striped kit until the 1905 season, and was an unknown team at the time (won 4 titles in its 24-year existence, up to that point).
_	"Greed" is shorthand for the argument that combatants in armed conflicts are motivated by a desire to better their situation, and perform an informal cost-benefit analysis in examining if the rewards of joining a rebellion are greater than not joining.
_	"Grievance" stands for the argument that people rebel over issues of identity, e.g. ethnicity, religion, social class, etc., rather than over economics.
_	He described rhetoric put forward by Vithoulkas (in presenting the argument that "allopathic drugging" is harmful and must be avoided) as including a thoroughly irresponsible statement which could mislead an unfortunate layman into refusing orthodox treatment, mentioning Vithoulkas' claim, "in the course of an argument designed to show that 'allopathic drugging' is harmful and must be avoided", that syphilis, when treated with antibiotics, would have the early stages suppressed, but would go on to the secondary and tertiary stages.
_	One of these statues, with the inscription, "the Great Royal Wife Takhat", lends credence to the argument that a Takhat was Amenmesse's wife.
_	He had but one blot on his record, having been recalled from Rio de Janeiro, although his superior was generous enough to admit that the argument that caused the recall was in hindsight found to be in Ouseley's favour.
_	In an opinion piece in "The Guardian", entitled "The algebra of infinite justice", Roy responded to the U.S. military invasion of Afghanistan, finding fault with the argument that this war would be a retaliation for the September 11 attacks:
_	None of the judges considered there was any substance to the argument that the miners in stopping work had ceased to be employed before the award was made, holding as a question of fact that the employees, while ceasing work, did not intend to end the employment relationship.
_	Lardinois sees the argument that Sappho's mother could have gone to pray to Hera for her son's safe return herself, and therefore it does not make sense for her to send Sappho to do so on her behalf, as the strongest against the thesis that the addressee is Sappho's mother, arguing on this basis for a male addressee.
_	Similarly, Dowling has written that "in the less cosmopolitan precincts outside Oxford ... the argument that Müller was 'not English' told heavily against him" since "the argument was (and was meant to be, of course) unanswerable."
_	The Court rejected the argument that the analyst was not a conventional witness because he or she recorded the immediate results of a chemical test rather than recalled a historical event.
_	She wants to be free and absolved of her vows under the argument that everyone around her forced her to take the vows against her will: her mother, her father, the Mother Superior, etc.
_	The name is derived from the argument that the members are distinct from the two main political camps inside the country, the Burmese military regime and the political movement centred on Aung San Suu Kyi.
_	The Court dismissed the argument that the appellant had been careless as that would presume that he was capable of turning his mind to the issue and making judgements.
_	The defense will focus on the argument that the federal government doesn't actually have jurisdiction of federal land, as they lost the right to own the land inside of Oregon once it became a state.
_	Wail Hassan differs from Hale, in that he does not make the argument that the village as depicted functions as an academic source for understanding real Sudanese village life.
_	In the 1960s, the debate was further revived when William Shockley publicly defended the argument that Black children were innately unable to learn as well as White children.
_	He even extended the argument that "virtus" and not one’s family history should decide a man’s worthiness.
_	Through these stories, it makes a case for niche-specific solutions and puts forth the argument that sidelining them for larger, scalable solutions would ultimately sideline a lot of communities which are often on the fringes of mainstream society.
_	The authors claim this study is the first experimental evidence to support the argument that nociceptive sensitisation is actually an adaptive response to injuries.
_	There is evidence supporting the argument that the measures were racially motivated, rather than a military necessity.
_	They rejected the argument that the constitutionality of a treaty could only be questioned when it was incorporated into law by a statute and ruled that the courts had the power to interfere in the government's exercise of foreign affairs in the case of there being a "clear disregard by the government of the powers and duties conferred on it by the Constitution."
_	Using the argument that decarbonising electricity is key to decarbonising UK energy supplies, many commentators have criticised H.M.Government for not introducing a far more onerous 2030 electricity EPS.
_	However, variations of this going back to 1881 were often used to ridicule the claimed backwardness of various unnamed Christians, which supports the argument that the attribution to Ferguson is false.
_	The prohibition on wearing swords was controversial with the Meiji oligarchy, but the argument that it was an anachronism not in keeping with the westernization of Japan won out.
_	Although it is the (phonetically) most logical and hence the most intuitive writing of Silesian, it did not become popular with Silesian organizations, with the argument that it contains too many caron diacritics and hence resembles the Czech alphabet.
_	In January 1944 he stopped his brother, Lieutenant Werner von Haeften, from shooting Hitler with a pistol with the argument that this would break the Fifth Commandment.
_	The Talmud interprets the verses referring to "an eye for an eye" and similar expressions as mandating monetary compensation in tort cases and argues against the interpretations by Sadducees that the Bible verses refer to physical retaliation in kind, using the argument that such an interpretation would be inapplicable to blind or eyeless offenders.
_	The Court began by considering the argument that the questions are not justiciable (i.e. lacks sufficient legal content, or where the nature of the question or the information provided does not permit the Court to give a complete or accurate answer) based on it being a political question.
_	In a recent medical marijuana case, "Gonzales v. Raich", the Supreme Court rejected the argument that the ban on growing medical marijuana for personal use exceeded Congress' powers under the Commerce Clause.
_	Lewis was granted an automatic review by the Supreme Court of Virginia, which rejected the argument that it was unfair to execute Lewis while the co-conspirators got life sentences, as well as rejecting Lewis' challenges to the constitutionality of Virginia's death penalty law.
_	In the phrase's narrower application, applying only to the Cold War era, the phrase refers to the argument that the stability between the two superpowers was caused by each side's large nuclear arsenals which led to a state of Mutually Assured Destruction (MAD).
_	In 1927, the Supreme Court ruled in United States v. Sullivan that illegally earned income was subject to income tax; Justice Oliver Wendell Holmes Jr. rejected the argument that the Fifth Amendment protected criminals from reporting illegal income.
_	At the core of this theory is the argument that EM MNEs systematically and recursively use international expansion as a springboard to acquire critical resources needed to compete more effectively against their global rivals at home and abroad and to reduce their vulnerability to institutional and market constraints at home.
_	As to the argument that family planning enables better nourishment and education of children, Mawdudi refers to the beneficial effects of adversity and want on human character.
_	He added: "I feel a bit sad about that, but I understand the argument that you need to open it up."
_	However, the argument that the German-Polish non-aggression pact had been forced on Piłsudski by French refusal to wage a "preventive war" has been disputed by historians, who point out that there is no evidence in French or Polish diplomatic archives that such a proposal was ever advanced.
_	The split was justified with the argument that Cape Coast and 33 other towns and villages continue to need timber from the forest and potable water provided by the Kakum River.
_	Against the argument that torture was legal under the laws of Spain, but nowhere authorised by those of its colonies, he presented a considerable body of depositions from inhabitants of Trinidad showing that torture had frequently been resorted to by magistrates in the last years of Spanish occupation.
_	De Valera and others ignored the warnings on the argument that, if the arrests happened, they would constitute a propaganda coup.
_	The development economist Ha-Joon Chang challenges the argument that free trade benefits every country:
_	Though his father had determined the everlasting succession of only the firstborn prince in 1506, Louis as a second-born son refused a spiritual career with the argument that he was born before the edict became valid.
_	Anarchists are some of the foremost proponents of the argument that taxation is equivalent to slavery.
_	In the past, for last two decades the State Government of Gujarat had concocted every possible reason to maintain its monopoly on wild Asiatic lions and the tourism revenue generated by them and of recent Gujarat's legal council had put forward the argument that Kuno Wildlife Sanctuary is being used for the introduction of African cheetahs which might take several years to fully settle down and repopulate the area and hence reintroduction of Asiatic lions should only be done after that, this scared the conservationists that Gujarat will use this pretext to delay the reintroduction of native lions by many more decades using the cheetah argument.
_	Returning to the fact that "Southern Maya Area" risks being a misnomer, that the Southern Maya Area comprised a volatile mix of peoples, languages, and cultures with correspondingly dynamic interactions provides more support for the argument that the South took part in seminal developments and a vault upward socially and culturally to Classic Maya civilization, in a manner at least co-equal to the northern Petén.
_	These initial excursions into the subject, and the argument that "Archaeopteryx" was clearly a bird, albeit primitive, were expanded upon in Feduccia's 1980 book, "The Age of Birds".
_	It makes the argument that positive social relationships (trust, benevolence, shared social identities) yield happiness and positive economic outcomes.
_	Further, Glantz argues, Suvorov's thesis is strongly contradicted both by ex-Soviet and German archival material, and the facts do not support the argument that the Red Army was prepared to invade Germany.
_	Finally, Marx draws together the analyses of the political upheavals in France and the economic crises triggered, originally, in England and spreading outward to the continent; and from these analyses builds the argument that these upheavals in France, which seemed like a grand political shift in one nation, marked only minor change within the superstructure of a social and economic system which was multinational in character.
_	Gould, writing in "The Structure of Evolutionary Theory" (2002), commented that the argument that the clitoris is not adaptive, put forward by Symons and subsequently by Gould himself, has been widely misunderstood as a denial of the adaptive value of the female orgasm in general, or even as a claim that female orgasms lack significance.
_	The low efficiency of solar ponds is usually justified with the argument that the 'collector', being just a plastic-lined pond, might potentially result in a large-scale system that is of lower overall levelised energy cost than a solar concentrating system.
_	Moreover, the argument that the exam is legitimate, but would be charging a very high level of legal knowledge, similar to public tests for the judiciary or for prosecutors are absolutely unfounded.
_	Social facilitation has occasionally been attributed to the fact that certain people are more susceptible to social influence, with the argument that personality factors can make these people more aware of evaluation.
_	In a 6-3 decision, the Supreme Court rejected the argument that parties to a contract could expand the limited scope of judicial review, and it even stated that the courts cannot expand it, even for extraordinary circumstances:
_	Kennedy's article presents the argument that there is more evidence suggesting that Kenneth Littleton, the Skakel family's live-in tutor, killed Moxley.
_	After rejecting the argument that the "vales reales" should only be recognized for their market value—which was well below their nominal value, and would have bankrupted the holders and made it impossible to obtain new loans—the Cortes de Cádiz approved a proposal made by Argüelles.
_	He then went on to express the argument that was becoming the core of the Patriot position:
_	Cephas is the reason behind the argument that ended Charlotte and Barney's engagement.
_	Economist Paul Krugman has made the argument that any serious attempt to tackle long-run deficit problems can be summed up in "seven words: health care, health care, health care, revenue."
_	His claim was based on the argument that his time in service should count from when he entered West Point, and not when he received his commission.
_	The merchants were of the argument that the country had no rights to impose taxes.
_	The rationale behind the argument that a decision-maker should provide reasons is that it is one of the cornerstones of a good administration.
_	They present the argument that the system of "Millet" and State and Religion preserved the Empire for centuries.
_	This makes it hard to sustain the argument that Bristol merchants were somehow 'pushed out' of Iceland.
_	The old "volmachten" defended this schism in the States with the argument that they had been elected for the entire year of 1672, so the recent elections had been illegal, as was the Resolution of 27 September 1672.
_	The authors claim this study is the first experimental evidence to support the argument that nociceptive sensitisation is actually an adaptive response to injuries.
_	In the argument that follows, Radhamani decides that she will go at any cost, and Sundaresan decides to go with her.
_	The court further noted that no state practice supported the argument that "jus cogens" rules displace immunity.
_	The plot revolves around the extent to which education system in India holds practically among students, and that the revision of curriculum is obligatory for a healthy teacher-student connect, accentuating the argument that students should lead discerning and forbearing lives rather than being coerced to study only to acquire a degree.
_	Therefore, Justice McLean concluded that the argument that Scott was not a citizen was "more a matter of taste than of law".
_	Local historians oppose the argument that the temple is not as ancient as the nearby Kandiyoor Sree Mahadeva Temple or Mavelikkara Krishna Swamy Temple and Kannamangalam Mahadeva
_	Key articles among the more than 100 that he has published include fundamental contributions to: a) the understanding of infant babbling and how it lays foundations for speech, b) various aspects of communication disorders and how they illuminate the language faculty and neurolinguistics, c) a groundbreaking contribution to the understanding of how language evolved in humanity based on a theory of parental selection, and d) the role of human life history (with Barry Bogin) in language evolution, based on the argument that the prolonged developmental period of humanity includes a childhood and an adolescence, phases that are absent in non-human primates, and both of which provide extensive and long-term opportunities for learning that lay groundwork for human language and culture.
_	Gerhard Himmelman points out that the sociologists countered the debate about a decline in values with the argument that "the modern social regulatory mechanisms and the democratic procedures serve as foundations of social integration".
_	Compulsory school attendance is usually justified by reference to the argument that minors are incapable of making sufficiently reasoned choices.
_	The irony becomes more explicit as Swift next addresses the argument that it is ridiculous to employ a class of people to wail on one day a week against behaviour that is the constant practice of all men alive on the other six by arguing that such vices, including wine and fine silks, were made all the more pleasurable by virtue of their being forbidden by the Christian mores of the era.
_	Answering the argument that the abolition of the gospel would benefit the vulgar, and that religion was put in force to keep the "lower part of the world in awe by fear of invisible powers," Swift points out that the vast majority of people were already unbelievers who only employed religion to quiet "peevish" children and provide topics for amusing discussion.
_	Swift addresses the argument that abolishing Christianity will contribute to the uniting of a people divided by various sects of by arguing that humanity has an inborn "spirit of opposition" such that if Christianity were not extant to provide a context for such natural oppositions among men, this natural tendency would instead be spent in contravention of the laws and disturbance of the public peace.
_	Wilson led the United States into World War I with the argument that "The world must be made safe for democracy."
_	In "Whitney v. California" (1927), concerning a conviction for seditious speech forbidden by California law, Holmes joined a concurring opinion written by Justice Louis D. Brandeis once again explaining the clear-and-present-danger standard for criminal attempts in these terms, reiterating the argument that political speech was protected because of the value of democratic deliberation.
_	In practice, cases were not brought against the King for breach of Magna Carta and the Forest Charter, but it was possible to bring a case against the King's officers, such as his sheriffs, using the argument that the King's officers were acting contrary to liberties granted by the King in the charters.
_	The possibility that "argentina" was not made valid in Schlegel also allows for consideration of the argument that the name became available in Hekstra's published report.
_	Over the last decade consensus has, in fact, supported the argument that the noise is produced by ice fracturing processes."
_	For the argument that wages are not taxable, some tax protesters—including convicted tax offender Irwin Schiff—incorrectly attribute to the U.S. Supreme Court the following language in connection with the leading tax case of "Lucas v. Earl":
_	In some cases, parties have sought to resist the taking of certain documents during an inspection based on the argument that those documents are covered by legal professional privilege between lawyer and client.
_	It is no more sound than the argument that "I believe in the Bible because it is the written word of God through his prophets.
_	More so, "Forbes" Scott Mendelson said that the film didn't need to be "whitewashed" and stated that "Even if we accept the argument that Moses had to be played by a world-renowned movie star and that in all likelihood that meant a white actor, I do not accept the idea that the rest of the main cast needed to be filled out with Caucasian actors of varying recognizability."
_	But…the deeper you dig into the portfolio and the drama behind the decision to cease trading in December 2004, the stronger the argument that these were not fatal flaws….
_	In 1938 the Austrian historian Paul Wittek published an influential work entitled "The Rise of the Ottoman Empire", in which he put forth the argument that the early Ottoman state was constructed upon an ideology of Islamic holy war against non-Muslims.
_	The author makes the argument that in an open society, where people are allowed to pursue their desires without restrictions or shame, simplistic black and white views of sexuality are replaced by orientations that exist as complex shades of gray.
_	Evidence has shown that rhyodacite is weathered to greater extents while in the presence of these cacti which supports the argument that this species is directly associated with rock weathering and thus, the formation of soil.
_	So he produces the argument that the fixed stars must be at an inconceivable distance with the smallest larger than the whole orbit of the earth.
_	In the argument that follows, the bad-tempered Pudding pinches the Mayor who orders his arrest.
_	Countering the argument that an aggregate, negative balance of trade is insignificant as an economic indicator, Mercer argued by analogy that while there is nothing wrong in the short term with running a deficit with one’s hairstylist or car dealership, economic damages accrue when credit-based purchases are not paid for—a condition she sees as typical of the spending habits of U. S. consumers.
_	During the following centuries, legal deposit was sometimes used to facilitate censorship and the obligation was thus removed briefly during the French Revolution, under the argument that it violated freedom of speech.
_	For example, the argument that "If I had just sat on a wild porcupine then I would know it; in fact I do not know it; therefore I did not just sit on a wild porcupine" is probably not a fallacy and depends entirely on the veracity of the leading proposition that supports it.
_	While some political philosophers have defended Bradshaw, most legal authorities have taken the view expressed in 1999 by Michael Kirby (then a Justice of the High Court of Australia) that the High Court of Justice for the trial of Charles I of which Bradshaw as president was illegal, however in his 2005 book "The Tyrannicide Brief" (a biography of John Cook, the prosecutor at the trial), Geoffrey Robertson Q.C. put forward the argument that while the court was illegal due to the political settlement reached at the Restoration of the monarchy in 1660, the trial anticipated the developments in humanitarian law in the second half of the 20th century, and that the leading participants in the trial are to be admired rather than condemned.
_	Thus the argument that the decisive dynamic towards expansion was economic does not in the first instance depend upon the imposition of alien analytical categories on a recalcitrant body of evidence, nor in the first instance upon the theoretical construction of connections between "the economy" and "politics".
_	James Beilby has argued that the purpose of Plantinga's "Warrant" trilogy, and specifically of his "Warranted Christian Belief", is firstly to make a form of argument against religion impossible—namely, the argument that whether or not Christianity is true, it is irrational—so "the skeptic would have to shoulder the formidable task of demonstrating the falsity of Christian belief"
_	A striking feature of "Black Flame" is the argument that “‘class struggle’ anarchism, sometimes called revolutionary or communist anarchism, is not a type of anarchism …
_	On 10 December 1539, he received support from Martin Luther, with the argument that of two evil things, bigamy was better than divorce.
_	Additionally, an interim charging order was then secured against a property registered solely in Farid's name on the argument that Rahman has a beneficial interest in it.
_	Lindsey also makes the argument that Francisco Flores and not Francisco Ruiz was the alcade of San Antonio in February 1836 and that neither were present during the siege, having been sent on a mission by Travis and Bowie to transport ammunition, clothing and provisions to the Alamo.
_	Local historians oppose the argument that the temple is not as ancient as the nearby "Kandiyoor Mahadeva" temple or Mavelikara "Krishna Swamy" temple as it had not been mentioned in "Unnuneeli Sandesam" written in the 14th century.
_	However, the decision did not acknowledge the argument that the plant's religious or cultural values prohibited a patent.
_	Bozell presents the argument that the "Liberal Media" will soon collapse on itself, due to their own refusal to admit their faults and bias.
_	In September 2009, Youth Way on the MBTA reached an agreement with Massachusetts Secretary of Transportation James Aloisi to extend the hours for student passes until 11:00 PM, based on the argument that extracurricular activities often extended past the previous 8:00 cutoff.
_	Nochlin's essay develops the argument that both formal and social education restricted artistic development to men, preventing women (with rare exception) from honing their talents and gaining entry into the art world.
_	Administrative Law Judge Michael Malihi in Georgia decided a group of eligibility challenge cases by saying, "The Indiana Court rejected the argument that Mr. Obama was ineligible, stating that the children born within the United States are natural born citizens, regardless of the citizenship of their parents.
_	Planning to present the paper at the Fourth International Information Hiding Workshop of 2001 in Pittsburgh, Felten was threatened with legal action by SDMI, the Recording Industry Association of America (RIAA), and Verance Corporation, under the terms of the DMCA, on the argument that one of the technologies his team had broken was currently in use in the market.
_	On 14 June 2013, Antonia Maioni, an associate professor from McGill University, noted that she found it ironic that Quebec sovereignists were basing their attempts to "shore up Quebec's veto" over constitutional change based on the argument that Elizabeth II is also the "Queen of Quebec".
_	Some scholars disagree with the lumping of ADHD and DCD, with the argument that they are unrelated.
_	The media watchdog group Fairness and Accuracy in Reporting (FAIR) has challenged CMPA's non-partisan claim, based on the argument that much of its funding has come from conservative sources, and that its founder, Dr. S. Robert Lichter, once held a chair in mass communications at the American Enterprise Institute and was a Fox News contributor.
_	However, by a 6:1 majority (Kirby J dissenting) also rejected the argument that the Commonwealth's constitutional immunity from State law is no greater than the immunity which the States enjoy from Commonwealth law.
_	Garland goes so far as to make the argument that if such authors were alive today they would themselves be advocating and expressing new forms of art.
_	Belcher, who had purchased Mortlake from Captain Blackwell, was successfully defended by his attorney with the argument that Mortlake as a Manor did not have the same responsibilities to the poor as a Town would.
_	While generally known as Old Gujarati, some scholars prefer the name of Old Western Rajasthani, based on the argument that Gujarati and Rajasthani were not yet distinct.
_	This greatly irritated Macdonald, but he nonetheless signed the treaty under the argument that he must as a junior member of the British delegation.
_	While we understand the argument that the liquor business generates taxes, jobs and profits, must this be done at the expense of peace, order and unity?
_	Citing the property tax system, and its practices of limiting taxation of land zoned for agriculture to an average of less than $1 per acre, the district court called it "a vestige of discrimination" that has "successfully used the argument that it is unfair for white property owners to pay for the education of blacks".
_	I could buy the argument that it is a CULTURAL narrative, and if that were the claim the authors were making, a great deal of my struggles with the book would be resolved."
_	The courts have rejected the argument that "Flint v. Stone Tracy Co." can be used to avoid taxation of wages.
_	Factors like the ones Dunne states help build the argument that San Francisco was able to act quickly and efficiently because "San Francisco's experience is unique and cannot, perhaps should not, be attempted in other settings."
_	Bannan made the argument that if more immigrants came, society would be threatened.
_	To thus Rainaldo de Dassel understood it and, put forth the argument that, Rolando Bandinelli did not gain a disadvantage in accepting the thesis of its rival: in effect, for him, the emperor received the Empire as a "benefit" of the Pope.
_	The Czech Republic has increased the proportion of funding that the public broadcaster gets from licence fees, justifying the move with the argument that the existing public service broadcasters cannot compete with commercial broadcasters for advertising revenues.
_	As technology has advanced, and concerns about the future of humanity on Earth have increased, the argument that space colonization as an achievable and worthwhile goal has gained momentum.
_	According to Ann Toplovich, executive director of the Tennessee Historical Society, John Quincy Adams' presidential campaigns targeted Jackson's "passion and lack of self-control" in both 1824 and 1828, "making it central to the argument that he would devastate the integrity of the Republic and its institutions."
_	One riddle, as stated in Hauksbók, refers to "the "weaponless" maids who fight around their lord, the [brown/red] ever sheltering and the [fair/white] ever attacking him", although there is controversy over whether the word "weaponless" refers to the maids or, as in other versions, to the king himself, which may support the argument that a "weaponless king" cannot take part in captures (see #Balance of play).
_	The Government also raised the argument that the disparaging provision of the Lanham Act is government speech and should therefore fall outside of the purview of the first amendment.
_	The Court also rejected the argument that Congress had exceeded its authority to regulate elections under Article I, Section 4 of the Constitution.
_	In contrast to the argument that reduces the complexity of good reading to rapid and automatic decoding, this perspective acknowledges that all good readers come to words they do not know and constantly miscue, and that good reading is the ability to effectively solve problems that arise in reading through a range of strategies.
_	To that end, the government officials played up the need for the visit in every possible way by using the argument that its success, if any, would enable to resume Soviet membership in the World Psychiatric Association.
_	Academic reviews of the topic are equivocal, noting that the argument that animals have at least simple conscious thoughts and feelings has strong support, but some critics continue to question how reliably animal mental states can be determined.
_	The High Court rejected the argument that Sharia has no jurisdiction over people who have ceased to be Muslims.
_	It is clear that no law of this kind can be effective without a penalty; and the argument that the Courts must therefore be held to have the power to inflict a penalty, wherever the Legislature has intended to create an offence, is of considerable weight.
_	In response to the argument that 'separate but equal' civil partnerships would not comply with the Constitutional Court's ruling, the Portfolio Committee amended the bill to allow either marriages or civil partnerships, and to allow them to both same- and opposite-sex couples.
_	"It's become a cliché to say everything has a story, but in baseball, you could make the argument that everything really does.
_	In theology, his reformist ideas, like those of Abduh, were "based on the argument that:
_	In the video, Warren aggressively rebuts the argument that asking the rich to pay more taxes is "class warfare", by making the claim that no one grew rich in America without depending on government services paid for by the rest of society.
_	The writing in which Einstein found inspiration from Mach was "The Science of Mechanics", where the philosopher criticized Newton's idea of absolute space, in particular the argument that Newton gave sustaining the existence of an advantaged reference system: what is commonly called "Newton's bucket argument".
_	Reasons included the argument that giving Game and Fish authority would "nullify the Tribe's unquestioned authority to regulate the use of its resources by members and nonmembers".
_	This aligns with the argument that the POE and the World Bank suppress local knowledge.
_	In December 2008, president Correa declared Ecuador's national debt illegitimate, based on the argument that it was odious debt contracted by corrupt and despotic prior regimes.
_	The project was meant to be a counterpoint to the argument that "rock music is dead".
_	As those born after reunification, the oldest of whom would be about 28 in 2018, never directly experienced it, the argument that the DDR could be an influence in their lack of belief is problematic.
_	He justified himself with the argument that since France had entered the war on the American side, he could no longer support staying out of the war.
_	The book analyzes how Israel has failed in its attempts to unify the city, and presents the argument that Israel should relinquish its claim on Palestinian neighborhoods and villages incorporated in 1967.
_	While you could make the argument that the show should be focusing more on the Hades story at this late stage of the season rather than a one-off story about Ruby's romance with Dorothy.
_	The Court rejected the argument that such abductions undermine the usefulness of extradition treaties, and it refused to read general principles of international law weighing against such abductions into the Mexican extradition treaty.
_	Published as "Reframing Culture", this work explored the use of high-culture figures in the then-contested medium of film, comparing modes of representation across cultural fields, and overturning the argument that these topics were part of an attempt to purge the audience of immigrants and members of the working class.
_	Some Cuban refugees make cigars in the US and advertise them as "Cuban" cigars, using the argument that the cigars are made by Cubans.
_	He puts forth the argument that in order to have a revolutionary theory in geography, one needs to take the Marxist path.
_	John Oliver, the first settler in Cades Cove, claimed that Spence burned trees and cleared Spence Field in the 1830s, lending credence to the argument that Spence Field is not a natural bald.
_	At an appearance only months before her death at Baylor University in Waco, Texas, Shaw said, "The only way to refute" the argument that America was a democracy and therefore women were entitled to vote was "to prove that women are not people."
_	Along with other academics in the field, such as Ian Duncan, Dawkins promoted the argument that animal welfare is about the feelings of animals.
_	Justice Stevens' dissent focused on the argument that a prosecutor's failure to present substantially exculpatory evidence is a form of prosecutorial misconduct, but that nevertheless, the prosecutor need not "ferret out and present all evidence that could be used at trial to create a reasonable doubt as to defendant's guilt."
_	A pro-authoritarian critic soon reproached that such an ideal, despite its aim to compete with purely nationalist trends, was in fact social class-based, and its "numerical, that is to say democratic" definition (around the argument that peasants formed the majority in Romania) was leading to "peasant anarchy".
_	Barlaam cited Dionysius' "Mystical Theology" to support the argument that God is unspeakable and therefore unknowable.
_	In fact, Fichte achieved fame for originating the argument that consciousness is not grounded in "anything" outside of itself.
_	The lack of excess AIDS cases and death in the AZT arms of these placebo-controlled trials effectively counters the argument that AZT causes AIDS.
_	Throughout the book, Kirkendall makes the argument that politics and education significantly influenced each other in Cold War era Latin America.
_	The remaining commissioners supported the festival's presence because of the exposure and positive economic effects it brings to Miami, and Keon Hardemon disputed the argument that it affected downtown residents, as they, in his opinion, chose to live in the city so they could participate in local events.
_	The case rests on the argument that the stepmother persuaded another woman to poison her husband; as the speaker never explains how he came to learn of this conspiracy, Wohl says that he may have made it up entirely.
_	He recognizes that the scenes he has sometimes deteriorate to banal depictions of a thorny dispute, but defends this with the argument that "clichés often become reality in times of conflict.,"
_	As for the argument that the kirpan could encourage other students to bring weapons to school, as defence against the kirpan, the Court replied this was speculative.
_	In the Advice Memorandum, Associate General Counsel Barry J. Kearney of the Division of Advice rejected the argument that the NLRA contained an affirmative duty to bargain with members-only minority unions.
_	This is similarly true in the case of William Catton’s 1980 book "Overshoot: the Ecological Basis of Revolutionary Change", in which Catton emphasizes the argument that all of us have lifestyles that are based upon a time when our carrying capacity exceeded human load.
_	NUS views the argument that not all students benefit from student membership as fallacious, claiming that there is an indirect benefit for students generally.
_	With the argument that the cantonal constitution at that time did not explicitly exclude women's voting rights, they went with their demand before the Federal Court.
_	He makes the argument that the city, which consists of a series of interdependent systems, resembles a landscape more than it does a building.
_	On 26 April he noted that General Maurice Gamelin had promised to use his influence to promote Renault's project; the next day, however, it transpired that the deputy chief of the general staff General Joseph-Edouard-Aimé Doumenc had vetoed the idea, with the argument that, apart from the secrecy problem, it was best to keep the employment in France.
_	Firstly, it presents a theory that science changes due to an accumulation of observations and improvement in experimental techniques and methodology; secondly, it puts forward the argument that the popularity of science in 17th-century England and the religious demography of the Royal Society (English scientists of that time were predominantly Puritans or other Protestants) can be explained by a correlation between Protestantism and the scientific values.
_	However, that conclusion has been challenged by W. B. Jensen with the argument that HgF only exists under highly atypical non-equilibrium conditions and should best be considered as an exception.
_	The theologians advising the congregation issued their approval to the argument that the two were killed in hatred of the faith in their meeting held on 31 May 2016, while the members of the C.C.S. also confirmed this on 26 September 2017.
_	The problem of evil is the argument that the existence of evil is incompatible with the concept of an omnipotent and perfectly good God.
_	Academic reviews of the topic are more equivocal, noting that although the argument that animals have at least simple conscious thoughts and feelings has strong support, some critics continue to question how reliably animal mental states can be determined.
_	In "United States v. Bell", the argument that "the Internal Revenue Service is an unregistered agent of Puerto Rico and not properly registered under the Foreign Agent Registration Act" was ruled to be frivolous.
_	To the argument that Fortuyn would have been chosen through democratic means, Van der Graaf said that that was also the case for Hitler.
_	The Court in "Caha" rejected the argument that the federal courts had no jurisdiction to hear a case under the perjury statute, and the defendant's conviction was affirmed.
_	Opponents also rejected the argument that revenue increases from the measure would improve the state budgetary deficit, dismissing it as a short-term fix.
_	In that case, the court also ruled the following taxpayer arguments to be invalid: (1) the argument that section 6702 is an unconstitutional Bill of Attainder; (2) the argument that section 6702 unconstitutionally authorizes the imposition of cruel and unusual punishment; (3) the argument that section 6702 unconstitutionally violates the doctrine of separation of powers; and (4) the argument that section 6702 unconstitutionally violates the taxpayer's First Amendment rights to petition the government for redress of grievances.
_	This is primarily the argument that lies at the heart of Mulla Sadra's philosophy.
_	On December 9, in the controversial "Bush v. Gore" ruling, the Court reversed a Florida Supreme Court decision that had ordered a third count, and stopped an ordered statewide hand recount based on the argument that the use of different standards among Florida's counties violated the Equal Protection Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment.
_	Goldstone and O’Regan JJ also rejected the argument that drawing an adverse inference infringes the presumption of innocence because it relieves the state of part of its burden of proving guilt beyond a reasonable doubt.
_	Garry Adelman has countered the argument that a Confederate capture of Little Round Top would have badly hurt the Union effort.
_	It has been suggested that 'directed' panspermia was proposed in order to counteract various objections, including the argument that microbes would be inactivated by the space environment and cosmic radiation before they could make a chance encounter with Earth.
_	In an essay on Kafka, the Argentinian writer Jorge Luis Borges, in making the argument that "each writer creates his own precursors", placed Han Yu as one of the antecedents of Kafka due to some resemblance between them.
_	The CFA also rejected the argument that the Immigration Ordinance's imposition of additional requirements on the timing of the period of seven years' "ordinary residence" was inconsistent with the Basic Law, instead stating that the Basic Law was silent on the matter and that it was "legitimate for the Ordinance to fill the gap".
_	Over the years, Faulds conducted a bitter controversy with Herschel over the use of fingerprints, demanding proof in 1894 that Herschel had ever used fingerprints officially, which Herschel duly provided, and then writing a series of books and pamphlets many years later containing variations of the argument that he had been cheated his due credit (see for complete facsimiles of these and other fundamental works on fingerprinting, and the Herschel/Faulds letters).
_	Therefore, the argument that the word "samurai" is derived from "saulabi" ("a man who fights") is highly unlikely.
_	The Pearl Harbor advance-knowledge conspiracy theory is the argument that U.S. Government officials had advance knowledge of Japan's December 7, 1941, attack on Pearl Harbor.
_	Asylum law depends on very specific instances of perception on the basis of race, religion, political opinion, nationality or membership in a social group in order to prove that one is a bona fide refugee and immigration attorneys have struggled to make the argument that being a victim of gang violence places a person in one of those categories.
_	"Pitchfork" founder Ryan Schreiber wrote that "quality aside, the questionable sequencing of "Amnesiac" does little to hush the argument that the record is merely a thinly veiled B-sides compilation ...
_	A few years later, in a May 2009 speech given at a meeting in Westminster, Galloway said: "I do not agree with the argument that there is a shadowy Jewish influence.
_	I am open to the argument that we should have another piece of legislation that would enable a full debate on most of the matters in relation to abortion that have been raised as amendments and new clauses to the Bill, but there is a special case for debating and voting on the particular new clause that I tabled to extend the 1967 Act to Northern Ireland.
_	"Hundmargs" ("of a myriad") in the second verse has also been read as "Hundings", referring to a chief of the Jomsvikings named Hunding, but there is no other record of such a historical figure, so the argument that this disproves Styrbjörn's historical existence has been generally set aside in favour of the evidence of the other contemporary poem.
_	He advised Pakistani authorities to shoot down NATO aircraft should a similar event take place in the future, and to keep the supply lines closed, on the argument that the US cannot afford a war with Pakistan.
_	The request was rejected by the US State Department in 2012, based on the argument that Sanchez de Lozada's actions are not a crime in the USA, and that no dual criminality condition existed.
_	Jones said that although he was averse to naming the school after himself his friends overcame his reluctance "with the argument that the school would be called by that name because of my connection with it, and to attempt to give it any other name would confuse the people."
_	Rainville relied on the argument that a fuel pump used to service American MedEvac helicopters had been stolen deliberately to hinder the military effort, while critics pointed out that any saboteurs likely would have ignited the thousands of gallons of fuel surrounding it.
_	Hanson was a pioneer in advancing the argument that observation is theory-laden — that observation language and theory language are deeply interwoven — and that historical and contemporary comprehension are similarly deeply interwoven.
_	An example for this is the "Nebenbesitz" (indirect possession of a right by more than one person), which is denied by German courts with the argument that §868 of the Bürgerliches Gesetzbuch, which defines indirect possession, doesn't say there could be two people possessing.
_	Their conscription into the war had been justified with the argument that Britain was fighting against tyranny in order to preserve democracy and freedom, which these veterans and the people they left at home did not enjoy.
_	One reason for this finding is the argument that there are different areas of political knowledge that different groups consider.
_	Historians such as Margaret MacMillan warn against the argument that alliances forced the great powers to act as they did during the July crisis.
_	Huilcamán appealed using the argument that in the past parliamentary election there was a law created specifically to help the candidates of the Christian Democracy Party re-register their candidacies.
_	Theologians have at times cited in support of their Mariology this constant sensus fidelium, e.g. Saint Alphonsus Liguori valued texts and traditions of the Church Fathers as expressions of the sensus fidelium of the past and attributed great weight to the argument that "the greater part of the faithful have always had recourse to the intercession of the divine mother for all the graces which they desire".
_	The acyclicity of "G" is an essential assumption in the Lindström–Gessel–Viennot lemma; it guarantees (in reasonable situations) that the sums formula_99 are well-defined, and it advects into the proof (if "G" is not acyclic, then "f" might transform a self-intersection of a path into an intersection of two distinct paths, which breaks the argument that "f" is an involution).
_	In a 2-1 ruling the court rejected the argument that Reyes's conviction violated the U.S. Constitution's prohibition against "cruel and unusual punishment."
_	Eisenhower made the argument that Sputnik was only a scientific achievement and not a military threat or change in world power.
_	The church was banned with the argument that it had been licensed in 1998 as a "foreign society" and not a "cult society".
_	He associated the beginnings of writing with the task of managing surplus and, in a paper with Ian Watt (Goody and Watt 1963), he advanced the argument that the rise of science and philosophy in classical Greece depended on the invention of the alphabet.
_	Other arguments presented in the letters included the idea (put forward by the area’s MP, Arthur Cyril Boyce) that Angelina must be not guilty because her pregnancy made her temporarily insane, the idea that Angelina should be praised for taking the life of a sexually immoral man, and the argument that Angelina’s fear of her impending doom would adversely affect her unborn baby, therefore she should be pardoned.
_	In the lead-up to the invasion, the U.S. and U.K. emphasized the argument that Saddam Hussein was developing weapons of mass destruction and that he thus presented a threat to his neighbors and to the world community.
_	The Executive Council approved Tramways' plan to relocate its depots to Sai Wan Ho and Sai Ying Pun in July 1986, on the argument that the HK$3.5 million in operating costs savings would allow for tram fares to be held down.
_	Also cited was the abortion debate and the argument that women have suffered as a result of a feminist culture that promotes casual sex as empowering.
_	The fact that states no longer claim a monopoly to police within their borders, enhances the argument that individuals may exercise a right or privilege to use violence in their own defense.
_	Although museums have justified their acquisition of stelae fragments with the argument that such objects are better preserved in an institution, no stela has been sold in as good a condition as it was in its original location.
_	Method arguments begin with a name labeling the argument that is part of the method name, followed by a colon followed by the expected argument type in parentheses and the argument name.
_	Though there has been much research that alludes to low WM abilities in those with Autism, these recent data weaken the argument that Autistic individuals have little WM facilities.
_	Individuals, NGOs, and scientists critical of genetic engineering cite the Project's biosafety analyses to support the argument that, due to the likelihood of unintended effects, each new genetically modified plant requires careful analysis and strict regulation.
_	However the Corn Laws may have had some effect: on the analysis of the "Standard" fifty-one Protectionist Conservatives had voted with Peel in 1846, but he no longer had any call on their loyalty and the argument that a Ten-Hour Act should be opposed because it would ruin Northern millowners now had less force; many abstained in 1847, only four of the fifty-one named by the "Standard" voting against the Bill's Second Reading; six against the Bill being considered in Committee.
_	Moving on to consider section 11(h) of the "Charter", the Court considered the argument that the crimes of kidnapping and child-stealing were too similar.
_	Stylistic differences in dialect, rhyme scheme and stanza pattern between the banns (an advertisement for the coming performance that begins the play) and certain sections of the play text lead to the argument that the play may have had two or three authors.
_	Then, if the opponent does in fact bring up the argument that the rhetor anticipated, the rhetor appears to be correct not only in the subject matter of the argument but in the general course of the argument itself.
_	It was not until the 1946 Orange Bowl game when people began to put forth the argument that "the ideals of democracy are more important than any football game."
_	In his work "Pramana-vihetana", Nagarjuna, takes up each of the sixteen categories of knowledge in Gautama's Nyaya-sutras at the foundation of Nyaya's discussion of "soul exists and the nature of soul in liberation process", and critiques them using the argument that these categories are relational and therefore unreal.
_	Citing binding precedent, "United States v. Stewart", 451 F.3d 1071, 1078 (9th Cir. 2006), Smith also rejected the argument that because the gun was homemade, it was beyond Congress's power under the Constitution's Commerce Clause to regulate.
_	The Court dismissed the argument that "use" of patented cells or genes applied only in the context of their isolated form.
_	Mariano was initially to be executed as well for being Andrés' brother, but the crowd pleaded for his freedom with the argument that he had saved the government from being overthrown.
_	Fray's heart and that she knows him better than any other, and seems to look down on him for his ambitions in relation to music, while Fray counters this with the argument that he's a lot more sophisticated and intelligent than he is given credit for and will one day have more success than predicted.
_	Some tax protesters have cited the Supreme Court case of "Flint v. Stone Tracy Co." for the argument that only corporate profits or income can be taxed, using the following quotation:
_	An updated version of Fuller's visionary data-visualization device, the Geoscope is utilized to make the argument that we are living near the end of the Screen Age, a historical moment when "the era of nations" will wane.
_	In it Penyafort put forth the argument that acting in defense of yourself or your property could only occur when an attack was already under way and you were repelling it, or if an attack was imminent.
_	Prosecutors attempted to dismiss the argument that Campo and Flores with inexperienced.
_	As a justice of the U.S. Supreme Court, Holmes rejected the argument that the text of the Constitution should be applied directly to cases that came before the court, as if it were a statute.
_	The court further rejected the argument that the machine code fell under the merger doctrine, holding that the programs were a form of expression.
_	Ginsburg made the argument that Section 402(g) of the Social Security Act discriminated against Stephen Wiesenfeld by not providing him with the same survivors' benefits as it would to a widow.
_	Brooks has recently found evidence of tools being used in Africa long before they were being made in Europe, which lends support to the argument that modern human behavior arose in Africa.
_	Lord convinced Richard Stallman to make GEL the official extension language of the GNU project, based on the argument that Scheme was a cleaner Lisp dialect than Emacs Lisp, and that GEL could evolve to implement other languages on the same runtime, namely Emacs Lisp.
_	Citing the Old Testament, these arguments present examples of forms of "honor" such as in Genesis 33:3, with the argument that "adoration is one thing, and that which is offered in order to honor something of great excellence is another".
_	Adam Smith made the argument that free labour was economically better than slave labour, and that it is nearly impossible to end slavery in a free, democratic, or republican form of government since many of its legislators, or political figures were slave owners, and would not punish themselves.
_	The cost he refers to is not necessarily the cost of tuition and living expenses, sometimes called out of pocket expenses, as one could make the argument that higher ability persons tend to enroll in "better" (i.e. more expensive) institutions.
_	The defence of provocation was based on the argument that a person who was so provoked as to completely lose their self-control should not be punished in the same way as those who murder wilfully.
_	A few years later in "State v. Gray" the Court rejected the argument that privacy rights applied to sodomy involving prostitution.
_	Moisés Naím, chief editor of "Foreign Policy", has made the argument that there was no 'consensus' in the first place.
_	The court then rejected the argument that his spleen should be protected as property to protect Moore's privacy and dignity.
_	They held that the case should be thrown out for this reason alone, although the argument that one did not know the law is not acceptable in a Greek court of law.
_	Laskin also rejected the argument that "discrimination embodied in the "Indian Act" under s. 12(1)(b)" must be subject to a "reasonable classification test" (as adopted by the United States Supreme Court when dealing with similar violations under the Fifth Amendment) and that it is justified, as a reasonable classification, because the "paramount purpose of the [Indian]
_	Moreover, Laskin did not accept the argument that a reasonable classification test can be incorporated into the right of equality before the law, since that would be precluded by "the telling words of s. 1, 'without discrimination by reason of race, national origin, colour, religion or sex."
_	Historian William C. Davis refutes the argument that Southern culture was different from that of Northern states or that it was a cause of the war, stating that "Socially and culturally the North and South were not much different.
_	The school district spent attention on Wheatley in order to promote the argument that segregated minority schools can be equal to segregated White schools.
_	During the Beagle Channel Arbitration Argentina brought forward the argument that the Pactos de Mayo implied a demarcation clause between both countries:
_	In the oral arguments of that case, "Cherokee Nation" had been cited as authority for the argument that "Indians cannot sue on their aboriginal title in court of the United States."
_	Any anger expressed by the inmates at any point is redirected into solving the argument that has occurred instead of pointing fingers and placing blame.
_	Also, the argument that limiting exposure to advertisements of contraceptive products may discourage sexual activity has been rejected by the Court as a justification for restrictions on the freedom to choose whether to bear or beget a child.
_	This act is condoned with the argument that otherwise the Chlorians would have eventually broken out of their galaxy and taken over the entire universe; Seaton compares the Chlorians to a cancer which must be destroyed "to the last cell".
_	They also feel that this denigration of the concept of respect for individual choice, an artificial societal polarization that fixates homosexual rights to the concept of innateness, is leaving lesbian rights more vulnerable to being attacked by the argument that women are more erotically plastic or sexually fluid than men.
_	The RIAA countered with the argument that even without any copying, and without any other violation of the record companies' distribution rights, the mere act of "making available" is a copyright infringement, even though the language does not appear in the Copyright Act, as a violation of the "distribution" right described in 17 USC 106(3).
_	Brabec rejected the argument that if there were no immediate decision on lifting the limits there would be no coal for heating plants and thousands of people would lose their jobs.
_	Referring to "Mitsubishi", "[t]he Supreme Court was not persuaded by the argument that only contractual disputes, not statutory rights, should be determined through mandatory binding arbitration even when the claims presented are complex and carry as many public policy implications as a claim under the Sherman Act," the Senate Judiciary Committee said in its report on the bill.
_	And one could make the argument that this season uses it more than any other, considering the official introduction of God.
_	Courts in California and New York have clearly rejected the argument that the making of pornography is prostitution.
_	The debate, which some argue was a literary fiction, offers a somewhat unorganized back-and-forth that lends credence to the argument that the debate took place and was recorded by Timothy himself.
_	Adélaïde, however, accepted it with the argument that her brother would do anything to prevent the country he loved from anarchy.
_	The most vocal critic of Mackinnon and (Andrea) Dworkin's rights-based approach to pornography is Ronald Dworkin, who rejects the argument that the private consumption of pornography can be said to be a breach of women's civil rights.
_	In Soviet Georgia (also called Old People in Russia) was the name of an advertising campaign used by Dannon yogurt in the United States to make the argument that eating the product would make one healthier.
_	The majority also rejected the argument that allowing for full territory representation in the Senate could permit the Commonwealth to 'swamp' the Senate with territory Senators, effectively reducing the representation of the States.
_	In "Conspicuous Compassion" West has advanced the argument that an "emerging culture of ostentatious caring" has arisen in Western societies and that it is really "about feeling good, not doing good".
_	Drift hypothesis, concerning the relationship between mental illness and social class, is the argument that illness causes one to have a downward shift in social class.
_	The court rejected the argument that any similarity between the works involved unprotectable scènes à faire, or standard themes common to any depiction of New York.
_	In classical homeopathy, people are grouped by "constitutional type" named after the homeopathic remedy applied, on the argument that people with similar "body shapes and personalities" suffer from the same type of diseases.
_	He was not in favour of the innovation originally but was persuaded by the argument that it was what his people wanted.
_	This provided valuable evidence for the argument that “cheap money fuels markets.
_	Hall's authorship had been an open secret, however, and in 1642 John Milton used it to attack him during the Smectymnuus controversy, employing the argument that the work lacked the constructive approach taken in More's "Utopia" and Bacon's "New Atlantis".
_	His philosophical inquiry is focused on issues in the philosophy of religion; he has written extensively on the problem of evil, including the argument that the process of natural selection is sufficiently brutal so as to pose a problem for those who believe in an omnipotent and morally good creator.
_	With state of the art, manufacturers could make the argument that there were not safe alternative designs at the time of manufacturing.
_	Where Friedman had provided the academic support for the argument that the integration of ESG type factors into financial practice would reduce financial performance, numerous reports began to appear in the early years of the century which provided research that supported arguments to the contrary.
_	This view relies on the argument that the semantic function of a proper name is to tell us "which" object bears the name, and thus to identify some object.
_	Industry voices make the argument that AI has become more versatile in the way we use all technological devices for more than their intended purpose because the AI allows the technology to operate in multiple ways, allegedly developing their own personalities and carrying out complex instructions of the user.
_	But none has refuted the argument that attracted by charm of their opponents, absorbed by their sweet songs and regaled by their very presence men lose gracefully.
_	Garland became the petitioner in the case of "Ex parte Garland" in which he made the argument that it was unconstitutional and a violation of "ex post facto".
_	KURTZ: I think the argument that I've heard Olbermann make in the past about Fox News – it's not an argument that I embrace – is that, because it poses as a news organization and puts out dangerous misinformation is a cheerleader for the Bush administration, that it's misinforming our society.
_	Research in 1972 advanced the argument that Tourette's is a neurological, rather than psychological, disorder; since the 1990s, a more neutral view of Tourette's has emerged, in which biological vulnerability and adverse environmental events are seen to interact.
_	Cafasso appeared briefly in "Outfoxed: Rupert Murdoch's War on Journalism", the 2004 documentary film that made the argument that Fox News had a right-wing bias.
_	The Ontario Court of Appeal was persuaded by the argument that the need to seek exemption from Christian exercises is itself a form of religious discrimination.
_	He pushed the argument that there were enough archaeological resources and collections, especially when combined with the newly forming highway salvage archaeology program, to require a formal position to manage archaeological resources and activities.
_	Previously, black students were "discouraged by their professors who would very likely to have used the argument that it 'wouldn't lead anywhere'.
_	The Court also rejected the argument that "Guardians Association v. Civil Service Commission", a case the Court decided in 1983, dictated the outcome of "Sandoval".
_	The second are "functional", seeking to define "religion" in terms of what it does for humans, for instance defining it by the argument that it exists to assuage fear of death, unite a community, or reinforce the control of one group over another.
_	But not least in the context of ongoing automation and robotisation, often with the argument that these trends will mean less paid work in the future, which in turn would create a need for a new welfare model.
_	But it's only fair to put forward the argument that this is down to the marketing of the machines rather than the quality of the product."
_	At the core of his Theory of Digital Objects lies the argument that digital objects are to be seen as computational operations.
_	In 1857, Edward Thomson denounced the argument that southern Christians "should retain their slaves in obedience to state laws forbidding manumission," saying that "the soft and slippered Christianity which disturbs no one, is not the Christianity of Christ."
_	The essay includes the argument that writing is a tool women must use to advocate for themselves in order to acquire the freedom women have historically been denied.
_	He responded with a long letter using the argument that it was for Parliament with the royal assent to decide any changes in the liturgy.
_	The “friend zone” has also focused on the argument that two people of opposite sexes can never be friends, and many saying that no friendship can occur after one party has made it evident that they have romantic feelings for the other.
_	The Court ruled in favour of TWU; accepting the argument that, as a private religious university, the school had the right to uphold its own code of conduct "even if the effect of that code is to exclude... or offend others" and attempting to force TWU to change its community covenant was an infringement on religious freedom.
_	Among the arguments raised in those cases were: (1) the argument that he was not a taxpayer within the meaning of the law; (2) the argument that wages are not income; (3) the argument that the Sixteenth Amendment does not authorize an income tax on individuals; and (4) the argument that the Sixteenth Amendment is unenforceable.
_	In the late seventeenth century, several European Christian thinkers presented the argument that certain traditions of Western philosophy and thought could be categorised together, thus establishing the category that is now called "Western esotericism".
_	His description of the emergence and refinement of scientific facts is articulated by the argument that science is craftman's work."
_	Belgrade's rejection was based on the argument that the agreement contained provisions for Kosovo's autonomy that went further than the Serbian/Yugoslav government saw as reasonable.
_	One of the lawyers of the plaintiffs wrote a complaint with the argument that the judgment made on February 4 did not obtain this unanimous agreement.
_	Story first confronted the argument that federal judicial power came from the states, and therefore that the Supreme Court had no right to overrule a state's interpretation of the treaty without its consent.
_	4. He rejected the argument that there was an abuse of EU law.
_	Rajagopal made the argument that the national telecast of the Hindu religious epic Ramayan during the late 1980s provided much of the ideological groundwork for the launch of the Ram Janmabhumi movement.
_	Firestone singled out pregnancy and childbirth, making the argument that an artificial womb would free "women from the tyranny of their reproductive biology."
_	O'Hearne next puts forward the argument that animals do not perform abstract reasoning, as demonstrated by the failure of apes to acquire more than a basic level of language, and are therefore not entitled to the same rights as humans.
_	His potential claim to the throne following the deposition of his cousin Edward V in 1483 was overlooked because of the argument that the attainder of his father also barred Warwick from the succession (although that could have been reversed by an Act of Parliament).
_	Smith presents the argument that approval or disapproval of the feelings of others is completely determined by whether we sympathize or fail to sympathize with their emotions.
_	According to an Associated Press report, Freddoso's book "sometimes includes inaccurate or incomplete information" to back the argument that Obama's record should be opposed by conservatives and moderates.
_	However, in another academic article, Olyan presents the argument that Ezra and Nehemiah's attempt of the restoration of Israel to its original state was expressed through the expulsion and alienation of foreign peoples that was caused by both ritual and moral impurities.
_	City officials made the argument that tenants for the renovated OPO building demanded parking within view of their new offices.
_	The court ruled that the original trial had ignored the significance of the video in disproving the argument that Meiwes only killed because he had been asked to kill.
_	Shortly after the incident, Russian government dismissed theories of FSB involvement in the assassination using the argument that Litvinenko was "not important" and "mentally unstable", implying that the government had no interest in killing such an insignificant figure.
_	Starrs makes the argument that the film's Aboriginal protagonists undergo a journey in which they learn the importance of choosing the protest songs of black Soul over the white coloniser's "whining" Country and Western songs.
_	The appeal was rejected with the argument that none of them had a "legal interest" in appealing the decision.
_	Darwin documents, is that it's the first venue in which the "critical thinking" strategy of creationism/Intelligent Design activists was successfully used: the argument that teaching the "weaknesses" of the theory of evolution contributes to a more "balanced view" of science, and that this curricular approach encourages critical thinking.
_	A further Poor Law Amendment Act was passed in 1844; its main effect was to again revise the treatment of unmarried mothers: in Committee stage many amendments seeking to relax the poor law regime were rebuffed by the Home Secretary on the argument that - correctly understood - the existing rules and regulations of the Poor Law Commission already permitted the relaxation sought.
_	An Anatomico-Functional Classification of internal rectal intussusception has been described, with the argument that other factors apart from the height of intussusception above the anal canal appear to be important to predict symptomology.
_	Evolutionary psychologists have been accused of conflating "is" and "ought", and evolutionary psychology has been used to argue against social change (because the way things are now has been evolved and adapted) and against social justice (e.g. the argument that the rich are only rich because they've inherited greater abilities, so programs to raise the standards of the poor are doomed to fail).
_	His defence relied almost entirely on the argument that he was merely following orders in conformity to "the leader principle" ("Führerprinzip") and his personal oath of loyalty to Hitler.
_	Waters bases this on the argument that the West Bank, including East Jerusalem, constitute occupied territory.
_	Varennikov was acquitted on the argument that he was following the orders of Minister of Defense.
_	These claims were disputed by the argument that the claim and subsequent settlement were exclusively premised upon the argument that the opening moments of "The Terminator" had plagiarized the other Ellison script produced by "The Outer Limits", "Soldier".
_	The state of New Jersey countered with the argument that the State with power to escheat was the state that was the domicile of the debtor, in this case New Jersey, where Sun Oil Co. was incorporated.
_	One suggested explanation for this phenomenon is the argument that younger English speakers are still developing their linguistic competence, and, metalinguistically wishing to express ideas without sounding too confident, certain, or assertive, use "like" to fulfill this purpose.
_	However, the court found that the argument that the treaty might permit the ESM to borrow funds directly from the ECB had no merit, as this was incompatible with the Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union.
_	On July 3, 2006 the Court of Arbitration for Sport denied her appeal to overturn the ban with the argument that said nandrolone was found in concentrations which were inconsistent with the normal levels for that stage of pregnancy.
_	The fundamental reason for the controversy he aroused, and the challenges his challenges met, was that his study of generalship in the First World War led him to criticise, indeed demolish, the argument that British generals in the period 1914-18 were all "donkeys", that their actions simply led to slaughter and disaster.
_	Milkovich v. Lorain Journal Co., 497 U.S. 1 (1990), was a United States Supreme Court case that rejected the argument that a separate opinion privilege existed against libel.
_	Wind turbines have been criticized for the noise they produce, their appearance, and the argument that they can affect the migratory patterns of birds (their blades obstruct passage in the sky).
_	This was one of the well known classical criticisms that had been brought to prominence in Cicero's text "De Divinatione", in the argument that no good comes from warnings of imminent disasters when they offer no means of escape.
_	In it George made the argument that a sizeable portion of the wealth created by social and technological advances in a free market economy is possessed by land owners and monopolists via economic rents, and that this concentration of unearned wealth is the main cause of poverty.
_	This is primarily the argument that lies at the heart of Mulla Sadra's Transcendent Theosophy.
_	The defence's case solely rested on the argument that the bodies could not be identified accurately.
_	In contrast, the argument that legal powers must be restrained to allow citizen autonomy, free from impediments in making voluntary, victimless choices that may or may not be perceived as morally wrong, also exists.
_	The video reflects this image in its roughness and tone Dassen Trio, and other pop rappers, respond to such attacks with the argument that their subject matter is more culturally appropriate and accessible for Japanese fans, and question the standards of "realness" put forth by underground rappers.
_	No defendant or claimant in such an action had ever persuaded a court to entertain the argument that the First Amendment's guarantees of free speech and free expression barred them.
_	His book details numerous atrocities committed by Europeans against Africans throughout history and makes the argument that Black people will have to resist white terrorism in the 21st Century in order to survive on planet Earth.
_	The book, co-written by Jonathan Prince, lays out eight case studies revolving around the argument that common hereditary diseases exist because at one point they were an adaptive advantage for our ancestors.
_	The site does acknowledge the argument that "Freedom of speech is awesome, but perhaps some venues are more appropriate than others [for] saying "fuck" an absurdly frequent number of times in a song played publicly".
_	He has championed the argument that "Africa is poor because she is not free", that the primary cause of African poverty is less a result of the oppression and mismanagement by colonial powers, but rather a result of modern oppressive native autocrats and socialist central planning policies.
_	Their convictions were based on the argument that they knew the dogs were aggressive towards other people and that they did not take sufficient precautions.
_	Kenneth Pomeranz has made the argument that the substantial resources taken from the New World to Europe made the crucial difference between European and Chinese development.
_	Le Vine recognizes the argument that literary tradition in novels about women sometimes include narratives about shopping-obsessed women looking for husbands, and these books contradict feminist values.
_	The House of Lords accepted the argument that the solvent employer should not.
_	This further developed the argument that the expansion of “lawfare” hinders the ability of commanders on the ground to make immediate and potentially life-or-death decisions.
_	They dismissed the argument that the law was not prescribed by law.
_	Annemans has always disputed the argument that a vote for Vlaams Belang therefore is pointless.
_	The production of foie gras occurs on the argument that migrating wildfowl seasonally eat such that their liver naturally enlarges.
_	In 1696, Davenant wrote "Essay on the East-India Trade", which continued the argument that imports should not be restricted because England was a net exporter of the goods imported from India.
_	Maria Amalia was interested in politics, had a passion for hunting, and managed to engage also in her interest for travels with the argument that pilgrimages would make it easier for her to give birth to sons.
_	In January 2009, an independent analysis by the Carnegie Endowment for International Peace in Washington, D.C. dismissed the argument that a withdrawal of the foreign military presence would allow al-Qaeda to operate in Afghanistan, pointing out that, first, the U.S.-led military forces do not control the periphery of the Afghan territory anyway, and, second, that targeted operations with the agreement of the Kabul government could be used instead.
_	Countering the argument that the Charvakas opposed all that was good in the Vedic tradition, states, "It may be said from the available material that Cārvākas hold truth, integrity, consistency, and freedom of thought in the highest esteem."
_	But it does help further the argument that both elements aren't mutually exclusive."
_	Others made the argument that a free market wage structure would ruin the amateur principles the sport was founded on, but Meredith felt that these words rang hollow considering that club directors and shareholders made vast profits.
_	This undermined the argument that PPP would place the risks involved in running the network into the hands of the private sector.
_	Ultimately, the district council approved the planning application and accepted the argument that an originally planned grass roof was not possible.
_	Bolling v. Sharpe was unique because it introduced the argument that segregation itself was unconstitutional.
_	The court rejected the argument that since state courts would enforce a restrictive covenant against white people, judicial enforcement of restrictive covenants would not violate the Equal Protection Clause.
_	On the argument that Protagoras was generous and assuming the debt initially, essentially teaching for free without pay all the while, Euathlus stated he was so disenchanted by the education he received -- or lack thereof -- he too knew that he would be in debt if learning the law was too frustrating or being a career attorney did not reap financial rewards, a matter of opportunity cost when he could have pursued some other profession, which was also a financial risk on Euathlus's part compared to other professions for a young man that paid a living wage outright.
_	This architectural shift has, in some circles, been coined "Thin Server Architecture" to highlight that complexity has been moved from the server to the client, with the argument that this ultimately reduces overall complexity of the system.
_	In the May 2006 edition of the "Weekly Standard", McGavick made the argument that Iran should be banned from the FIFA World Cup due to its nuclear weapons research program and statements by Iranian President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad that deny the truthfulness of the holocaust (which is a criminal offense in the 2006 World Cup host country, Germany).
_	The Valley of Elah has gained new importance as a possible point of support for the argument that Israel was more than a tribal chiefdom in the time of King David.
_	The book presents the argument that the collapse of the "diplomacy of imperialism" after Treaty of Versailles left a vacuum in the East Asian international system, a theme also explored in his 1972 "Pacific Estrangement: Japanese and American Expansion, 1897–1911."
_	Serbian historians dispute the argument that Albanians are the descendants of ancient Illyrians and being established in the region prior to the Slavs, while contending that the presence of Albanians in the Balkans starts from the 11th century.
_	It was rumoured that one or both of Mary's children were fathered by the king, although no evidence exists to support the argument that either of them was the king's biological child.
_	Opponents of the doctrine have countered with the argument that it undermines justification by faith.
_	Left-wing liberal journalist Gábor Miklósi (Index.hu) summarized Áder's presidency with the argument that the president remained silent on the really important matters and "his rare criticism does not hinder but legitimizes Hungary's increasingly authoritarian political system".
_	He was a long-term critic of the argument that the Sahara is 'spreading' as a result of poor land management, or that farmers and herders tend towards destroying their natural capital.
_	In "Fox v. Ohio" (1847) and "Moore v. Illinois" (1852), the Court reject the argument that the Double Jeopardy Clause was violated by permitting the state and federal government to criminalize the same conduct (which could hypothetically lead to duplicative prosecutions).
_	According to VandeWalle, Cron & Slocum, APGO and PPGO have differing relationships with various outcome variables, supporting the argument that a three-factor model should be used in place of the originally conceptualized two-factor model.
_	"More" also rejected the argument that criminal writs of error were authorized by § 14 of the Judiciary Act of 1789 (the "All Writs Act").
_	Welby stipulated that it was essential to understand the religious motivation behind extremism in order to understand it and also criticized the argument that claims that "Christian militia in the Central African Republic are nothing to do with Christianity."
_	With the election of Donald Trump as President, the government's stance had changed, favoring the argument that ALJs should be appointed.
_	Moreover, draft only applied to men, which was seen as gender based discrimination by some, but was often countered by the argument that women usually gave up their careers either temporarily or permanently to raise their children.
_	"Part 7: Neocons" wraps up the argument that the citizens of the US were intentionally and illegally conned into the war by a group of powerful neo-conservatives who had been looking for an excuse to invade Iraq long before the September 11 attacks.
_	Seth Schoen's goal was to provide tangible proof for the argument that "source code is speech" and hence should be given the same legal protections as free speech.
_	In the legislature, Zimmermann tentatively supported legislation that would allow trained employees to carry guns in the school they were assigned to, as he was "swayed by the argument that rural schools cannot afford to wait the extra minutes it might take for law enforcement to arrive in the case of a mass shooting".
_	These case studies are thoughtful examinations of the argument that mega-projects and events are vital for urban development.
_	The commandment to kill Amalekites is not practiced by contemporary Jews, based on the argument that Sennacherib deported and mixed the nations, so it is no longer possible to determine who is an Amalekite.
_	Bill Baroni maintained the argument that the traffic jams were part of a legitimate study to determine "whether congestion on the main approaches to the toll plaza could be reduced if the lanes earmarked for Fort Lee were eliminated."
_	The Pope devotes much text to defending the practice of celibacy against the argument that it is contrary to human nature.
_	The diversity of monuments falling within the potbelly sculptural tradition and the individuality of the monuments support the argument that the monuments represent individual rulers.
_	The court also refused to accept the argument that Craigslist caused or induced its users to post unlawful ads merely by supplying the erotic category and an associated search mechanism, stating that "the phrase 'adult,' even in conjunction with 'services,' is not unlawful in itself nor does it necessarily call for unlawful content."
_	Deane put the argument that taking the waters in England was safer than travel to continental Europe to do so.
_	Iconographic representations similarities of these sites with the Pacific coast of Chiapas and Guatemala, depict closer relations than those suggested by the argument that they simply share a pan-mesoamerican tradition.
_	Next up for the Federalists was Seth Hastings of Massachusetts, who submitted the argument that the designation amendment rendered the Vice Presidency useless and advocated for the elimination of the three-fifths clause.
_	Quinn purposely designed the game's protagonist as someone with an outwardly happy and easy life, so as to "preëmpt the argument that someone is only depressed because they have a difficult life."
_	When in 1946 he tried to leave the farm, his request was rejected by the labour bureau of Bad Ischl, on the argument that the slave labour duty imposed by the Nazi occupation was still valid.
_	Justice Eady rejected the argument that Mosley could be said to have committed a crime under the Offences against the Person Act 1861 on himself.
_	was said to have backed out of the project, bringing forward the argument that they asked for complete details about the film, including script and expenses.
_	Frye makes the argument that not only is there a lateral connection of archetypes through intertextuality, but that there is a transcendent almost spiritual unity within the body of literature.
_	Behe, another member of "The Wedge," contributed the argument that he subsequently called "irreducible complexity" to a subsequent edition of "Pandas" in 1993.
_	Several historians take the middle ground between condemning reparations and supporting the argument that they were not a complete burden upon Germany.
_	In the present case, Executive Secretary Ermita claimed executive privilege on the argument that the communications elicited by the three questions "fall under conversation and correspondence between the President and public officials" necessary in "her executive and policy decision-making process," and that "the information sought to be disclosed might impair our diplomatic as well as economic relations with the People’s Republic of China."
_	In support of the argument that the movements bore similarity, Jaffrelot cites Hetukar Jha, who says of the Bihar situation that "The real motive behind the attempts of the Yadavas, Kurmis and Koeris at Sanskritising themselves was to get rid of this socio-economic repression".
_	Many dedicated party members accepted the argument that they could perform one last service to the party by allowing themselves to be convicted of crimes that they had not committed.
_	The House of Lords rejected the argument that the relevant statutory provisions required "individual consideration of individual cases in every instance, free of presumptions or policies", and held that it would be difficult to understand how a Secretary of State could properly manage the complexities of his statutory duty without a policy.
_	In "When World Views Collide: A Study in Imagination and Evolution", John J. Pierce presents the argument that Lewis was partially writing in response to what Lewis saw as "Wellsianity"—an "anthropocentric evolutionary mythology"—which he came to view as both false and blasphemous, condemning H. G. Wells' world view through works such as "Out of the Silent Planet".
_	Henle's essay was criticized by some representatives of Gestalt therapy with the argument that Henle unilaterally refers only to Perls' three recent books and ignores the rest of Gestalt therapy literature, and thereby creates a distorting image of Gestalt theraopy.
_	The first time, Pike defended his views as orthodox, and counterattacked with the argument that racial segregation was a worse heresy than anything he had written.
_	Academic Andrew Price-Smith has made the argument that the virus helped tip the balance of power in the later days of the war towards the Allied cause.
_	Mark Gasiorowski states that while, on the face of it, there is considerable merit to the argument that U.S. policymakers helped U.S. oil companies gain a share in Iranian oil production after the coup, "it seems more plausible to argue that U.S. policymakers were motivated mainly by fears of a communist takeover in Iran, and that the involvement of U.S. companies was sought mainly to prevent this from occurring.
_	Windschuttle's claims are based upon the argument that the 'orthodox' view of Australian history were founded on hearsay or the misleading use of evidence by historians.
_	The court reviews the text of the royal charter, rebutting the argument that the charter was "evidence that the crown recognized the Indian title as paramount to their own."
_	In this book he made the argument that democratization and decentralization facilitate the rise of subnational authoritarianism, as seen in contexts as varied as Brazil, Russia, Indonesia, and South Africa.
_	This discovery adds weight to the argument that Siouan groups migrated through West Virginia and may have inhabited the Kanawha Valley.
_	The book "Abortion and the Conscience of the Nation" presents the argument that abortion involves unjust discrimination against the unborn.
_	Aside from the argument that aspects of the Quran’s message and the Prophet’s teachings had to change as circumstances changed, some Islamic scholars defend naskh from the "God-changed-his-mind problem" maintaining that "whoever rejects abrogation has rejected His sovereignty and might" (‘Abd ar-Rahmaan as-Sa‘di), and that "abrogation as a mechanism that perfectly reflects God’s omnipotence.
_	Savulescu's view that the parents' disagreement with the doctors was reasonable was based in part on the argument that the prospect of benefit offered by the proposed experimental treatment, albeit small, offered more than death.
_	Given the "de facto" independence of Central Tibet in the first half of the twentieth century, The Chinese government remains sensitive to the argument that its sovereignty over Tibet is illegitimate.
_	The PRC rejects the argument that prostitution is an unremarkable transaction between consenting individuals and that prohibition laws constitute a violation of civil liberties.
_	App also published "A Straight Look at the Third Reich", a defense of Nazi Germany, and "The Curse of Anti-Anti-Semitism", supporting the argument that the entire Jewish community is responsible for the death of Christ.
_	Shakespeare's "King John" contains references to the giant Colbron and to Philip Sparrow (who is not part of the traditional Guy of Warwick legend) in close proximity to each other, which buttresses the argument that Shakespeare was somehow connected to the production of "Guy Earl of Warwick".
_	While this could be interpreted as a justification for state action to reduce poverty, it was used by classical liberals to justify inaction with the argument that the net benefit to all individuals would be higher.
_	However, a Raetian origin for Romansch is uncertain, as Rhaeto-Romance languages appear most closely related to the Gallo-Romance group, strengthening the argument that the Raeti had adopted Celtic speech before Latinisation.
_	The spokesperson for the Court, Roderick Liddell, then felt compelled to clarify the judgment, saying that the Court had found the pre-trial detention of Tymoshenko to be unnecessary and based on grounds that are not listed in Article 5 (namely, a judge detaining her because she had been disrespectful during a hearing), rather than agreeing with the argument that she had been detained in order to inhibit her political participation.
_	Some tax protesters have cited this case for the argument that it is possible to avoid paying taxes without punishment by using the kind of defense raised by Cheek about a good faith misunderstanding of the tax law itself.
_	He wrote a newspaper article, published by "Kesari", that countered the argument that the British government was constitutional by noting that in India there was no social contract whereby the government and the governed shared mutual obligations, and where the former was accountable to the latter.
_	The court also rejected the argument that the patent did not preempt the entire use of cffDNA and that some uses were unpreempted.
_	The new committee declared they would fight the Northern State Parkway alignment on the argument that "it is uneconomic, unnecessarily destructive and contrary to the public interest."
_	This clashes with the argument that people would not spend much of the money they receive (and therefore helicopter money cannot be inflationary).
_	In 1854 Frederick Griffin wrote "Junius Uncovered", in which he advanced the argument that Pownall was Junius; this argument was again raised by Pownall descendant Charles A. W. Pownall in his 1908 biography of Pownall.
_	The court did not accept the argument that Accolade's games competed directly with Sega's, noting that there was no proof that any of Accolade's published games had diminished the market for any of Sega's games.
_	Vanguard makes the argument that no one would go to Carnegie for sports due to the overwhelming work load compared to other schools.
_	Dupas and Cohen’s findings support the argument that free distribution of ITNs can be more effective than cost-sharing in increasing coverage and saving lives.
_	The Russian Federation accepts historic information about the Holodomor but rejects the argument that it was ethnic genocide by pointing out the fact that millions of non-Ukrainian Soviet citizens also died because of the famine.
_	Guarino da Verona, in 1435, used the literary flowering of Augustus's era—which included Livy, Horace, Virgil, and Seneca—to argue against Bruni's contention; Gian Francesco Poggio Bracciolini countered with the argument that all the authors had been born during the waning years of the Roman Republic.
_	The correct interpretation is that the risk-free rate could be either positive or negative and in practice the sign of the expected risk-free rate is an institutional convention – this is analogous to the argument that Tobin makes on page 17 of his book "Money, Credit and Capital".
_	Such reasoning amounts to the argument that class fairness is a tautology, where so long as there is equality within the same class, it is considered fair.
_	However, there is also the argument that similar to men who fail to meet the standards of the company and cannot comply with their contract, women who cannot perform work at the performance expected of them should be given the proportionate number of benefits and given no exceptions over men.
_	Concerns that defamation under common law might be incompatible with the new republican form of government caused early American courts to struggle between William Blackstone's argument that the punishment of "dangerous or offensive writings . . . [was] necessary for the preservation of peace and good order, of government and religion, the only solid foundations of civil liberty" and the argument that the need for a free press guaranteed by the Constitution outweighed the fear of what might be written.
_	In his "Abrams" dissent, Holmes first disposed of the argument that the facts in the case supported a conviction under the clear-and-present-danger standard, insisting that a criminal prosecution required proof of specific intent to commit the crime that was charged.
_	In April 2017, citing a report prepared by Muslim Mahila Research Kendra in co-ordination with Shariah Committee for Women, AIMPLB has claimed that Muslims have a lower rate of divorce compared to other religious communities, countering the argument that Muslims have the highest number of divorce in the country due to the practice of triple talaq.
_	The Third Circuit rejected the argument that Monsanto was only putting its best foot forward and was therefore innocent of fraud.
_	Section 23 uses the pronoun "He" to describe these qualifications, which contributed to the argument that only men could be appointed to the Senate.
_	He said the argument that the article was repugnant to absolute ownership needed to assert, wrongly, that a share is a sum of money dealt with by executory limitations.
_	Texas-based Supreme Beef Processors, Inc. sued on the argument that Salmonella is naturally occurring and ultimately prevailed when a federal appeals court affirmed a lower court.
_	It is chosen to be the unique value of the argument that lies within the interval (–π, π].
_	Campany states, "Few narratives more succinctly summarize the argument that ordinary foods or "grains" block the path to transcendence."
_	Charles Clarke writes that "the obvious similarities between "N. tenuis", "N. talangensis" and "N. jacquelineae" are suggestive of recent adaptive radiation, and add further weight to the argument that the non-volcanic mountains of Bukit Barisan are the primary source of morphological diversity in Sumatran "Nepenthes"".
_	Working with the New York patient families who founded the Tourette Syndrome Association (TSA, since renamed to TAA) in 1972, the Shapiros advanced the argument that Tourette's was neurological rather than psychological, and the medical view of Tourette syndrome was "freed from its century-long submission to discredited psychoanalytic theory".
_	This theory has recently been championed again with the argument that it leads to a simpler stemma for the manuscripts of the sagas.
_	He presents the argument that the creative and cultural inquiry undertaken by artists is a form of research.
_	Second, the Court rejected the argument that it lacked subject matter jurisdiction for want of a federal question over a matter of local law.
_	Nigerian scholar Adekeye Adebajo wrote in 2002 that "there was merit...in the argument that the establishment of ECOMOG did not conform to the constitutional legal requirements of ECOWAS".
_	During the trials of Alger Hiss in 1949, his defense team included in their attacks on Chambers' character the argument that Chambers was accusing Hiss out of a suggestion from "Class Reunion".
_	It advised Defense Minister Amir Peretz to order an immediate evacuation of the house, based on the argument that the settlers did not receive the necessary permits from the Civil Administration.
_	Aguilar also made the argument that the UPF statute was unconstitutional, since at the time the Second Amendment was adopted, 16- and 17-year-olds could lawfully bear arms.
_	However, equally plausible is the argument that these trends result from the cultural norms that sway potentially high-earning women toward home rather than toward work.
_	Similarly, the failure of the Sears Financial Network and other nonbank “financial supermarkets” that had seemed to threaten commercial banks in the 1980s undermined the argument that financial conglomerates would be more efficient than “specialized” financial firms.
_	When Sir Joseph makes the argument that "love levels all ranks", a delighted Josephine says that she "will hesitate no longer".
_	The debate about art and photography intensified around the argument that if anyone could take a photograph then photography could not possibly be called art.
_	During the World War II Internment era, the U.S. Executive Order 9066 had an inclusion of orphaned infants with "one drop of Japanese blood" (as explained in a letter by one official) or the order stated anyone at least one-sixteenth Japanese (descended from any intermarriage) lends credence to the argument that the measures were racially motivated, rather than a military necessity.
_	This strengthens the argument that Islam came into Central Asia through wandering Sufis.
_	Burt, a Canadian scholar, but also a professor at an American university, agrees completely, noting that Foster, the British minister to Washington, also rejected the argument that annexation of Canada was a war goal.
_	The court rejected the argument of the British government that the complexity of large fraud cases and the public interest in securing a conviction justified the compulsion; the court also rejected the argument that power of a trial judge to exclude admissions was a defence in this case.
_	Others reject it, giving the argument that Lucifer is a more positive and easy-going ideal than Satan.
_	Moynihan's report made the argument that the relative absence of nuclear families (those having both a father and mother present) in Black America would greatly hinder further Black socioeconomic progress.
_	The poll found that 73 percent of them supported Clean Energy Climate Change legislation in the United States Congress, 79 percent believed ending our dependence on foreign oil was important to national security, and 67 percent supported the argument that such legislation will help their own economic prospects.
_	Wu Chengsi's ally, the official Zhang Jiafu had the commoner Wang Qingzhi (王慶之) organize a group of petitioners, requesting that Wu Chengsi be made crown prince—under the argument that with an emperor from the Wu clan, it would be inappropriate to have a crown prince from the Li clan.
_	Further, Peters raised the argument that Millman was the only person with a motive for killing Mary Tulpin.
_	On its website, the Anglican Communion presents the argument that the story is "not even vaguely about homosexual love or relationships", but is instead "about dominance and rape, by definition an act of violence, not of sex or love".
_	However, the argument that the poverty of stimulus supports the innateness hypothesis remains controversial.
_	If there are enough resources on the planet to provide all people with a decent life, the argument that there are "too many people" is rather dubious.
_	Today, these trends have bolstered the argument that capitalism should now be viewed as a truly world system (Burnham).
_	Despite Bachmann's leading all other Representatives in fund raising, a Republican aide stated some "members are getting resentful of Bachmann, who they say is making the argument that you're not really a Tea Party supporter unless you support her.
_	The Shapiros, working with the patient families who founded in 1972 the Tourette Syndrome Association (TSA, renamed to Tourette Association of America in 2015), advanced the argument that Tourette's is a neurological, rather than psychological, disorder, and worked to persuade the media to promote information about Tourette's.
_	Henderson presented the argument that "global warming, earthquakes, hurricanes, and other natural disasters are a direct effect of the shrinking numbers of pirates since the 1800s".
_	Like other feminist BDSM practitioners, Wakeman rejects the argument that women are taught what they enjoy and led to be submissive by a dominant sexist power structure.
_	The rituals were completed and the double did indeed gain the powers promised to him, but at a cost that Rhiannon had fueled her own life with: gaining and maintaining magick through cannibalism... a choice the double made willingly if it would help him defeat evil, and using the argument that "The Night Man has ALWAYS evolved when it comes to threats against the innocents".
_	She was persuaded to "sacrifice herself for the country" and accept the king by her relative Count Finckenstein, who wished to replace Wilhelmine von Lichtenau, with the argument that she would be able to save the king from the bad company of his circle.
_	Speciality and Madaus sued and inititally won based on the argument that 90% of prescriptions were already generic, but Doncaster appealed and won the appeal based on the argument that it could not charge a premium with a generic label.
_	In September, "Joint Force Quarterly" published an article by an Air Force colonel that disputed the argument that unit cohesion is compromised by the presence of openly gay personnel.
_	In "A.G. of Quebec (Procureur Général) c. Stanley John Reid et Frances Muriel Reid" (JE 2002-1266), the defendant raised the argument that the content of Internet is of exclusive federal jurisdiction pursuant to the Constitution Act, 1867, and thus its regulation is "ultra vires" of the Quebec Government.
_	Although the banker Mauriciu Blank advised him to send it to London or to a neutral country, such as Denmark, Brătianu feared the German submarines of the North Sea and chose another ally of Romania in World War I, Russia, using the argument that "Russia would feel offended if we sent it to England".
_	A number of philosophers have offered the argument that qualia constitute the hard problem of consciousness, and resist reductive explanation in a way that all other phenomena do not.
_	However, the Royal Navy withdrew the offer after the ship's performance in the Falklands War disproved the argument that she was surplus to requirements, and the 1983 election of the Australian Labor Party led to the cancellation of plans to replace "Melbourne".
_	Although it is not certain that "Megamastax's" large size is a result of this atmospheric trend, the presence of such a large fish at this period does weaken the argument that a lack of large Silurian vertebrates can be used as evidence of low oxygen levels.
_	Feminist historian Jill Liddington has praised "Three Guineas" as "an eloquent and impish attack on patriarchal structures", notes how the book puts forward the argument that "men's power under patriarchy dovetails with militarism", and claims ""Three Guineas" offers an important bridge between the earlier feminist flowering and the later 1980s wave of a women's peace movement".
_	Young returns to Straus's observations of women engaging in physical activity, and also incorporates her own experiences to make the argument that women are physically no less capable than men, but underperform due to psychological barriers.
_	Edwards appealed to the Superior Court of Yuba County and later to the Supreme Court of the United States, on the argument that his sentence was unconstitutional on the basis that the California law violated the Commerce Clause.
_	Bdelycleon responds to these points with the argument that jurors are in fact subject to the demands of petty officials and they get paid less than they deserve—revenues from the empire go mostly into the private treasuries of men like Cleon.
_	- this may support the argument that EMS is an evolved survival trait.
_	He seeks to offer an empirical grounding for the argument that animal welfarism is problematic for animals, entrenching harmful use and speciesism.
_	CDs based on his track lists have also been released, including "England's Dreaming" (2004) and "Meridian 1970" (2005), the latter of which puts forward the argument that 1970 was a high-point for popular music, contrary to critical opinion.
_	Although one could make the argument that engineering profit serves the public good, it would not be saved under the DDE because the intention behind it is not to generate a greater good than to which the collective harm of manipulation is greater.
_	Dore Gold, Israel's former ambassador to the United Nations, has emphasized that the resolutions were adopted under Chapter VII of the United Nations Charter and "are legally binding under international law, adding further legal force to the argument that Iran has no legal right whatsoever to enrich uranium".
_	Many other interpretations of the poem have developed from the argument that Tennyson does not identify with Ulysses, and further criticism has suggested that the purported inconsistencies in Ulysses' character are the fault of the poet himself.
_	Some consider it to be an "early predecessor" or "ancestor" to the modern assault rifle, while others believe that the Fedorov Avtomat was the world's first assault rifle, based on the argument that it was chambered in "one of the least powerful rifle-caliber cartridges then in use".
_	Lappé makes the argument that what she calls "living democracy," i.e. not only what we do in the voting booth but through our daily choices of what we buy and how we live, provides a mental and behavioral framework of goods and goodness that is aligned with our basic human nature.
_	Meanwhile, cognitive semantic theories are typically built on the argument that lexical meaning is conceptual.
_	To make the argument that children of immigrants converge onto an "American type" required Boas to use the two groups that changed the most."
_	The Court went on to reject the argument that the trial was unfair because the chances of jury nullification were impaired by the judge.
_	According to Article 84 of the Constitution of India, which sets the principle qualification for member of Parliament, and Article 75 of the Constitution of India, which sets the qualifications for the minister in the Union Council of Minister, and the argument that the position of prime minister has been described as "primus inter pares" (the first among equals), A prime minister must:
_	This is the argument that all true atheists are at heart lying so that they may live in a way that is contrary to God's commands (as seen in particular interpretations of Romans 1:18-25).
_	Authors like Myra Sadker and David Sadker provide a history to the argument that schools are “feminine” spaces—a critique these authors challenge.
_	He also made the argument that the charges against her fall under parts of the law that were based on the now abolished 1974 constitution, and therefore are invalid.
_	The party was abolished in 1925 on the argument that it backed a rebellion against the government.
_	On the argument that there is no longer any place for these animals to be released to and those zoos ‘protect’ these species, PAWS believes that more effort should go into the preservation of these animals’ habitat.
_	The majority of the current literature supports the argument that the theory of mind deficit is a stable trait-characteristic rather than a state-characteristic of schizophrenia.
_	The Steppe theory is compatible with the argument that the PIE homeland must have been larger, because the "Neolithic creolisation hypothesis" allows the Pontic-Caspian region to have been part of PIE territory.
_	Chatterjee supports the argument that postcolonial perspective repels “Holistic perspectives of the grand narrative of enlightenment, industrial revolution, and rationality render ‘other’ histories and people invisible under hegemonic constructions of truth and normalcy.”
_	The Commonwealth Government's solution was to engage the Government of South Australia under the Commonwealth-State Housing Agreement to build a housing estate at Salisbury North explicitly to house the "industrials" (sub-professional employees) of LRWE, on the argument that these grades would be most attracted by the idea of housing close at hand.
_	In addition to the argument that gifts in kind often do not meet the needs of recipients, it has also been argued that gifts in kind fail to empower the recipients because the recipients don't have as much flexibility on how to spend the gifts as they would with gifts of cash or of public goods that they actively solicit.
_	So the argument that formula_118 still does not apply.
_	discusses the argument that, in elementary school, one is taught that formula_6, so, ignoring all essential subtleties, "multiplying" this identity by formula_7 gives formula_8.
_	This correction of the initial allocation of the fossil record was based on the argument that "Ardipithecus kadabba" had more "primitive" features than other "Ardipithecus" fossils.
_	The government's decision to allow his extradition was based on the argument that these were still committing crimes from prison.
_	Critics of drug prohibition often cite the fact that the end of alcohol prohibition in 1933 led to immediate decreases in murders and robberies to support the argument that legalization of drugs could have similar effects.
_	Critics also use the argument that "irregardless" is not – or should not be – a word at all, because it lacks the antecedents of a "bona fide nonstandard word."
_	In his review of "The Fate of the Earth", Brian Martin demonstrated that the argument that “most people” would die in the nuclear war is highly exaggerated, especially for the Global South.
_	Also, Williams mentions the argument that none of the groups labeled "gnostic" shared a common set of beliefs that put them in a group together.
_	The law faced several legal challenges, primarily based on the argument that an individual mandate requiring Americans to buy health insurance was unconstitutional.
_	DNA testing of the descendants of Blue Jacket and Van Swearingen has given additional support to the argument that Blue Jacket was not Van Swearingen.
_	On the ATS claims, the court rejected the argument that private individuals could not bring suit under the Act.
_	Early shortages of materials, equipment and manpower for construction, along with the early retreat of the allied forces on all fronts, added support to the argument that emergency housing should be only of temporary nature, and not built in support of long-term postwar goals.
_	Studies published from the 1990s also dispute the argument that Moravia reached the level of an early medieval state (a lasting and stable polity) during its history.
_	She rejects the argument that honor killings are not related to Islam and claims that while fundamentalists of all religions place restrictions on women, in Islam not only are these restrictions harsher, but Islam also reacts more violently when these rules are broken.
_	But, the bulk of Kilty's dissent was devoted to the argument that Congress's power over the federal district was broad.
_	Lord Parker noted the argument that a company should be wound up on the ground that its substratum had failed, but dismissed it.
_	It was used in hindsight to strengthen the argument that doctors would interpret the word to mean that thalidomide was safe during the final stage of pregnancy only.
_	These claims were challenged in a suit by California Secretary of State March Fong Eu, based on the argument that they had no scientific support.
_	Tantawy initially took a line against suicide bombings, and unlike his compatriot Yusuf al-Qaradawi, he condemned the use of suicide bombings against Israelis, rejecting the argument that all Israelis were legitimate targets, because at some stage they would all carry a gun.
_	McLachlin CJ rejected the argument that such hypotheticals would amount to an overbroad conferral of discretion on courts, writing instead that the question is one of statutory interpretation, “grounded in experience and common sense”.
_	They criticize the argument that rape cannot be sexually motivated because rapists do not prefer sexually attractive victims by citing evidence that a disproportionate number of rape victims are women in their teens and early twenties.
_	The court could not accept the argument that the amount of RM1,112,250 was a gift from Tengku Muhammad Fakhry, based on the non-appearance in court of Manohara throughout the proceedings.
_	The court refused to reconsider, accepting the argument that "like-minded people" might secret Hovind away if he left the country.
_	The majority rejected the argument that the First Amendment rights of a corporation derive purely from their business and property interests.
_	He gave her the freedom to write as she wished, but to use the argument that she spoke as a sister and mother to a son with the right to the Danish throne and upon her own initiative.
_	The Court also refuted the argument that accountability to Parliament was an alternative safeguard against the executive abusing its powers under the ISA, citing "Inland Revenue Commissioners v. National Federation of Self-Employed and Small Businesses Ltd." (1981):
_	His work has centered on the analysis of violence among tribal peoples, and, using socio-biological analyses, he has advanced the argument that violence among the Yanomami is fueled by an evolutionary process in which successful warriors have more offspring.
_	Spooner's essay "No Treason" offers an individualist anarchist rebuttal to the argument that existing democratic governments are justified by majority consent.
_	Academic reviews of the topic are more equivocal, noting that although the argument that animals have at least simple conscious thoughts and feelings has strong support, some critics continue to question how reliably animal mental states can be determined.
_	If a ditransitive verb is formed from a transitive one, the causee (i.e. the argument that is subject and object at the same time) appears in the possessive case ("-q(o)"); see the example below (the "e" before the causative suffix is an epenthetic vowel):
_	The authors claim this study is the first experimental evidence to support the argument that nociceptive sensitisation is actually an adaptive response to injuries.
_	In astrophysics and physical cosmology, Olbers' paradox, named after the German astronomer Heinrich Wilhelm Olbers (1758–1840), also known as the "dark night sky paradox", is the argument that the darkness of the night sky conflicts with the assumption of an infinite and eternal static universe.
_	Michael G. Kenny makes the argument that these sun-shapes are connected with chief figures.
_	Hedin intervened on his behalf, achieving a pardon on December 4, 1946, with the argument that von Falkenhorst had likewise striven to pardon the ten Norwegians condemned to death.
_	Paul bases this on the argument that certain acts are so destructive to the human person that there are no extenuating circumstances that would allow them.
_	The first article by anthropologists, Michal Ralph, Aisha Beliso-De Jesús and Stephan Palmié titled, "Saint Tupac," makes the argument that rapper Tupac Shakur has continued, even after death, to be a spearhead figure in battling white supremacy, capitalism and the oppression of African-Americans.
_	However, the argument that meridiungulates are related to artiodactyls and perissodactyls needs support from molecular sequencing.
_	A number of commentators have advanced the argument that the principle of "command responsibility" could make high-ranking officials within the Bush administration guilty of war crimes committed either with their knowledge or by persons under their control.
_	Cochrane then draws upon the work of Catherine Perlow and Barbara Noske, who have argued that animals may represent an exploited group in a Marxist sense, but he is critical of the argument that this exploitation is caused by capitalism and that overthrowing capitalism would be a necessary step for achieving justice.
_	Kuntz also raised the argument that determinations of educational services and content were, constitutionally, matters delegated to the states.
_	Finally, Kennedy formulated what is now known as the coercion test in answering the argument that participation in the prayer was voluntary:
_	MacIntyre revises Aristotelianism with the argument that the highest temporal goods, which are internal to human beings, are actualized through participation in social practices.
_	At a time when President Ronald Reagan threatened to dismantle equality and affirmative action laws in the USA in the 1980s, equality and affirmative action professionals employed by US firms along with equality consultants, engaged in establishing the argument that a diverse workforce should be seen as a competitive advantage rather than just as a legal constraint.
_	But this statement was disproven when Byomkesh found the tape that was playing in Dr. Das's room during the murder; the argument that he was in his room playing his sitar was Das's alibi.
_	On the other hand, the argument that Southern Mongolian is distinct is based on considerations such as the following:
_	Program size was about 30% larger than the VAX but very close to that of the Z8000, validating the argument that the higher code density of CISC designs was not actually all that impressive in reality.
_	The court rejected the argument that article 8 conferred a right to abortion, but found that Ireland had violated the European Convention on Human Rights by failing to provide an accessible and effective procedure by which a woman can have established whether she qualifies for a legal abortion under current Irish law.
_	The Rare Earth Hypothesis uses the Goldilocks principle in the argument that a planet must neither be too far away from, nor too close to a star and galactic center to support life, while either extreme would result in a planet incapable of supporting life.
_	Anarcho-capitalists often argue, for instance, that the argument that taxation is needed to fund protection of liberty and property from aggression is a contradiction, because taxation itself requires aggression in order to be enforced.
_	Though the most common arguments against deflationary accounts and eliminative materialism are the argument from qualia and the argument that conscious experiences are irreducible to physical states—or that current popular definitions of "physical" are incomplete—the objection follows that the one and same reality can appear in different ways, and that the numerical difference of these ways is consistent with a unitary mode of existence of the reality.
_	After defeating the battlesuit, Spider-Man convinces Mysterio to switch sides with the argument that $2 billion will be worthless if Doctor Octopus destroys the world.
_	Lively gave a lengthy presentation to members of Uganda's parliament and cabinet, in which he laid out the argument that the nation's president and lawmakers would later use to justify Uganda's anti-gay crackdown; namely that Western agitators were trying to unravel Uganda's social fabric by spreading "the disease" of homosexuality to children.
_	His targets denounced Roosevelt for trying to take over the Democratic party and to win reelection, using the argument that they were independent.
_	The successive Argentine governments since the May Revolution tried to govern all the provinces that comprised the Viceroyalty of the Río de la Plata citing the argument that when the king's governance ceased, its rights reverted to the people.
_	The Mimamsa school focussed on "dharma", deriving ethics and activity from the "karma-kanda" (rituals) part of the Vedas, with the argument that ethics for this life and efficacious action for "svarga" (heaven) cannot be derived from sense-perception, and can only be derived from experience, reflection and understanding of past teachings.
_	Davidson rejects the argument that the conquests described by Kalhana must have been real, because Kalhana could not have invented historical persons.
_	It has been claimed by the People's Republic of China on the argument that since 200 BC Chinese fishermen have used the Spratly islands.
_	In the third quatrain there is a continuation from the second quatrain in the argument that because of "my dear love's" constant nature "it" does not fear "policy".
